(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“...has amassed 438 000 signatures and there is still enthusiasm among LMS fans about the show coming back especially following Roseanne s return...”
“It became a rallying cry for conservatives with a petition launched that called for ABC to bring back a show that appeals to a broad swath of Americans who find very few shows that extol the virtues with which they can identify namely conservative values A year later the petition...”
“It’s the fans!”
“When I heard the offer to create more episodes of Last Man Standing, I did a fist pump so hard I threw my back out.”
“Now we get the news from Fox that it’s time to get back out on that diamond – hell yes, I’m excited!”
“It leaves you sitting in the dugout, holding a bat and puzzled.”
““Team LMS was in the sixth inning, ahead by four runs, stands were packed and then for no reason, they call off the game.”
““Excited?,” he said today.”
“Allen has been vocal about his disappointment over the cancellation of Last Man Standing by ABC and his hope to see it come back.”
“Created by Jack Burditt, Last Man Standing stars Allen as Mike Baxter, a married father of three girls, who tries to maintain his manliness in a world increasingly dominated by women.”


“… Having accumulated 438000 signatures, LMS fans are still enthusiastic about the return of the show, especially after rosani's return... "
"This became a rallying slogan of conservatives. They launched a petition calling on ABC to launch a new program to attract the majority of Americans. They found that few programs can praise the virtue they can identify with, that is, conservative values. A year later, the petition..."
"It's the fans!"
"When I heard that someone suggested making a few more episodes of the last man standing, I gave a hard punch and threw it all out on the back."
"Now that we've got news from fox, it's time to get back to diamonds - hell, yes, I'm excited!"
"It makes you sit in the lounge, clubbing, at a loss."
"The LMS team led by four points in the sixth inning, the stands were packed and the game was cancelled for no reason."
"Excited? "He said today."
"Allen has been expressing his disappointment at ABC's cancellation of the last substitute and he wants to see it come back."
"The last man" is written by Jack Birditt. Allen plays Mike Baxter, the father of three married girls. In a world increasingly dominated by women, he tries to maintain his masculinity



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Port, however, left The Hills after season four to star in her own spin-off, The City, which aired from 2008 to 2010.”
“The 33-year-old former reality star and fashion designer took to Instagram Story on Friday to share a video of herself singing along to the MTV show's theme song, "Unwritten" by Natasha Bedingfield, while her 11-month-old son, Sonny, listens.”
“In the clip, Port is driving in her car and belting out the lyrics, "Feel the rain on your skin, no one else can feel it for you.”
“Only you can let it in.”
“No one else, no one else, can speak the words on your lips."”
“She then takes a moment and tells her baby boy, "Sonny, this is momma's song."”
“The video comes eight years after the reality show, which ran for six seasons, aired its final episode on July 13, 2010.”
“Since then, the Los Angeles native tied the knot with Tim Rosenman in November 2015, and they welcomed their son, Sonny, on July 27, 2017.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"However, Porter left hills at the end of the fourth season to play in her own spin off, city, which was broadcast from 2008 to 2010."
"The 33 year old former reality TV star and fashion designer shared a video on instagram story on Friday in which she sings to the MTV theme song," unwritten, "by Natasha Bedingfield, while Sonny, her 11 month old son, listens to it."
In this video, Porter drives her car and sings the lyrics aloud, "feel the rain fall on your skin, no one can feel it for you."
"Only you can let it in."
"No one, no one can say what you say."
"Then she took a little time to tell her baby boy," Sonny, it's mom's song. “
"Eight years ago, this six season reality show aired its final episode on July 13, 2010."
"Since then, the Los Angeles native married Tim Rosenman in November 2015, and they welcomed Sonny on July 27, 2017."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m so proud of him and what he’s doing, and he’s proud of me.””
““We trust each other, so it’s not like anything would ever worry us.”
“The Bachelorette alums, who met and fell in love on the season 12 finale of the popular ABC reality series, posted touching tributes to mark the milestone occasion.”
“Set to the romantic tune of Brett Eldredge‘s “Drunk on Your Love,” Fletcher, 26, posted a collection of sweet photos highlighting the couple’s love story.”
““One year with you @jrodgers11.”
“I love this crazy, beautiful, ridiculous life we have together,” she wrote, alongside the compilation, which features snaps of the pair from that fateful first meeting to the present.”
“One year with you @jrodgers11 ❤️ I love this crazy, beautiful, ridiculous life we have together  A post shared by JoJo Fletcher (@joelle_fletcher) on May 12, 2017 at 1:16pm PDTRodgers, 28, followed up with an equally passionate post.”
“The SEC Network analyst shared a shot of the couple seaside after getting engaged.”
““One year ago today, and even more my best friend every single day,” he captioned the image.”
“One year ago today, and even more my best friend every single day #1yearanniversary A post shared by Jordan Rodgers (@jrodgers11) on May 12, 2017 at 9:17am PDTThe duo opened up about their relationship backstage at the 2017 iHeart Country Festival in Austin, Texas earlier this month.”


"I'm proud of him and what he's done, and he's proud of me."
"We trust each other, so there's nothing to worry about."
"These single alumni met and fell in love in the last season of ABC's popular reality show series season 12, and they delivered a moving eulogy to commemorate this landmark moment."
Fletcher, 26, has released a series of sweet photos to highlight the love story of the couple, based on the romantic melody in Brett Eldredge's "in love with you"
"One year with you @ jrodgers11."
"I love the crazy, beautiful, ridiculous life we've had together," she wrote, along with a snapshot of the two from their fated first meeting to the present
"One year with you @ jrodgers11 ❤️  I like this crazy, beautiful, ridiculous life, we are together. JOJO Fletcher (@ Joelle / u Fletcher) posted a blog post at pdtrodgers, 28, at 1:16 p.m. on May 12, 2017, followed by an equally passionate blog post. "
"Sec network analysts shared a photo of the couple at the seaside after their engagement."
"Today, a year ago, is my best friend's day," he wrote under the title of the picture
"A year ago today, it's my best friend's first anniversary every day. Jordan Rodgers (@ jrodgers11) posted a post at 9:17 a.m. on May 12, 2017, and they disclosed their relationship in the background of the 2017 iHeart country music festival held in Austin, Texas earlier this month."



**Something goes wrong**
“"That was what the alarm clock was set to."”
“"(It's) the song Adrian and I woke up to every morning the first year we were together," Maines told USA TODAY at the time of release.”
“When Maines released her 2013 solo rock album, Mother, she covered Jeff Buckley's Lover, You Should've Come Over.”
“Maines made headlines with the Dixie Chicks when the band returned to the Country Music Awards last year, singing Daddy Lessons with Beyoncé.”
“Pasdar stars on Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D.”
“They met at Dixie Chicks bandmate Emily Robison Strayer's wedding, where Maines served as a bridesmaid and Pasdar was a groomsman.”
“The couple has been together for 17 years, marrying at the A Little White Wedding Chapel in Las Vegas in 2000.”
“"It's a private family matter," Maines' rep, Cindi Berger, tells USA TODAY.”
“The Dixie Chicks singer, 42, shares two sons, Jackson Slade, 16, and Beckett Finn,13, with Pasdar, 52.”
“Andrea MandellUSA TODAYNatalie Maines has filed for divorce from her husband, actor Adrian Pasdar, USA TODAY has confirmed.”


"That's how the alarm clock is set."
"This song was sung every morning in Adrian's first year with me," Maine told USA today when it was released
"When Maine released her 2013 solo rock album mother, she covered Jeff Barkley's lover. You should come."
Last year, dixie chicks of Maine made headlines by returning to the country music awards and singing "Dad's lesson" with Beyonce
"Pasdar's star in agent s.h.i.e.l.d."
They met at the wedding of Emily Robinson strell, Dixie chicken's accompanist, Maine as bridesmaid and Pasdar as best man
"The couple have been together for 17 years and got married in a White Chapel in Las Vegas in 2000."
"It's a family business," Cindy Berg, a representative from Maine, told USA today
The Dixie chick singer, 42, and Pasdar, 52, have two sons: Jackson Slade, 16, and Beckett Finn, 13
"Andre manderosa today Natalie Maine has filed for divorce, her husband, actor Adrian Pasdar, confirmed in the United States today."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sure, she winkingly features shots of peeled citrus and oysters, but Monae remains as frank about the female form and sexuality as ever, challenging the rest of us to do the same.”
“Janelle Monae/YouTubeTechnically, these should be called “vulva pants.” The word vagina is often used to refer to what is actually called the vulva, which consists of the whole external shebang: the labia, clitoris, vagina (the actual orifice), and urethra.”
“...framing the deep magenta opening blooming between her legs...”
“Subtlety is not welcome here.”
“These are vagina pants.”
“To rule out the possibility that prudish viewers might mistake them for something less primal blossoming flowers perhaps or an avant garde tutu Monae includes a shot of her pal Thor Ragnorok actress Tessa Thompson poking her head out between their lips like a beautiful adult baby popping through the...”
“...birth canal though some have speculated she s the clitoris...”
“In addition to the pants’ unapologetically loud-and-proud celebration of the female form, what makes them such a refreshing statement is the fact that they’re actually quite anatomically accurate.”
“Despite what the porn industry might suggest, vaginas are complicated and multi-layered — just like these pants.”
“In case it wasn't clear, these are vagina pants.”


"Of course, she took pictures of peeled oranges and oysters in the blink of an eye, but Monet was as honest about women's shape and sexual orientation as ever, challenging the rest of us to do the same."
Technically, these should be called "vulva pants.". The term vagina is often used to refer to the vulva, which consists of the entire vulva: the labia, clitoris, vagina (the actual mouth) and urethra
“… In the deep magenta opening between her legs
"Subtlety is not welcome here."
"These are vaginal pants."
"To rule out the possibility that a reserved audience might mistake them for a less primitive flower or avant-garde tutumona, including her friend tol ragnorok, actress Tessa Thompson poking her head between their lips, like a beautiful adult baby from Pop up shots. "
“… Although some people speculate that she is the clitoris... "
"Apart from pants, which celebrate Women's bodies with unapologetic voice and pride, what makes them so refreshing is that they are actually quite anatomically accurate."
"Whatever the sex industry says, vaginas are complex, multi-layered - just like these pants."
"If you don't know, these are vaginal pants."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And we’re all sort of workers among workers and women among women, sort of rolling up our sleeves and doing whatever sort of comes to the forefront.”Says Kennedy about speaking for women without public profiles, “We have to maintain the momentum of this conversation because they can’t.””
“We deserve the same respect.”Ross of ABC’s Black-ish says, “At this moment it’s a campaign.”
“...or not...”
“And I think it s treating people as fellow humans and and it s not because you have a daughter that you respect a woman it s not because you have a wife or a sister it s because we re human beings whether we re related to a man...”
“We’re all humans,” Portman says.”
““We’re humans.”
“But now is not that time.”Witherspoon talks about her own sexual assault at 16 by a director.”
“And certain times that was our only option.”
“In excerpts released by CBS, Witherspoon says about the movement to take on sexual harassment, “There’s moments that you have to evaluate whether silence is going to be your only option.”
“Watch a clip above.”


"We are all workers among workers, women among women. Rolling up our sleeves and doing anything is the most important thing." "We have to keep the momentum of the dialogue because they can't," Kennedy said of speaking for women who don't have public information
"We deserve the same respect," says Ross of ABC's black ISH. "It's a campaign now."
“… Or not... "
"I think this is treating people as compatriots, not because you have a daughter, you respect a woman, not because you have a wife or sister, but because we are human beings, whether we are related to a man or not..."
"We are all human," Portman said
"We are human beings."
"But now is not the time." Witherspoon talked about being sexually assaulted by a director when she was 16
"Sometimes it's our only choice."
In an excerpt released by CBS, Witherspoon talked about the sexual harassment campaign, "sometimes you have to assess whether silence is your only option."
"Look at the clip above."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“﻿”
“Through each storyline pivot, the focus is lost, and it never reclaims any footing it may have had in the first place.”
“Never sticking to a particular type, she has run the gamut in her choice of films from romantic comedies (“The Wedding Planner,” “Maid in Manhattan,” “Monster-in-Law”) to thrillers (“The Cell,” “Anaconda”) to biopics (“El Cantante,” “Selena”) and beyond.”
““Second Act” is her first live-action film since 2015’s “The Boy Next Door,” and it feels like a confused puppy, caught between a stale script and a very confused storyline that frequently loses focus.”
“Maya (Jennifer Lopez) is a big-box store assistant manager who has goals.”
“She wants to wow her boss (Larry Miller) in the hopes of getting a well-deserved promotion to general manager.”
“Instead, he introduces her to the white guy (Dan Bucatinsky) with an Ivy League MBA he hired for the position.”
“Why?”
“Because she isn’t a college grad, and no matter how many years she has put into the store, how loved she is by her co-workers, or how much money she’s made them, no degree means no promotion.”
“Her best friend Joan (Leah Remini) provides a shoulder to cry on while simultaneously pushing her to marry (and have a family with) boyfriend Trey (Milo Ventimiglia), from whom she is hiding a big secret.”


“﻿”
"Through every plot pivot, focus is lost, and it will never regain any foothold it might have at first."
She has chosen all kinds of films, from romantic comedies (wedding planner, Manhattan maid, son-in-law) to thrillers (cell, water Python) to biographical films (EL cantante, Serena) and so on
"Act two is her first live action film since the boy next door in 2015. It feels like a confused dog, sandwiched between a stale script and a very chaotic plot that often loses focus."
"Maya (Jennifer Lopez) is a targeted assistant store manager."
"She wanted to surprise her boss (Larry Miller) and get a well deserved promotion as general manager."
"Instead, he introduced her to a white man (Dan bukatinski), who hired an Ivy League MBA for the position."
"Why?"
"Because she is not a college graduate, no matter how many years she has invested in the store, how much her colleagues love her and how much money she has earned, no degree means no promotion."
"Her best friend Joan (Leah ramini) provides her with a shoulder to lean on. At the same time, she also promotes her to marry (and marry) her boyfriend Trey (MILO ventimilia). She hides a big secret from Trey."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“It’s an emotional curtain call.”Image zoom Credit: Jack Rowand/ABCOnce Upon a Time returns Friday, Oct. 6 at 8 p.m.”
““We’re moving forward past the end of season 6, seeing what happened with Emma and Hook, and how it relates to the events in Hyperion Heights.”
““We will be getting closure on her story in what we feel is a satisfying way.”Image zoom Credit: Jack Rowand/ABC“What we’re not doing is a flashback story where we’re seeing stuff prior to, or during, the previous six seasons,” EP Adam Horowitz adds.”
““We get to find out what has happened with Emma and Hook [Colin O’Donoghue] since our happy ending we showed last year,” executive producer Edward Kitsis tells EW.”
“However, her character, Emma, will return for one episode in season 7, the Hook-centric second outing aptly titled “A Pirate’s Life.” Details surrounding the hour are being kept tightly under wraps.”
“At the close of season 6, Morrison exited the ABC fairy tale drama.”
“Get ready, Once Upon a Time fans: Jennifer Morrison will be reprising her role as Emma Swan for what the OUAT bosses are calling “an emotional curtain call” — and EW has the exclusive first look.”
“Follow the hashtag #50Scoops50Days on Twitter and Instagram to keep up with the latest, and check EW.com/50-Scoops for all the news and surprises.”
“...of your favorite shows...”


"Et on ABC."
"It's a moving curtain call." Image zooming credit: Jack Roland / abcoce returns at 8 p.m. on Friday, October 6, after a while
"We're going to move on at the end of season 6 to see what happened to Emma and hooker and how it relates to the Highbury heights incident."
"We will end her story in a satisfying way." EP Adam Horowitz added: "what we didn't do is a flashback story, we saw something before or during the last six seasons."
Executive producer Edward kittis told the New York Times: "we have to figure out what happened to Emma and hooker (Colin o'donohoe) since last year's happy ending."
However, her character Emma will return in season 7's second episode, life of the pirates, which is a second episode centered on hooker and has the right title. Details of the period are still being kept secret
At the end of season six, Morrison dropped out of ABC's fairytale
"Get ready, former fans: Jennifer Morrison will play the role of Emma Swan again, which ouat's bosses call" emotional curtain call "- ew has an exclusive first look."
"Follow the tags on Twitter and instagram, scoops 50days, get the latest information, and see EW / 50 - all news and surprise exclusives."
“… Your favorite show... "



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Last week, he revealed he was going to therapy after Catelynn returned to rehab to work on overcoming trauma from her childhood.”
““Just know that I love you no matter what,” he told her.”
“...in almost eight weeksTyler Baltierra is loving his health kick and he’s helping out his fans when it comes to starting on the right step.”
“The Teen Mom OG star, 26, tweeted his excitement about losing 30 lbs.”
“...in almost eight weeks.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The cool thing is, I’m actually learning how to cook pretty decent now!”
“Almost been 8 weeks since I made the decision to eat healthier & I’m down about 30lbs & I FEEL GREAT!”
“#Motivated,” he tweeted.”
“When a fan asked what diet he was on he tweeted back I m not really on a diet I just started caring more deeply about what I was putting in my body Image zoom Credit Tyler Baltierra Instagram Baltierra continued with a few health tips on how to eat...”


"Last week, after Caitlin returned to the rehabilitation center to overcome the trauma of his childhood, he revealed that he was going to receive treatment."
"I love you anyway," he told her
"For nearly eight weeks, Taylor baltira has enjoyed his healthy playing and helped his fans take the right step
The 26 year old mother tweeted his excitement about losing 30 pounds
"About eight weeks."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The coolest thing is, I'm really learning how to be decent now!"
"It's almost eight weeks since I decided to eat healthier & I've lost about 30 pounds & I feel great!"
"It's very dynamic," he tweeted
"When a fan asked him if he was on a diet, he replied on twitter that I wasn't really on a diet. I just started to care more about what I put in my body image. Credit card Taylor baltira instagram baltira continued to provide some health tips on how to eat..."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear more in the video below.”
“Being naked is part of what makes us human," Jackson wrote.”
“The 19-year-old model and actress took to Instagram on Friday to share some photos from her visit to a spiritual sanctuary.”
““Bark to skin,” Jackson, the second child and only daughter of late singer Michael Jackson, wrote.”
“WATCH: Paris Jackson Teases Guest Appearance on 'Star,' Wants to 'Show My Acting Capabilities'The Star actress shared multiple photos, including one of her kneeling in front of a large Buddha statue and others of her spiritual relics.”
“WATCH: Paris Jackson Believes Dad Michael Jackson Was Murdered: 'All the Arrows Point to That'This isn’t the first time Jackson has bared it all on social media.”
“In May, she shared another topless photo on Instagram and revealed that she thinks “being naked is part of what makes us human.”"I'll say it again for those questioning what I stand for and how I express myself.”
“Nudity started as a movement for ‘going back to nature’, ‘expressing freedom’, ‘being healthier’ and was even called a philosophy.”
“"For me, it helps me feel more connected to mama gaia.”
“It is who I am and I refuse to shy away and keep my beliefs a secret."”


"Listen to more in the video below."
"Nudity is a part of our being human," Jackson wrote
"The 19-year-old model and actress shared some photos of her visit to the spiritual sanctuary on instagram last Friday."
Jackson, the second and only daughter of the late singer Michael Jackson, wrote
"Observation: Paris Jackson made fun of the guest in starry sky and wanted to" show my acting skills ". The actress shared many photos, one of which was a picture of her kneeling in front of a big Buddha, and some of her spiritual relics.
"Observation: Paris Jackson believes Michael Jackson's father was murdered:" all the arrows point to that. " This is not the first time Jackson has made it public on social media
In May of this year, she shared another photo of nudity on instagram, revealing that she thought "nudity is part of human beings" and "I will say it again to those who question my position and expression."
"The nude movement was originally a movement of" returning to nature "," expressing freedom "," becoming healthier ", and even a kind of philosophy."
"For me, it makes me feel more connected to Gaia's mother."
"I am such a person, I refuse to avoid, and I refuse to keep my faith secret."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s very painful.””
““She’s not inviting me to her own wedding.”
“‘My mother Barbara is not invited,’ ” the 64-year-old said.”
““She’s been saying she’s having her wedding, running around with her family of friends, but you know what she says?”
“Barbara Evans told PEOPLE she has been left off the guest list for her daughter’s upcoming wedding.”
“When the MTV star recently went wedding dress shopping, her mother was noticeably absent.”
“She also has two sons from previous relationships: Jace, 7, with ex Andrew Lewis, and Kaiser, 2, with ex-fiancé Nathan Griffith.”
“The couple announced their engagement in February and revealed their Sept. 23 wedding date this past July with a romantic Instagram photo captioned: “I’m ready to make my life forever with you.”Eason is the father of Evans’ third child, 6-month-old daughter Ensley.”
“The mother of three recently released her memoir Read Between the Lines: From the Diary of a Teenage Mom in which she describes Eason as being “so different from the other men I had been with.”“I finally snagged a good man,” she writes.”
““#WeddingCake #September #SaveTheDate @easondavid88 (excuse my face, no makeup).”In the photo, Evans and Eason sit side-by-side in front of a white platter, which has a variation of cake flavors and frostings for the couple to try.”


"It's very painful."
"She won't invite me to her own wedding."
"My mother Barbara wasn't invited," the 64 year old said
"She kept saying she was going to have a wedding and run around with her friends and family, but do you know what she said?"
"Barbara Evans told people that her daughter was not on the guest list for her upcoming wedding."
"When the MTV star went to buy a wedding dress recently, his mother was obviously absent."
She also has two sons, 7-year-old Jess and former Andrew Lewis, 2-year-old Cather and former fiance Nathan Griffith
The ethans announced their engagement in February and announced their wedding date on September 23 on instagram in July, with the title: "I'm ready to be with you forever." Ethan is the father of Evans' third child, 6-month-old daughter ensley
"The mother of three recently published her memoir, which read between the lines: a diary from a teenage mother, in which she described Ethan as" very different from other men I've been with. " "I finally found a good man," she wrote
"Wedding cake in September# SaveTheDate@easondavid88 (sorry, no makeup) In the photo, Evans and Ethan sit side by side in front of a white plate with a variety of cake flavors and frosts for lovers to taste



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Weinstein intends to … vigorously defend against these unsupported allegations that he strongly denies,” Brafman said.”
“His lawyer Benjamin Brafman said in a statement last week that he was not surprised by the indictment, noting that it “does not add anything to the case we did not already know.”“Mr.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dave Benett/WireImageSandra Bullock.”
“Mr. Weinstein has further confirmed that there were never any acts of retaliation against any women for refusing his advances.”After women began speaking out about their alleged experiences with Weinstein, Bullock said she became “really, really scared” about the consequences these “brave people” might suffer for coming forward.”
“...of non consensual sex are unequivocally denied by Mr Weinstein...”
“When piling on becomes the norm simply because it seems to be the politically correct or fashionable thing to do we all lose including Ms Bullock A spokesperson for Weinstein who has been accused of sexual misconduct by over 60 women previously told PEOPLE in a statement that any allegations...”
“In America, the presumption of ‘innocence’ is supposed to have meaning.”
“Accordingly, with all due respect to Ms Bullock, it is not right for her to take unproven ‘allegations’ and republicize them in an effort to deprive Mr Weinstein of due process and possibly a fair trial that every citizen in this great country is entitled to.”
“Indeed, from a review of her correspondence with Mr. Weinstein, it would appear that she had a warm pleasant relationship with him and even his daughter going back many years.”
“Harvey wanted you to think that.”Weinstein’s attorney Benjamin Brafman responded to the actress’s comments with a statement: “By her own admission, Harvey Weinstein never had an unpleasant interaction with Sandra Bullock.”


"Weinstein is going to To vigorously defend these groundless charges that he firmly denies. "
His lawyer, Benjamin Brafman, said in a statement last week that he was not surprised by the indictment, noting that it "does not add anything to a case we do not yet know about."
"Image scaling credit: Dave Benett / wireimagesandra bullock."
"Mr Weinstein further confirmed that no woman has ever been retaliated for refusing his proposal." After women began talking openly about their so-called experiences with Weinstein, Bullock said she was "really, really afraid" of the consequences of these "brave people" coming forward
“…… Involuntary sex was explicitly denied by Mr. Weinstein... "
"When it becomes the norm just because it seems to be politically correct or fashionable, we all lose the spokesperson for Weinstein, including Ms. bullock, who has been accused of sexual misconduct by more than 60 women, after she told people in a statement that any charges..."
"In the United States, the presumption of innocence should be meaningful."
"Therefore, with respect to Ms. bullock, it is not right for her to accept the unsubstantiated" charges "and to publish them again in an attempt to deprive Mr. Weinstein of due process and the fair trial to which every citizen of this great country is entitled."
In fact, from her letters with Mr. Weinstein, we can see that she has a warm and happy relationship with Mr. Weinstein and even his daughter many years ago
Benjamin Brafman, Weinstein's lawyer, responded to the actress's comments: "Harvey wants you to think so. She admits that Harvey Weinstein has never had an unpleasant relationship with Sandra Bullock."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He made their relationship Instagram-official in late 2016, sharing a photo of the two hitting the slopes in December.”
“Image zoom Allie Silva and Steven McQueen | Credit: Steven McQueen/InstagramPrior to getting engaged, the couple had been dating for over a year.”
“The last photo of McQueen on Silva’s account dates back to Jan. 1.”
“Silva reposted the photo on her own Instagram account, gushing, “My best friend, love of my life…YES, yes yes a million times over.”Both posts have since been deleted.”
““She said yes,” he captioned the post.”
“...glimpse at her new engagement ring...”
“Image zoom Allie Silva and Steven McQueen Credit Joe Scarnici Getty The actor who is named after his grandfather famed screen star Steve McQueen announced the news of his engagement Jan 25 on Instagram sharing a photo of himself holding hands while sharing a kiss with Silva giving fans a...”
““Whatever comes up.”PEOPLE has reached out to a rep for McQueen for further comment.”
““If I’m stressed I like anything from hiking with my dogs to boxing,” he said.”
““It happened.”McQueen, 29, told the magazine that instead of dating, he’s enjoying “me time” for now.”


"At the end of 2016, he officially exposed their relationship on instagram, sharing photos of the two climbing in December."
"Zooming in and out of pictures: Ellie Silva and Steven McQueen | source: Steven McQueen / instagram the couple had been dating for more than a year before they got engaged."
"The last photo of McQueen on Silva's account dates back to January 1."
Silva reprinted the photo on his instagram account, gushing: "my best friend, the love of my life Yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, these two posts have been deleted. "
"She agreed," he wrote under the title of the post
“… Look at her new engagement ring... "
"On January 25, Ellie Silva and Stephen McQueen announced their engagement on instagram, shared a picture of themselves holding hands, and kissed Silva to give fans a..."
"Whatever happens." A representative of McQueen has been contacted for further comment
"If I have pressure, I like everything from hiking with a dog to boxing," he said
"It happened." McQueen, 29, told the magazine that he was not dating, but enjoying "my time."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“*With reporting by Emily Marcus.”
“ET.”
““People associate [the Fantasy Suite] with sex every time, because you’re finally alone for the first time … It was just important to be alone and get to know each other better.”The Bachelor Winter Games finale airs on ABC Thursday at 8 p.m.”
“I just was enjoying her company, getting to know her,” Kevin, 33, told Us.”
“There were so many other things going on with her that I liked that it wasn’t the label of ‘virginity’ that took away my thought of her.”
““I didn’t think about it twice when she told me.”
“While the 29-year-old journalist told the world she was a virgin when she joined the franchise during Chris Soules’ season, Kevin didn’t feel pressure or uncomfortable about that at all.”
“Another huge topic of conversation during the finale will be the infamous fantasy suite dates, and if Ashley Iaconetti will go with Kevin Wendt.”
“So did he propose?”
“There’s also a gorgeous Neil Lane ring shown in the promo!”


"* Emily Marcus."
"Wait a minute."
"People associate (dream suite) with sex every time, because you're finally alone for the first time It's important to be alone and to get to know each other better. " The singles Winter Olympics final will be broadcast on ABC at 8 p.m. on Thursday
"I just like being with her and getting to know her," Kevin, 33, told us
"There are many other things about her, which I like very much. The label of" virgin "does not take away my missing for her."
"When she told me, I didn't think twice."
"Although the 29 year old told the world that she was still a virgin when she joined the team in Chris sours' season, Kevin didn't feel any pressure or uneasiness about it
"Another big topic in the ending is the infamous dream suite date, if Ashley aconetti goes with Kevin winter."
"Did he propose?"
"The promo also shows a gorgeous Neil Lane ring!"



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“And well, he's not entirely wrong...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“There were plenty of Heavenly Bodies at last night's Met Gala, but there was no divine intervention quite like Nicki Minaj and Cardi B joining forces and hanging out inside the event.”
“After months and months of feud rumors and alleged shade, the female rappers shared a moment (and even snapped a few selfies) at last night's fashion event.”
“Inside the Met, the two were photographed mid-conversation as Moschino designer Jeremy Scott (who was Cardi B's date) watched on like a proud dad.”
“You can practically hear Cardi saying, "okurrrrrt?"”
“...through this photo:Getty ImagesLater in the night, Nicki and Cardi even posed together for a group selfie.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Well, he's not completely wrong..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"There were a lot of celestial bodies at the metropolitan party last night, but there were no gods like Nikki Minagi and Katie B. they were hanging out together in the event."
"After months of discord and so-called gloom, these female rappers shared a moment (and even took a few selfies) at last night's fashion event."
"In Metropolitan Park, the two were photographed talking, and MOSCHINO designer Jeremy Scott (who is the date of Katie b) was watching like a proud father."
You can almost hear caddy say, "okay?"
“… In the evening, Nicky and Katie even took a group photo of themselves
"This content was imported from twitter."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“George is sedated and should recover in a few days."”
“Ella, Alexander and Amal are all healthy, happy and doing fine.”
“Their witty statement, issued through their spokesman, Stan Rosenfield, on June 6, said, "This morning Amal and George welcomed Ella and Alexander Clooney into their lives.”
“The couple just celebrated the birth of their twins in June.”
“George and Amal Clooney established the Clooney Foundation for Justice last year to support equity in courtrooms, classrooms and communities around the world.”
“A UNICEF spokesman described the couple's support as "investing the future of the entire region."”
“"Our goal with this initiative is to help provide Syrian refugee children with an education and put them on a path to be the future leaders their generation desperately needs."”
“"They have been victims of geography and circumstance, but that doesn't mean there isn't hope," the couple wrote in a statement provided to The AP.”
“George Clooney and his wife, British human-rights lawyer Amal Alamuddin Clooney, who was born in Lebanon, said in a statement Monday that the foundation's commitment of more than $2 million toward education for Syrian refugees aims to prevent thousands of young people from becoming "a lost generation."”
“The Clooney Foundation for Justice announced a new partnership Monday with Google, HP and UNICEF to provide education for more than 3,000 refugee children in Lebanon.”


"George's on a sedative and he'll be fine in a few days."
"Ella, Alexander and Amar are healthy, happy and doing well."
"This morning, Amar and George Welcome Ella and Alexandre Clooney into their lives," they said in a witty statement issued by spokesman Stan Rosenfield on June 6
"The couple just celebrated the birth of twins in June."
George and Amar Clooney founded the Clooney justice foundation last year to support justice in courts, classrooms and communities around the world
A spokesman for the United Nations Children's fund described the couple's support as "investing in the future of the entire region."
"The goal of this initiative is to help Syrian refugee children receive education and set them on the path of becoming the future leaders that their generation urgently needs."
"They have been victims of geography and environment, but that doesn't mean there is no hope," the couple wrote in a statement provided to the associated press
George Clooney and his wife, British human rights lawyer Amal alamuddin Clooney, born in Lebanon, said in a statement Monday that the foundation has pledged more than $2 million in education for Syrian refugees, aimed at preventing thousands of young people from becoming "lost generation.".
On Monday, the Clooney justice foundation announced a new partnership with Google, HP and the United Nations Children's fund to educate more than 3000 refugee children in Lebanon



**Something goes wrong**
“For the latest TV news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast “Watch With Us” below...”
“ET.”
“During the Monday July 2, episode of Million Dollar Listing New York, the real estate guru takes on the task of selling the rapper’s lavish mansion.”
“After taking a tour of the 50,000 square foot home, which includes 52 rooms, Fredrik hopes to put it on the market.”
““We feel a little nervous, in a good way.”
“We have some really good news,” Fredrik tells the 42-year-old Power star in Us Weekly’s exclusive sneak peek of the episode.”
““Remember the offer?”
“They were in the high threes.”
“We got them up to $4.2 million for the house.”
“All cash, closing in 30 days.”


"For the latest TV news and interviews, please subscribe to our new podcast" watch with us... "
"Wait a minute."
"On Monday, July 2, in the million dollar listing in New York, the real estate guru took on the task of selling the rap singer's luxury mansion."
"After visiting the 50000 square foot home, which includes 52 rooms, Frederick hopes to bring it to market."
"We feel a little nervous, good."
"We have some very good news," Frederick told the 42 year old power star in the US weekly exclusive peek at the episode
"Remember that proposal?"
"They are in senior three."
"We gave them a house of up to $4.2 million."
All in cash, 30 days later



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I love you girl.”
“Wanted to share this with the world and show them what true beauty looks like.”
“I’m a part of that family now.”
““I vow to be a little stronger everyday for her because that’s what she would have wanted, I vow to be stronger for anyone who’s lost somebody to cancer.”
“The songstress vowed to be a voice for cancer patients.”
“I’m in shock that I won’t see her again until I pass too,” Gaga, 31, wrote of Durham, who managed the behind-the-scenes of Gaga’s famous Super Bowl performance in February.”
“I know that’s not true, and I know that I have those memories forever, I’m just in shock that I will never have new ones with her.”
“Like someone took her from us, and with that taking took all the good times.”
“The other feeling I have is that of being robbed of the last 10 years of my life, friendship and career with her.”
“She made that ok.”


"I love you, girl."
"I want to share this with the world and show them what real beauty is."
"I'm part of that family now."
"I swear to be strong for her every day, because that's what she wants. I swear to be strong for anyone who dies of cancer."
"The singer vowed to be a spokesperson for cancer patients."
"I'm shocked," Gaga, 31, wrote of Durham. "I won't see her again until I die." Durham is behind Gaga's famous super bowl performance in February
"I know it's not true. I know I'll always have those memories. I'm just shocked that I'll never have new memories with her."
"It's like someone took her away from us, taking away all the good times."
"My other feeling is that the last 10 years of my life, friendship and career with her have been deprived."
"She did a good job."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Last week, the 36-year-old heiress nearly broke the internet when she posted a photo of her channeling the 37-year-old reality star's style in promotion of Kanye West's Yeezy Season 6 clothing line.”
“They called me and said that Kanye wanted me to be a part of the the Yeezy campaign and then they came and got me ready Paris recalled to ET s Keltie Knight while at the Rachel Zoe Fall 2018 fashion show and Spring 2018 Box of Style celebration in...”
“West Hollywood California at the Jeremy Hotel...”
“"I looked in the mirror and I'm like, 'Oh my god!”
“I look like a Kim clone!'"”
“The Simple Life star added that it was a "really cool" experience.”
“"I thought it was awesome that there were so many girls that did it," she said, noting that the brand enlisted several women to channel Kim.”
“"I love the line, it's very sexy."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Last week, the 36 year old heiress launched Kanye West's yeezy Season 6 collection with a photo of her grooming the 37 year old reality TV star, which nearly exploded on the Internet."
"They called me and said Kanye wanted me to be part of the yeezy event, and then they came to get me ready, and Paris paid tribute to ETS Keltie Knight at Rachel Zoe's fall 2018 fashion show and spring 2018 fashion gift box celebration..."
"Jeremy Hotel, California, West Hollywood..."
"I looked in the mirror and I thought, 'my God
"I look like a clone!"
The simple life star added that it was a "very cool" experience
"I think it's great to have so many girls doing this," she said, noting that the brand has recruited several women to promote Kim
"I love that line. It's sexy."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Revisit the video for “Chun-Li”:”
“She also recently appeared on Saturday Night Live, though it wasn’t without controversy.”
“Thus far, she’s teased the LP with two singles, “Barbie Tingz” and “Chun-Li”.”
“Queen is Minaj’s fourth album overall, serving as the follow-up to 2014’s The Pinkprint.”
““I can’t give y’all half-ass shit, I just refuse to.”While fans have to wait an extra two months, Minaj said she has a few reveals planned in the coming weeks, including the album artwork.”
“...her part...”
“I love my label but I m happy that I ve always been blessed to have the freedom and creativity to do what I want how I want it when I want Trust me it s the better choice Minaj continued adding that the delay was due to perfectionism on...”
““The label wanted me to put my album since 10,000 years ago, of course,” Minaj said (via SPIN).”
“The rapper made the announcement during an Instagram live stream today.”
“Originally set for June 15th, it’s now been delayed until August 10th.”


"Review the video of Chunli":
"She recently appeared on Saturday night live, but it's not without controversy."
So far, she has teased the record company with two singles, Barbie dinghy and Chunli
"Queen is Minaj's fourth album, a follow-up to pinkprint in 2014."
"I can't give you half ass shit, I just refused." Although fans will have to wait another two months, Minagi said she plans to hold several public concerts in the coming weeks, including the album's artwork
“… Her role... "
"I like my label, but I'm glad I've always been blessed with the freedom and creativity to do what I want to do, when I want to believe me, it's a better choice," he continued, adding that the delay is due to perfectionism for... "
"Of course, the record companies want me to put in an album from 10000 years ago," Minaj said (via spin)
"The rapper announced this on instagram live today."
"It was originally set for June 15, but now it's postponed to August 10."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Highly-anticipated: Nicole stars alongside Lucas, Russell Crowe, and Joel Edgerton in Boy Erased—premiering November 2”
“Kidman plays Jared's mother, who comes to accept her son despite her husband's religious viewpoints.”
“We hiked down, the girls and I, and we released it into the brush.”
“But we did release it.”
“When I first put the glass over it, it tipped it over, and then I put it over again and caught it.”
“I couldn’t believe the power.”
“'We got lucky': She also opened up about Meryl Streep joining the cast of Big Little Lies revealing that the Oscar-winning actress signed on to the project without even reading a script'It was so strong, that spider.”
“Keith was giggling so I’m like, ‘Okay, I have to show that we’re strong.”
“She explained: 'My kids saw it and screamed, and I went out.”
“Nicole also detailed a frightening encounter her family had over the summer with a tarantula at their Los Angeles home.”


"Much anticipated: Nicole and Lucas, Russell Crowe and Joel edeton starring in" the boy is erased "premiered on November 2"
"Kidman plays Jared's mother, who accepts her son regardless of her husband's religious views."
"We come down, girls and me, we put it in the bush."
"But we did."
"The first time I put the glass on it, it turned it over, and then I put it over and grabbed it."
"I can't believe the power."
"We're lucky: she also made it public that Meryl Streep joined the big little lies crew, revealing that the Oscar winning actress signed the project without even reading the script." it's so powerful, that spider. "
"Keith was giggling, so I thought," well, I have to prove we're strong. "
"She explained: 'my child saw it and screamed, and I went out."
"Nicole also details a terrible encounter with her family at their home in Los Angeles in the summer with a tarantula."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the full battle below.”
“"You made fun of Peter Rabbit and my work on Carpool.”
“The war of words was so incredible, it might even be the best "Drop The Mic" duel to date -- and it wasn't even on TBS, but on "The Late Late Show."”
“(If you didn't know "Drop the Mic" was created by Corden, as it's based on the popular segment on his show.)”
“Kutcher and the late-night host spit witty rhymes back and forth, tackling topics like Kutcher's movies, Corden's weight, and even took a jab at Kutcher's relationship with his wife, Mila Kunis.”
“Corden started it off, bringing the heat.”
“"You do great charity work year after year," the host said.”
“"Why don't you save something from dying?”
“Why don't you start with your career?"”
“Kutcher was ready to hit back, poking fun at Corden's "Carpool Karaoke" and his film "Peter Rabbit."”


"Look at the whole battle below."
"You're joking about Peter Rabbit and my carpooling job."
"This battle of words is incredible. It may even be the best 'put down the microphone' duel to date - and it's not even on TBS, it's on the 'evening show.'"
(if you didn't know that "put down the microphone" was written by cordon, because it's based on popular clips from his show.)
"Kutcher and the late night hosts came back to talk about Kutcher's movies, the weight of cordon and other topics, and even attacked the relationship between Kutcher and his wife Mira Kunis."
"Cordon started it and brought the heat."
"You do great charity work year after year," the host said
"Why don't you help the wounded?" "
"Why don't you start with your career?"
Kutcher is ready to fight back, joking with Corden's "carpool karaoke" and his movie "Peter Rabbit"



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’m a little Libertarian, I’m a lot liberal, mostly progressive, but I have this amazing ability to be able to take really complicated policy and break it down into edible sound bites, which is something most progressive liberals cannot do,” she said.”
“Ok, so it’s ON!!!”
“...actress Diane Neal says.”
“Story highlights Diane Neal announced her candidacy Tuesday on Twitter Neal says service to the country is in her blood(CNN) —Diane Neal knows her way around a fictitious courtroom and now she wants to be a lawmaker.”
“Neal, who played Assistant District Attorney Casey Novak on “Law & Order: Special Victims Unit,” has announced that she is making an independent run for New York’s 19th Congressional District seat.”
““Ok, so it’s ON!!!”
“But I’m doing with nearly no staff, no donations (yet), with no party,” Neal tweeted Tuesday.”
““Website will be up later today (fingers crossed) and all ready to go.”Neal, 41, who also had roles in other hit shows including “NCIS” and “Suits,” said her “goal is bigger than (political) parties.”“Goal is no negativity,” she added.”
““Goal is HIGH ROAD all the way.”MORNING!”
“But I’m doing with nearly no staff, no donations (yet), with no party.”


"I'm a bit liberal, I'm free, mostly progressive, but I have this amazing ability to take very complex policies and break them down into edible sound clips that most progressive liberals can't do," she said
"Well, that's it!"
"Actress Diane Neal said
"Diane Neal announced her candidacy on twitter on Tuesday, and Neal said it was her blood to serve the country (CNN) - Diane Neal knows her way around a fictional court, and now she wants to be a legislator."
Neil, who plays assistant district attorney Casey Nowak in law and order: the special victims group, announced that she would run for the 19th congressional district seat in New York independently
"Well, that's it!"
"But now I have few employees, no donations, no parties," Neil tweeted on Tuesday
"The site will be online later today (pray for success) and everything is ready." "Her goals are more important than the [political] party," says Neil, 41, who has also appeared in hit shows such as "NCIS" and "suit." "Goals are not negative," she added
"The goal is all the way." Good morning
"But now I have few employees, no donations, no parties."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of it so that he could produce his own...”
“Ferrell was very fortunate to be surrounded by a lot of good company during his run as a cast member and because everybody played so well off of each other that could explain why Ferrell excelled so much everybody else was giving off the energy Ferrell was practically feasting off...”
“...reached overkill by the time he eventually left in 2009 save for a few sporadic cameos here and there over the years and then ultimately permanently filling in for Don Pardo in 2014 because remember Pardo can never truly be Replaced...”
“But the point is that among those who can be considered Glue or Utility or Swiss Army type cast members Hammond probably deserves a little more recognition for his efforts these days or at least more recognition for his first 7 years on the show anything he did after that...”
“...be phrasing this better...”
“Up until Kenan Thompson he was the longest serving cast member ever you can t deny that wherever there was a hole that needed to be filled on the show especially that of the Middle aged variety Hammond was there to plug it up and yes I realize I could...”
“Our first award is… Performer (Cast member) of the year: Bronze Doumanian: Daryll HammondSilver Ebersol: Jimmy FallonGolden Lorne: WILL FERRELLDARRELL HAMMOND: Now HERE’S Somebody I should’ve spoken about at great lengths by now.”
“Where we cheer for the favorites, and piss on the rest.”
“So with that…ANNOUNCER: From Television city in Hollywood, it’s the “Golden Lorne Awards” And now, ladies and gentlemen… “THE DOC!” Thank you, welcome to the “Golden Lorne Awards”!”
“Also, this was the year—as an episode reviewer—where I started to get a little “Gimmicky” with what I wrote…still didn’t quite reach maturity as of yet, but at least it’s not as vague as the previous two “SNLenium” pieces.”


“… So he can produce his own... "
"Ferrer is very lucky. When he was an actor, there were many excellent companies around him, because everyone's performance was excellent, which can explain why Ferrer's performance is so excellent, and other people are releasing the energy that Ferrer is actually eating and drinking..."
“… He was overkill when he left in 2009, except for occasional guest roles here and there for a few years, and then replaced old man PADO permanently in 2014, because remember that PADO will never be really replaced... "
"But the point is that among those actors who can be considered glue, utility or Swiss Army type, Hammond's efforts these days may deserve more recognition, or at least in his first seven years in the play, everything he has done since then deserves more recognition..."
“… In more appropriate terms... "
"Before Kennan Thompson, he was the longest serving actor in history. You can't deny that as long as there are loopholes in the program that need to be filled, especially the loopholes of middle-aged variety actor Hammond, they will be filled there. Yes, I realize that I can..."
"Our first prize is Performer of the year (actor): Bronze dumanian: Daryl Hammond, silver ebersoll: Jimmy Fallon, Gordon Lorne: will Ferrer Daryl Hammond: now I should talk about this man. "
"There we cheer for the most popular people and pee on others."
"With this Announcer: from the TV city of Hollywood, it's the golden Ron award. Now, ladies and gentlemen... " doctor! "Thank you. Welcome to the golden Ron awards!"
"Moreover, this year, as a drama commentator, I began to have a little 'gimmick' about what I wrote So far, it's not fully mature, but at least it's not as vague as the first two "snlenium."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If Snoop’s not around, at least Stewart had a convenient portrait to stand in for him.”
“And what better way to advertise it than by crashing an art show and flipping the bird at the president?”
“...s 2017 MTV Movie TV Awards...”
“Stewart shared a more safe for work version of the photo on her own Instagram account as well as an announcement about her show with Snoop on VH1 So that s twenty more episodes of Martha and Snoop s Potluck Dinner Party plus the two will be appearing at Sunday...”
“Neither Stewart nor Snoop is a big fan of Trump, the former voicing her support for Hillary Clinton throughout last year’s campaign, and the latter having just released a music video featuring himself “shooting” a clown dressed as Trump.”
“The photo, first spotted by The Cut, quickly went viral, with more than 3,000 likes on the original photo at time of writing.”
“...the other...”
“While attending Andres Serrano s show at Frieze New York a guest was about to snap a photo of portraits of Donald Trump and Snoop Dogg hanging side by side when who should show up but Martha Stewart armed with the bird in one hand and a peace sign in...”
“It’s not every day that, while taking a photo of two celebrities, another sneaks their way into it.”


"If snoop is not here, at least Stuart has a convenient portrait to replace him."
"What better way to publicize than crashing an art exhibition and throwing birds at the president?"
“… S 2017 MTV Awards... "
"Stewart shared a more secure working photo on his instagram account, and announced her show with snoop on VH1, so that Martha and snoop's luncheon party, together with these two episodes, will appear on Sunday..."
"Neither Stewart nor snoop is a big fan of trump. The former supported Hillary Clinton throughout last year's campaign. The latter just released a music video about" shooting "a clown dressed as trump himself."
"This photo was first cut out and quickly became popular. By the time of publication, more than 3000 people liked the original photo."
“… Another... "
"At the Andres Serrano exhibition in Fritz, New York, a guest was preparing to take a portrait of Donald Trump and Snoop Dogg hanging side by side. Who should show up, but Martha Stewart had a bird in one hand, and a sign of peace appeared..."
"It's not every day that two celebrities are photographed while the other sneaks in."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“40+ pictures inside of Prince William and Kate Middleton with their kids…”
“FYI: Kate is wearing an Alexander McQueen dress and a Juliette Botterill hat.”
“Make sure to check out photos of Kate making her debut in the parade back in 2011!”
“Queen Elizabeth was in a carriage next to the heirs to the throne.”
“Kate rode in the parade in a carriage with her mother-in-law Duchess Camilla while William rode on horseback alongside his dad Prince Charles.”
“The little girl in the pink dress is Savannah Phillips, who is the daughter of Will‘s cousin Peter Phillips.”
“The royal couple was joined by their kids Prince George, 4, and Princess Charlotte, 2, while their newborn son Prince Louis stayed at home this time.”
“Kate Middleton and Prince William stand on the balcony of Buckingham Palace during the Trooping the Colour ceremony on Saturday (June 9) in London, England.”


"More than 40 pictures of Prince William and Kate Middleton with their children..."
"For reference only: Kate is wearing Alexander McQueen's skirt and Juliette Botterill's hat."
"Make sure to see Kate's first appearance at the parade in 2011!"
"Queen Elizabeth is in the carriage next to the heir to the throne."
"Kate and her mother-in-law, Duchess of Camilla, took part in the parade in a carriage, while William rode side by side with his father, Prince Charles."
"The little girl in the pink dress is Savannah Phillips, the daughter of will's cousin Peter Phillips."
The royal couple have 4-year-old Prince George and 2-year-old Princess Charlotte, and their new born son Prince Louis is staying at home this time
Kate Middleton and Prince William stand on the balcony during a rehearsal ceremony at Buckingham Palace in London, England, Saturday (June 9)



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She isn't making any huge plans for the future."”
“"For being so young, she is very chilled out about her relationship with Travis.”
“File Photo by John Angelillo/UPI | License PhotoFeb. 16 (UPI) -- New parents Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott cozied up in a photo Thursday.”
“The 20-year-old reality star and 25-year-old rapper got close in their first picture together since welcoming daughter Stormi this month.”
“AdvertisementScott shared a photo on Snapchat of himself and Jenner leaning in for the camera.”
“The pair both wear medical masks over their mouths in the picture.”
“"Bdjxjkdn," Scott captioned the post.”
“Jenner announced last week that she gave birth to a baby girl Feb. 1.”
“E!”
“News reported Jenner and Scott, who were first linked in April 2017, have grown closer since becoming parents.”


"She has no big plans for the future."
"Because she is so young, she feels very cold about her relationship with Travis."
"File photo by John angelillo / UPI | license photo February. Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott, their new parents, took a picture on Thursday
"The 20-year-old reality TV star and the 25-year-old rapper got very close in their first group photo after welcoming their daughter, Tommy, this month."
"Scott shared a picture of him and Jenna leaning in front of the camera on snapchat."
"Both of them are wearing medical masks."
"Bdjxjkdn," Scott wrote under the title of the post
"Jenna announced last week that she gave birth to a baby girl on February 1."
“E！”
"According to the news report, Jenna and Scott first contacted in April 2017, and their relationship has become closer and closer since they became parents."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Rachelle Lewisadvertising...”
“When she is not writing she enjoys spending time with her corgi Milo, watching and going to the movies or binge-watching TV, as well as spending time with her family and friends.”
“The This Is Us star is currently on tour to promote her memoir This Is Me: Loving The Person You Are Today.”
“E!”
“News caught up with Metz, who talked about overcoming childhood abuse, learning to forgive those who hurt her and most of learning to love herself.”
“The last two go hand in hand as she realized in order to have self-love she must not only forgive those who hurt her, like her stepfather but she also must forgive her self.”
“I put it down for one second!”
“@ChrissyMetz: tell your story, sing your song.”
“Your positivity and inspiration is something we could all use a little more of these days.”
“Honored to write for you, prouder to be your friend.”


"More from Rachel Lewis..."
"When she doesn't write, she likes to stay with her kirkimilo, watch movies or TV, and with her family and friends."
"This is an American star currently touring to promote her memoir" this is me: love you as you are today. "
“E！”
"This news interview with Metz, she talked about overcoming childhood abuse, learning to forgive those who hurt her, and learning to love herself most of the time."
She realized that in order to have self love, she had to forgive not only those who hurt her, such as her stepfather, but also herself
"I'll put it down for a second!"
@Chrissy Metz: tell your story, sing your song
"Your enthusiasm and inspiration is something we can all use now."
"It's a great honor to write for you and be proud to be your friend."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thank you, God!”Of course, it helps that Moonlight deserved the award a lot more, too.”
“I was free!”
“...it I lit a cigar and drank a glass of scotch and celebrated...”
“Yeah OK I had to live that down Oh how could he That s a bonehead Nobody s ever done that in the history of Miss Universe But the Oscars is the biggest night in Hollywood and when they did...”
“"I was finally off the hook.”
“...to celebrate...”
“When Horowitz walked out there and snatched that card out of Warren s hand that s when I knew redemption was mine He says it freed him from the burden of that night and that it was cause for him...”
““I was watching live and I probably knew what had happened before anybody else — ‘cause I saw the panic-stricken look on the producer’s face," he explained.”
“Steve Harvey turns up for a quick comment, too, detailing why he couldn't be happier to see a flub bigger than the mistake he made when he crowned the wrong Miss Universe winner in 2015.”
“The Hollywood Reporter talked to a lot of the people that got caught up in the mess of that night, including host Jimmy Kimmel, La La Land producer Jordan Horowitz, and Mara Buxbaum from Moonlight distributor A24.”


"Thank you, God! "Of course, it helps that moonlight is more worthy of the prize."
"I'm free!"
“…… I lit a cigar and drank a scotch to celebrate... "
"Yes, well, I have to survive. Oh, how can he be a fool? No one has ever done that in the history of Miss Universe, but Oscar is the biggest night in Hollywood when they do..."
"I'm finally out of trouble."
“… To celebrate... "
"When Horowitz went out and took the card from Warren, I knew that salvation was mine, and he said that it freed him from the burden of that night, and that's why he..."
"I was watching live at the time, and I probably knew what was going on earlier than anyone else - because I saw the horror look on the producer's face," he explained
"Steve Harvey also made a brief comment detailing why he was not happier to see a bigger mistake than he made when he crowned the wrong Miss Universe champion in 2015."
"The Hollywood reporter interviewed a lot of people who were involved in the night's chaos, including host Jimmy Kimmel, Los Angeles land producer Jordan Horowitz and moonlight publisher A24's Mara Buxbaum."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Crew Bag Is On Sale for Under $100 Right Now...”
“VIDEO: Meghan Markle’s J.”
“The Duchess of Sussex owns several dreamy bags, but there are five standouts that you certainly won't regret investing in (and one of them is only $175).”
“And today, Meghan Markle's consistently introducing us to elegant staples that won't go out of style, especially when it comes to her impeccable handbag collection.”
“Princess Diana, for example, wore some of 2018's biggest trends more than twenty years ago.”
“At InStyle, we like to look to the Royals for classic fashion inspiration.”
“To ensure that I only buy pieces I'll truly use and love, I try to stick to this shopping trick: Find a celebrity whose style is undeniably timeless, and take clues from her.”
“If I'm going to drop a ton of money on something, I don't want to end up bored of it or embarrassed to carry it a few seasons from now.”
“I can't be the only one who hesitates when buying an investment bag.”


"Crew bags are now selling for less than $100..."
"Video: Megan Marcel's J."
"The Duchess of Sussex has several dream bags, but there are five special bags you will not regret investing in (one of which is only $175),"
"And today, Megan markel is constantly introducing us to elegant staples, which will never be out of date, especially when it comes to her impeccable collection of handbags."
"For example, Princess Diana wore some of the most popular clothes of 2018 more than 20 years ago."
"In InStyle, we like to look to the royal family for classic fashion inspiration."
"To make sure I only buy what I really like and like, I try to stick to this shopping technique: find a celebrity whose style is undeniably eternal and get clues from her."
"If I'm going to spend a lot of money on something, I don't want to end up tired of it or carry it awkwardly after a few seasons."
"I can't be the only one who hesitates when buying an investment package."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Leighton Meester Shares Her Favorite Blair Waldorf Moment This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“EXCLUSIVE: 'Gossip Girl' Turns 10!”
“MORE: Jennifer Lawrence Recalls Her Hilarious Bar Fight With a FanWatch the video below for more.”
“"I mean, I personally just had an amazing time shooting in New York on the streets."”
“There were so many awesome locations," she said, reflecting on her time playing Blair Waldorf.”
““Oh my God!”
“Earlier this summer, ET spoke to Gossip Girl star Leighton Meester, who reminisced about her time on the show.”
“RELATED: 11 Things We Learned From the 'Gossip Girl' Cast on Their 10-Year AnniversaryThe revelation comes as Gossip Girl is celebrating its 10-year anniversary since the 2007 premiere.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Leighton Meester shared her favorite Blair Waldorf moment, because we couldn't load the sponsor's message, so this video isn't available."
Exclusive: gossip girl is 10 years old
"More information: Jennifer Lawrence recalls her funny fight with her fans in the bar. Watch the video below for more information."
"I mean, I personally just had a great time shooting on the streets of New York."
"There are so many great places," she said, recalling her time as Blair Waldorf
"My God
Earlier this summer, et interviewed gossip girl star Leighton Meister, who recalled her time in the show
"Related reports: 11 things we learned from the 10th anniversary of gossip girl's cast came to light as gossip girl celebrates its 10th anniversary of its premiere in 2007."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’re also very excited about her future and we can’t wait to hear her new music.”
“The singer drew inspiration from her personal experiences related to Lyme disease in 2015 and her divorce from Nickleback frontman Chad Kroeger.”
“Now, after more than two years after the star went public with her Lyme disease diagnosis, a source talks about her health, music career and her personal life.”
“‘Avril is in a really good place right now,’ the insider shares.”
“‘Her recovery has been going well, and she’s been getting stronger and stronger.”
“She has more energy and has even been exercising Great being able to find slimsecrets when I m traveling busy working it s key to have healthy tasty snacks on hand slimsecrets ad A post shared by Avril Lavigne avrillavigne on Jun 9 2017 at 2 00pm PDT This chronic...”
“...condition left her bedridden for five months and sidelined her professional activity until last December when she announced her sixth studio album...”
“The good news is that the new music from the singer is now closer than ever.”
“It looks like she will release new music by the end of this year, because the process was a bit slow due to all of her problems, according to the source.”
“‘She writes her own material, and she’s been through a lot with her marriage and her illness,’ the insider explains.”


"We are also very excited about her future. We can't wait to hear her new music."
"The singer was inspired by her personal experience with Lyme disease in 2015 and her divorce from Richard Kroger, the lead singer of Nickelback."
"Now, more than two years after the star made her diagnosis public, a source talked about her health, her music career and her personal life."
"Avril is in a very good position now," the person familiar with the matter said
"She's recovering well and getting stronger and stronger."
"She has more energy and even exercises all the time. When I am busy working on a business trip, it is the key to find the secret recipe for weight loss. I have a healthy and delicious snack on hand. The secret recipe for weight loss is Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril Avril At 2:00 p.m. Pacific time on June 9, 1999... "
“… She was bedridden for five months and quit her career until last December, when she announced her sixth studio album
"The good news is that the singer's new music is now closer than ever."
"According to the source, it seems that she will release new music by the end of this year, because the process is a bit slow due to all her problems."
"She wrote her own material, and she's been through a lot of marriage and illness," the person explained



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Josh, 29, has kept a low profile after returning home from rehab following two following a series of personal crises in 2015.”
“Beauty comes from ashes and we cannot wait to see and kiss the face of this sweet new boy!” Josh and Anna signed the post.”
“Anna Duggar, who is married to husband Josh, gave birth to her fifth child — son Mason Garrett — on Tuesday, the Duggars revealed on their family blog.”
“He weighed in at 9 lbs., 1 oz.”
“...and is 22 in.”
“...long.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are so thankful and happy to announce the arrival of our new son, Mason Garrett Duggar.”
“Both he and Anna are doing well.”
“He arrived today without complication and we already adore him.”


"Josh, 29, went home from rehab twice after a series of personal crises in 2015 and has kept a low profile ever since."
"Beauty comes from ashes, and we can't wait to see and kiss this lovely new boy's face! "Josh and Anna signed it."
"Anna dagger married her husband Josh and gave birth to her fifth child, Mason Garrett, on Tuesday," the daggers revealed on their family blog
"He weighs nine pounds an ounce."
“… 22 inches. "
“… It's a long time. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We are very grateful and happy to announce the arrival of our new son, Mason Garrett dagger."
"He and Anna are fine."
"He's here today. We adore him already."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That’s my only point.”Philipps currently plays Gale Liptrapp in HBO’s Vice Principals and last year made appearances on New Girl and Angie Tribeca.”
“However, she noted in the video that she likely wouldn’t promote a product that she deemed “random and weird” — “Unless it was, like, a billion dollars.”“I’m gonna sell things,” she continued.”
“And I’m doing one next week, I think, that feels like me.”Busy Philipps Describes Her ‘Freaking Creepy’ Uber ScareThe mother-of-two‘s Instagram account has several posts promoting the arts and crafts retail chain along with Campbell’s Soup and more.”
““I just only choose things that I genuinely like and, like, would want to partner with, like, for instance, my Michaels partnership, which, you know, is my favorite thing of all time.”
““I’m not above it, guys,” Philipps said in the clip.”
“Stars like Khloé Kardashian, Lea Michele, Bella Hadid and more have gotten in on the action.”
““I made more money doing that kind of stuff, like the partnerships with brands.”It is common for celebrities to promote brands on the photo-sharing site.”
““I gotta be honest with you, I didn’t make a ton of money as an actor last year,” Philipps said.”
“After someone said that they liked Philipps’ Instagram because she wasn’t always posting #spon like some other celebrities, the actress revealed that she “wasn’t above it” and had done sponsored content in the past — but only for brands she actually liked.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"That's my only point." Phillips is currently playing Gail liptrap in HBO's vice president, and appeared in new girl and Angie Tribeca last year
"However, she points out in the video that she may not promote a product that she considers" random and weird "- except, say, a billion dollars." "I want to sell things," she continued
"I think I'm going to do one next week and it feels like me." The busy Phillips described her fear of Uber's "creepy". "Mother of two" has several posts on her instagram account promoting the arts and crafts retail chain, Campbell soup and so on
"I only choose things that I really like, like things that I want to work with, like my Michaels partnership, which, you know, is my favorite all the time."
"Guys, I'm not up there," Phillips said in the clip
"Kardashian, Leia Michelle, Bella Hadid and other stars all participated in the game."
"I make more money doing things like this, like working with brands." It's very common for celebrities to promote their brands on photo sharing websites
"To be honest, I didn't make a lot of money as an actor last year," Phillips said
"After some people said that they liked Phillips' instagram because she didn't always post sponsor information like other celebrities, the actress revealed that she was" not superior "and had done sponsor content in the past - but only the brand she really liked."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on Jolie and her kids, watch the video below!”
“"I'm with a woman I admire very much, and two other women I admire very much," Jolie told ET of her three dates.”
“Last month, the girls attended the National Board of Review Annual Awards Gala in New York City, where they were also accompanied by Jolie's friend, human rights activist Loung Ung.”
“This isn't the first time that Jolie has taken her eldest two daughters to an event with her.”
“David Livingston/Getty imagesThe Annie Awards celebrate the best in animation, and the 42-year-old was nominated as a co-proudcer for her film The Breadwinner, which won for Best Animated Feature-Independent.”
“The trio also held hands multiple times on the carpet, and it was clear from their smiles that it was a fun night out for all.”
“Shiloh, 11, wore a black suit with no tie, while Zahara, 13, wore a black top with lace detail and black pants.”
“David Livingston/Getty imagesAnd it looks like the kids are picking up some of mom's chic style.”
“Jolie wore a silver Atelier Versace dress that shimmered on the carpet, paired with a classic red lip and flowing hair.”
“Angelina Jolie took two of her children, Shiloh and Zahara, to the Annie Awards in Los Angeles on Saturday, where all three rocked the red carpet with sleek style.”


"For more information about Julie and her children, watch the video below!"
"I'm with a woman I admire so much, and two other women I admire so much," Julie told et about her three dates
"Last month, two girls attended the annual awards Party of the National Jury in New York City, accompanied by Julie's friend long ang, a human rights activist."
"It's not the first time Julie has brought her eldest daughter to an event."
The "David Livingston / Getty pictures" Annie award celebrates the Best Animation Award, with the 42 year old nominated as co producer for best animated feature film for her film the breadwinner
"The three also held hands on the carpet many times. It was obvious from their smiles that it was a very happy night for everyone."
Shiloh, 11, wore a black suit and no tie, while Zahara, 13, wore a black top and trousers with lace details
"David Livingston / Getty pictures, it looks like kids are learning some of their mother's chic styles."
"Julie is wearing a silver atelier Versace dress, shining on the carpet, with classic red lips and flowing hair."
Angelina Jolie and her two children, Shiloh and Zahara, took part in the Annie awards ceremony in Los Angeles on Saturday, and the three children all showed off on the red carpet in a fashionable style



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s like Abby has raised a couple of generations of young girls and has inspired this international phenomenon of young women going into math and science and STEM programs because she made it accessible, cool, attainable and fun.””
““These young girls have modeled their entire lives off of her.”
“The actress, who has played the forensic scientist on the procedural drama since 2003, didn’t go without thanking her fans for all of their support throughout the years in a video message shared to NCIS‘ Twitter page after the show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I hope that the fans will remember everything that Abby has taught all of us over the course of this entire run,” says Perrette, 49.”
““I have learned from my fans just such an incredible love and support.”
“Abby fans are incredible, they really are the best.”
“I can’t imagine a fan group being any better than that.”She continues, “They really make me smile.”
“My fans are funny and they’re smart and they’re kind and they’re caring and they’ve been so supportive.”
“Not only of Abby, on the show, but of me, of Pauley.”


"It's like Abby raised generations of young girls and inspired the international phenomenon of young women entering math, science and stem courses because she made them easy, cool, achievable and fun."
"These young girls have imitated her all their lives."
"The actress has been playing forensic medicine in the show since 2003. After the show, she shared a video message on NCIS's Twitter page, and she would like to thank her fans for their support over the years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I want the fans to remember what Abby taught us throughout the game," said the 49 year old
"I learned so much incredible love and support from my fans."
"Abby's fans are incredible. They're really the best."
"I can't imagine a fan group would be better than that," she continued. "They really make me smile."
"My fans are very interesting, they are very smart, very kind, they care about me, they always support me."
"Not only Abby's, but mine, Paulie's."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My TV set would happily give either of those gents a rose.”
“Why, oh why would Lindsay say such a thing?”
“The emperor of Bachelor Nation made a not-so-cryptic declaration about who won’t be the next Bachelor, and things aren’t looking good for the runner-up of The Bachelorette Season 13.”
“On Thursday, Bachelor creator Mike Fleiss tweeted, “Do we really want a Bachelor who isn't ready to settle down with a woman he loves?”
“Hmmm.”
“Not what #thebachelor is all about.” Uh-oh.”
“By “isn’t ready to settle down,” does Fleiss mean “isn’t ready to propose at the end of a season of a dating competition series”?”
“Did Fleiss just rule out the possibility of Peter Kraus being the next Bachelor?”
“Sure seems like it.”
“Fleiss wouldn’t be the first person affiliated with the franchise to state that Kraus isn’t a good fit for the program.”


"I'd be happy to give my TV opportunity to any of those two gentlemen."
"Why, oh, why did Lindsay say that?"
"The emperor of bachelor country made a less mysterious statement about who won't be the next bachelor, and the runner up of bachelor season 13 doesn't look very good either."
"Do we really want a bachelor who is not ready to settle down with the woman he loves?" Mike Fleiss, a bachelor creator, tweeted on Thursday
"Well."
"Not a bachelor." Ah, oh
By "not ready to settle down," does Fryes mean "not ready to propose at the end of a dating series"
"Does Fryes rule out Peter Klaus as the next bachelor?"
"It seems so."
"Fryes will not be the first to say that Klaus is not suitable for this project."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Love dadR.i.p T.W””
“You sing loud for me up there.”
“Tyquan Von Ricco Washington was found with multiple gunshot wounds on the road in front of a home in Greensboro, North Carolina, according to the Greensboro Police Department.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“While paramedics tried to save Washington, the 18-year-old was pronounced dead at Moses Cone Hospital.”
“Police allege the teen was shot during a dispute between himself and 21-year-old David Lee White, Jr.”
“Hours after Washington’s death, White was arrested and charged with first-degree murder and is being held in the Guilford County Jail without bond, according to police.”
“The American Idol season 3 winner shared a photo of her nephew on Instagram shortly after the news writing Ty Auntie is So Sorry Baby RIP to my Oldest Nephew Please Pray for his Mother and my Brother riccobarrino his Stepdad Washington s father Ricco Barrino a recording artist wrote...”
“...an emotional letter to his late son on Instagram reflecting on the special moments he witnessed as his son grew up...”
““Dear son I needed to write this sooner but it’s funny how life make you aware of your own unconscious procrastinations.”


"Love dad i.p.t.w"
"You're singing up there for me."
"According to the Greensboro police department, tiquan von Rico Washington was found with multiple gunshot wounds on the road in front of a house in Greensboro, North Carolina."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 18-year-old man was pronounced dead at moxicon hospital when paramedics tried to save Washington
Police said the teenager was shot dead in a dispute with 21-year-old David Lee
According to police, a few hours after Washington's death, white was arrested and charged with first-degree murder. He is currently in Guilford County prison without bail
"The third season american idol champion shared a picture of her nephew on instagram. Shortly after writing the news, aunt Tai felt very sorry for my eldest nephew. Please pray for his mother and brother, Rico barino. His stepfather, Washington's father, Rico barino, a recording artist wrote..."
“… A touching letter to his late son on instagram reflects the special moment he witnessed when his son was growing up... "
"Dear son, I need to write this earlier, but it's interesting how life makes you aware of your unconscious procrastination."



**Something goes wrong**
“Source: Read Full Article...”
“Watch the 2018 People’s Choice Awards Sunday, Nov. 11, only on E!”
“On Monday night celebrities stepped out for fashion’s biggest night and their after-party looks were equally as stunning.”
“Jennifer Lopez sizzled on both the carpet and the after-party scene in similar dresses with black, red, blue and touches of gold.”
“Gigi Hadid on the other hand looked like a fairy on the carpet and then channeled her inner pink, punk rock princess afterwards in a fabulous pants-jacket combo.”
“Rihanna turned heads the moment she arrived at the Met Gala.”
“She looked like a diamond-crusted Pope and we’re still in awe of her look.”
“When she hit the party scene however she donned a sheer glitter blue pantsuit and we don’t know which look we love more.”
“Photos2018 Met Gala: Red Carpet CouplesBlake Lively looked like a queen in her red Versace jeweled gown before rocking plaid at the parties.”
“It was like looking at Serena van der Woodsen at a gala and then on the steps of the Met before school on Gossip Girl.”


"Source: read the full text..."
"November 11, Sunday, only watch the 2018 people's Choice Award on e!"
"On Monday night, celebrities went out to the biggest party in fashion, and their post party looks were just as amazing."
Wearing similar dresses in black, red, blue and gold, Jennifer Lopez hisses on the carpet and in the post party scenes
Gigi Hadid, on the other hand, looks like a fairy on the carpet, then puts on a beautiful pants jacket combination to guide her inner Pink Punk Rock Princess
"Rihanna turned around as soon as she got to the met."
"She looks like a pope with diamonds, and we are still in awe of her looks."
"However, when she came to the party, she put on a pair of sparkling blue trousers, and we don't know which one we prefer."
"2018 blind date Party: red carpet couplet Lake lively looks like a queen in a red Versace jewelry dress before swinging the plaid at the party."
"It's like watching Serena van der Woodson at a party and then on the steps of gossip girl's metropolis before school."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“I expect more from myself, too," he said.”
“Following his release from Palm Beach County Jail several hours after being arrested for suspicion of driving under the influence, Woods released a statement to CBS News addressing the incident and explaining the circumstances surrounding his arrest.”
“WATCH: Tiger Woods Arrested on Suspicion of DUI"I understand the severity of what I did and take full responsibility for my actions," Woods said.”
“"I want the public to know that alcohol was not involved.”
“What happened was an unexpected reaction to prescribed medications.”
“I didn't realize the mix of medications had affected me so strongly."”
“Woods went on to apologize for his actions.”
“"I would like to apologize with all my heart to my family, friends and the fans.”
“"I will do everything in my power to ensure this never happens again."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"I also have higher expectations of myself," he said
"Woods was released from Palm Beach County prison hours after he was arrested on suspicion of drunk driving, and he spoke to CBS News in a statement on the matter and explained the circumstances of the arrest."
"Watch: Tiger Woods was arrested on suspicion of drunk driving," Woods said. "I understand the seriousness of what I did and take full responsibility for my actions."
"I want the public to know that it's not about alcohol."
"It was an unexpected reaction to prescription drugs."
"I didn't realize that the mix of drugs had such a strong impact on me."
"Woods went on to apologize for his actions."
"I would like to express my heartfelt apologies to my family, friends and fans."
"I'll do my best to make sure it doesn't happen again."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“POPULAR VIDEO ON VARIETY”
“That rose to an average of a 1.4 and 7 million viewers after seven days of delayed viewing.”
“The series, which stars Lopez and Ray Liotta, will premiere its 10-episode third season on Sunday, June 17 at 10 p.m. ET/PT.”
“Lopez stars as NYPD detective Harlee Santos, while Liotta plays her boss, Lt. Matt Wozniak.”
““I have enjoyed producing and starring in this beautifully complicated world and playing such an empowering yet flawed character – a woman, a detective, but, first and foremost, a mother,” Lopez said.”
““Now looking at it with a little distance, playing Harlee strengthened me and helped me grow into a more self-assured woman.”
“It’s crazy how some parts permeate your soul and change you forever and for that I am grateful.”
“We crafted a poetic three-season arc on how her journey ends, which is true redemption.”
“The way only Harlee could have done it – the hard way, the road less traveled.”
“I thank NBC and all the talented actors, writers, crew and producers for going on this journey with us!”The cast also includes Drea de Matteo, Dayo Okeniyi, Vincent Laresca, Hampton Fluker, and Sarah Jeffery.”


"Variety show popular video"
"After seven days of delayed viewing, the number rose to an average of 1.4 million and 7 million."
"The series, starring Lopez and ray Lyotard, will premiere in season 3 on Sunday, June 17, at 10 p.m. EDT, with a total of 10 episodes."
Lopez plays New York police detective Harry Santos, while Lyotard plays her boss, Lieutenant Matt Wozniak
"I love making and starring in this beautiful and complex world, playing such a powerful and flawed role - a woman, a detective, but first and foremost a mother," Lopez said
"Now a little bit further away, playing Harley makes me stronger and helps me grow into a more confident woman."
"It's crazy that some parts penetrate into your soul and change you forever, and I'm grateful for that."
"We have carefully created a poetic three season arc about how her journey ends, which is the real salvation."
"Only Harley can do it - a hard road, a road that is inaccessible."
"I'd like to thank NBC and all the talented actors, writers, cast members and producers for joining us on this journey! The cast also includes dreya de Matteo, Dayo Orkney, Vincent traleska, Hampton fluke and Sarah Jeffrey



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are parents to daughter Suri, 12.”
“Following his split from the Grace of Monaco star, Cruise went on to wed Katie Holmes in 2006 but the duo famously divorced in 2012.”
“Nicole Kidman opened up about the miscarriages she suffered during her marriage to Tom Cruise in a candid new interview.”
“The Big Little Lies star, 50, understandably felt “massive grief” upon miscarrying at 23 shortly after her 1990 wedding to Cruise due to an ectopic pregnancy, a condition in which the embryo begins developing in the fallopian tube rather than in the womb.”
““There’s a huge, aching yearning.”
“I know the yearning,” Kidman told Talter magazine while covering their July 2018 issue.”
““And the loss!”
“The loss of a miscarriage is not talked about enough.”
“That’s massive grief to women.”Although the Oscar winner and the Mission Impossible actor, 55, tried to conceive again, she lost the child around the time he filed for divorce in 2001.”
“Kidman previously reflected on the miscarriages in a November 2007 interview with Marie Claire.”


"They are the parents of their 12-year-old daughter Suri."
After breaking up with Monaco star grace, cruise married Katie Holmes in 2006, but they divorced in 2012
"Nicole Kidman revealed in a frank new interview the miscarriage she had when she married Tom Cruise."
The 50 year old "big lie" star miscarried at the age of 23, shortly after her marriage to cruise in 1990, when she was understandably saddened by an ectopic pregnancy (the embryo began to develop in the fallopian tube rather than in the womb)
"There is a great and painful desire."
"I know the desire," Kidman told talt magazine in its July 2018 issue
"And the loss!"
"The loss of abortion is not enough."
"It's a great grief for women." Although the 55 year old Oscar winner and "mission impossible" hero tried to get pregnant again, she lost her child when he filed for divorce in 2001
"Kidman reflected on abortion in an interview with Mary Claire in November 2007."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is at odds with Vice President Mike Pence over gay rights and has said he will not go with the US team to visit President Trump if invited to the White House.”
“Hiring Rippon would not have come without controversy for NBC.”
“NBC had confirmed the news of its hiring of the 28-year-old Pennsylvania native, but he apparently had a change of heart.”
“...during their events An openly gay skater who helped the United States win a bronze medal in team competition Rippon became one of the biggest breakout stars at Pyeongchang not just for his athletic exploits but for saying things that have been at turns smart creative and refreshing for viewers...”
“It s so important to me you know I worked so hard to be on this Olympic team and my teammates and my friends were there for me during my events and that meant so much to me that I really feel like I need to be there for them...”
“Advertisement‘‘I am so flattered that NBC wanted me to work as a correspondent, but if I took this opportunity, I would have to leave the Olympic team and I would have to leave the [Olympic] Village,’’ Rippon said Sunday on NBCSN (via USA Today).”
“In a reversal of news she had broken earlier on Sunday, USA Today’s Christine Brennan reported that the figure skater will not, after all, take a job with the network as a correspondent for the rest of the Winter Olympics.”
“...miss the closing ceremony WASHINGTON Well at least NBC will still be able to interview Adam Rippon right...”
“Rippon decided overnight that he would rather remain as an Olympian Brennan reported citing a source who would not speak publicly because of the sensitivity of the matter She said he did not want to relinquish his official Olympic standing give up credential move out of Team USA housing and...”


"He and vice president burns have differences on gay rights and said that if President trump is invited to the White House, he will not visit with the US team."
"It's not controversial for NBC to hire Rippon."
"NBC confirmed the hiring of the 28 year old Pennsylvania man, but he obviously changed his mind."
“…… In their competition, a openly gay skater helped the U.S. team win the bronze medal in the team competition, and Lippen became one of the most breakthrough stars in Pingchang, not only because of his sports achievements, but also because he said some words that made the audience feel smart, creative and refreshing.... "
"It's very important for me, you know I've made great efforts to participate in the Olympic Games, my teammates and friends are all around me in my games, which means a lot to me, I really feel I need to be there for them..."
"I'm honored that NBC wants me to be a journalist, but if I seize this opportunity, I will have to leave the Olympic team and the Olympic Village," Rippon said on nbcsn (via USA Today) on Sunday
"Contrary to the news earlier on Sunday, USA today's Christina Brennan reported that the figure skater will not work as a TV reporter for the rest of the Winter Olympics after all."
“… Miss the closing ceremony in Washington. Well, at least NBC can interview Adam Rippon, right? "
"Rippon decided overnight that he would rather continue to be an Olympic athlete. Brennan quoted a source who did not want to speak publicly as saying that because of the sensitivity of the matter, she said that he did not want to give up his official position in the Olympic Games, give up his qualification certificate, move out of the US team's house and..."



**Something goes wrong**
“However, guests gave her the approval that it was truly delicious.”
““I didn’t eat at all because I was so busy having fun,” says Williams.”
““I would tell her to enjoy every moment because it goes by so fast,” she says.”
““She had to be stitched in.”In retrospect, the bride would tell herself to actually embrace each and every minute of the day.”
““One of my bridesmaids broke the zipper on her dress,” Williams laughs.”
“...snafus...”
“Flowers are the most important part of your wedding so I literally would go to bed thinking about flowers and have nightmares that nothing would be beautiful I had nothing to worry about and I was in great hands That doesn t mean that the day went by without any...”
“I’d wake up sweating,” she jokes.”
““I kept dreaming that I would arrive to the wedding and the whole venue was all pink and purple flowers.”
“Having someone who knows how everything is supposed to flow really helped ease my stress.”The pre-wedding anxiety actually bubbled over to when she slept.”


"But the guests praised her and said it was really delicious."
"I didn't eat at all because I was busy having fun," Williams said
"I'll tell her to enjoy every moment because it goes too fast," she said
"She has to be sewn in." In retrospect, the bride will tell herself to really embrace every minute of the day
"One of my bridesmaids broke the zipper on the skirt," Williams said with a smile
“… Chaos... "
"Flowers are the most important part of your wedding, so when I go to bed, I always think about flowers, have nightmares, dream that nothing is beautiful, I have nothing to worry about, I have a pair of great hands, which does not mean that the day has passed, there is nothing..."
"I wake up sweating," she joked
"I always dream of going to the wedding. The whole venue is full of pink and purple flowers."
"Having someone who knows how everything should flow really helped me relieve the pressure." The anxiety before marriage is actually generated when she is sleeping. "



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She wears both minimal makeup and jewelry.”
“They all agreed that it was better for Kim and Kanye to hire a completely new security team.”Image zoom Credit: INSTAR“She’s definitely acting like a new Kim,” a source told PEOPLE.”
““No one is pressuring her,” one insider said.”
“Of her choice to step back in front of KUWTK cameras,sources told PEOPLE Kardashian West did take a break from filming directly after the robbery but gradually resumed a few weeks later — though it wasn’t due to any pressure from her famous siblings.”
“Filming KUWTK ResumesThree weeks after the robbery, production officially resumed on the family’s reality show, and Kardashian West began stepping out in public here and there, either to grab frozen yogurt with friend Jonathan Cheban or to attend one of West’s concerts.”
“While she was scheduled to ring in the birthday at Las Vegas’ Hakkasan Nightclub, she canceled the appearance and stayed home with her family.”
“Now she gets to wake up with her kids and go to sleep with her kids.”Ringing in her 36th birthday just 18 days after the heist, Kardashian West kept things extremely low-key — a noticeable departure from her usual lavish celebrations.”
““In the past, it was very hard for her to be away from her kids for work.”
“She seems happy about this.”“She very much likes spending every day with her kids,” the source added.”
““Instead of working nonstop, her life has slowed down significantly.”


"She's wearing light makeup and jewelry."
"They agreed that Kim and Kanye had better hire a new security team." "She definitely acts like a new Kim," a source told people
"No one put pressure on her," one insider said
"Kardashian West chose to step back and face kutek's camera. The source told people that Kardashian West did suspend shooting directly after the robbery, but gradually resumed shooting a few weeks later - but it wasn't because of any pressure from her famous brothers and sisters."
"Three weeks after the robbery, kutek's work resumed, and the production of Kardashian West's reality show officially resumed. Kardashian West began to walk around and make public appearances, either robbing frozen yogurt with her friend Jonathan Cheban or attending a concert in West."
"When she was arranged to attend a birthday party at the Las Vegas Hakka nightclub, she cancelled her appearance and stayed at home with her family."
"Now she can wake up with the children and sleep with them." On her 36th birthday, 18 days after the robbery, Kardashian West kept a very low profile, which was obviously different from her usual extravagant celebrations
"In the past, it was hard for her to leave her children to work."
"She seems happy about it." "She really enjoys being with the children every day," the source added
"Instead of working all the time, her life has slowed down a lot."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“She also has a 10-year-old, Dezi James Calvo, from a previous relationship.”
“The My Name Is Earl star welcomed twin boys, Leo and Lenon, on Oct. 16, the 40-year-old actress revealed on Instagram on Monday.”
“"They’re here!”
“Introducing our new additions, Leo and Lenon, born October 16th.”
“#DoubleTrouble," she captioned the pic.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Jaime Pressly Opens Up About Expecting Twin Boys, Jokes They Look Like 'Somebody Else's Child'Those two are a couple little cuties!”
“These are Pressly's first children with boyfriend Hamzi Hijazi.”
“In August, Pressly joked to ET about not recognizing her kids after the first ultrasound.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"She also has a 10-year-old named Dez James Calvo, who was a former lover."
On Monday, the 40 year old actress revealed on instagram: "on October 16, the star named 'my name is the count' ushered in twin boys, Leo and Lennon."
"Here they are
"Introduce our new members, Leo and Lennon, born on October 16."
"Double trouble," she wrote under the title of the photo
Exclusive: Jamie Presley made public about the twin boys, joking that they looked like 'other people's children', and that they were a cute couple
"This is the first child of Pressly and her boyfriend hamzi Hijazi."
In August, Pressly joked that she couldn't recognize her baby after her first ultrasound
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Pack on the PDA in Mexico This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“MORE: Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Hold Hands While Jetting Out of L.A.: PicWatch the video below for another one of the pair's romantic travels.”
“Meanwhile, Disick and Richie -- Justin Bieber's ex -- certainly seem to be growing closer, despite her insistence when they were first spotted together in May that the two were "just homies."”
“Speaking with her sister Khloe Kardashian, Kourtney admits, "I don't want the kids to see him like this," to which Khloe suggests she show him some "tough love."”
“@sofiarichie's Instagram StoryThe latest trip comes as Disick's ex, Kourtney Kardashian, dishes out some tough love in a new promo for Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“The 19-year-old model and 34-year-old reality star jetted off to Italy together, where Richie shared a PDA pic of herself and Disick embracing in front of the beautiful Milan Cathedral.”
“It's another vacation, another public display of affection for Sofia Richie and Scott Disick.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Scott disc and Sofia Richie are packing this video on a PDA in Mexico. It's not available because we can't load the sponsor's message."
"More: Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie fly away from Los Angeles hand in hand. Watch the video below to learn about another romantic journey."
Meanwhile, Disick and rich, Justin Bieber's ex boyfriend, seem to be getting closer, even though she insisted they were "just brothers" when she first found them together in May
Courtney admitted in a conversation with her sister, Carol Kardashian, "I don't want the kids to see him like this." for this, Carol suggested that she show him some "strong love."
"@ sofiarichie's instagram story the latest trip, disc's ex girlfriend Kourtney Kardashian in a new promotional video to keep up with Kardashian's pace with some tough love."
"The 19-year-old model flew to Italy with the 34 year old reality TV star, and Ritchie shared a PDA photo of himself hugging dick in front of the beautiful Milan Cathedral."
"It's another vacation, another public expression of love for Sophia Ritchie and Scott Disick."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the first trailer here.”
“Newcomers include mutant mercenary Domino, played by Atlanta star Zazie Beetz, and an unnamed villain, whose role will be played by Jack Kesy.”
“The cast returns Morena Baccarin as Deadpool/Wade Wilson’s girlfriend Vanessa, T.J. Miller as Weasel, and Brianna Hildebrand and Stefan Kapicic as Negasonic Teenage Warhead and Colossus, respectively.”
“The sequel to Reynolds’ R-rated super hero smash is directed by David Leitch (John Wick, Atomic Blonde) from a script penned by Deadpool 1 scribes Rhett Reese and Paul Wernick.”
“Watch the trailer below.”
“Josh Brolin plays the time-traveling mutant who ultimately teams up with Ryan Reynolds’ titular character.”
“With the film’s release quickly approaching, a new trailer has been revealed and it’s noteworthy for the debut of Cable.”
“Deadpool 2 trailerDeadpool 2 hits theaters on May 18th, 2018.”


"Watch the first trailer here."
"The newcomers include a mutant mercenary dominoes played by Atlanta star Zazi Bates and an unknown villain, who will be played by Jack Casey."
The crew also cast Morena bacalin as Vanessa, dead pool / Wade Wilson's girlfriend, T.J. Miller as the weasel, Brianna Hildebrand and and Stefan capicich as the young lady warhead and Colossus of negathonic, respectively
The sequel to Reynolds' superhero smash is directed by David rich (John wick, atomic blonde), and the script is written by the writers of death pool 1, red Reese and Paul Wernicke
"Look at the trailer below."
"Josh Brolin is a time travel mutant who eventually cooperates with Ryan Reynolds's nominal role."
"As the film's release time approaches, a new trailer comes to light, and it's worth paying attention to the premiere of cable TV."
"Pool of death 2" was released on May 18, 2018



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...site added a judge has yet to make a decision...”
“We hope that by bringing this case to the public’s attention, all children will be reported from reckless reporting.”According to the lawsuit, the investigative reports that were conducted in 2006 occurred when the four Duggar girls were underage.”
“Two years after Josh Duggar's molestation case was revealed, Jill, Jinger, Jessa, and Joy Duggar filed a lawsuit against Springdale, Ark., Washington County, Ark.”
“...county and police officials, as well as In Touch, over police documents released in 2015.”
“The sisters, best known for starring in the hit reality TV series “19 Kids and Counting,” told E!”
“News earlier this year that the case is strictly “about protecting children who are victims of abuse.”The sisters claimed, “Revealing juvenile identities under these circumstances is unacceptable and it’s against the law.”
“The media and custodians of public records who let these children down must be held accountable.”
“This case has vast implications for all our children.”
“They believed those reports would have only been accessible to law enforcement and child service officers.”
“Consolidation would undoubtedly give the false impression that the victim and the perpetrator are in this together The document went on to say Forcing the victims to join their claims with their perpetrator s claims would further traumatize the very victims Arkansas law is designed to protect The celebrity news...”


“… The website added that the judge has not yet made a decision... "
"We hope that by drawing public attention, all children can be reported recklessly." According to the lawsuit, the 2006 investigation report occurred when four Dagar girls were minors
Two years after the exposure of Josh Dagger's indecency case, Jill, ginger, Jesse and Joey dagger filed a lawsuit against Springdale, Washington County, Arkansas
“…… County Government and police officials, as well as police documents issued in 2015. "
"This pair of sisters, the most famous is starring in the hit reality TV series" 19 children and counting ", tell e!"
Earlier this year, it was reported that the case was strictly "to protect abused children". The sisters claimed that "it is not acceptable to disclose the identity of teenagers in such circumstances, which is against the law."
"The media and public record keepers who let these children down have to take responsibility."
"This case has a huge impact on all our children."
"They believe that only law enforcement and child services personnel have access to these reports."
"The merger will undoubtedly give the wrong impression that the victim and the offender are together. The document goes on to say that forcing victims to combine their claims with those of the perpetrators will further harm the victims. Arkansas law is designed to protect celebrity news... "



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Cyrus to Liam [src] ””
“He is portrayed by actor Jake Maskall.”
“James Holloway fling Duchess Of Essex ex wife rape mother of his son fling Veruca Popperwell Duchess Of Essex ex wife Allies Liam Henstridge Helena Henstridge Eleanor Henstridge Jasper Frost James Hill Family son with Prudence Penelope Henstridge daughter with Veruca Maribel Henstridge daughter with Veruca The Queen Mother mother...”
“Simon Henstridge older brother Helena Henstridge sister in law Robert Henstridge nephew Wilhelmina Henstridge nephew s wife Liam Henstridge nephew Eleanor Henstridge niece Simon Henstridge II son with Prudence daughter with Veruca daughter with Veruca The Queen Mother mother older wife nephew niece Series Portrayed by Jake Maskall First seen...”
“Stand and Unfold Yourself People are at their best or worst when they have an opportunity to touch greatness...”
“I should know – I've been both.”
“— Cyrus to Liam [src] ”Prince Cyrus Henstridge is a character in the E!”
“...drama soap The Royals.”
“He is the primary antagonist in season 1.”
“He was temporarily the King of England after the death of his older brother, the late King Simon.”


"- Cyrus said to Liam [SRC]"
"He's played by actor Jack maskar."
"The ex-wife of the Duchess of James Holloway Flynn Essex raped his son's mother Flynn veruca popperville, the daughter of the former ally Liam henstridge, Helena henstridge, Eleanor henstridge, the son of Jasper frost James Hill's family, prudence Penelope henstridge Veruca queen mother, daughter of Lynn veruca Maribel henstridge... "
Simon henstridge brother Helena henstridge sister-in-law Robert henstridge nephew William Mina henstridge nephew's wife Liam henstridge nephew Eleanor henstridge nephew Simon henstridge II son and prudence daughter and veruka daughter and veruka mother's eldest wife nephew niece series by Jack muska First of all, I saw... "
"Stand up and show yourself. When people have the opportunity to be great, they are in the best or the worst state..."
"I should know - I've been to both."
"Cyrus said to Liam," Prince Cyrus henstridge is "E!"
"Royal family"
"He was the main opponent in the first season."
After the death of his brother Simon, the late king, he became king of England temporarily



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Without the support of my wife and parents I would not have been able to do this.””
“I am back home now doing well, and life could not be better.”
“In June, Edwards addressed his recovery in a statement to Us, saying, “A little over 30 days ago, I made the decision to check myself into a rehabilitation facility.”
““I’m just gonna be like, ‘You have to go to rehab.’ It’s about saving his life,” she told her husband.”
“She told her husband, Taylor McKinney, that she planned to stage her own intervention with Edwards.”
“His decision to seek treatment came after Bookout, with whom he shares son Bentley, 8, tearfully spoke about her ex’s problems on the MTV hit and accused him of driving while under the influence of Xanax.”
“As Us Weekly previously reported, Edwards checked into rehab earlier this year to address substance abuse issues.”
“Edwards proposed to Standifer over a romantic meal in December 2016, which was shown in an episode of Teen Mom OG that aired earlier this year.”
““It was never just decided upon — we knew from day one this was going to be it.”Standifer said that Edwards’ ex-fiance, Maci Bookout, had been invited to the wedding and the pair’s son, Bentley, 9, didn’t know that she and his dad were already married.”
““It’s been in the works since the day we got engaged,” she told E!”


"I couldn't have done that without the support of my wife and parents."
"I'm living a good life at home now. I can't live a better life."
In June this year, Edwards talked about his recovery in a statement to us. He said: "more than 30 days ago, I decided to send myself to the rehabilitation center."
"I would say, 'you have to go to rehab.' It's to save his life, "she told her husband
"She told her husband, Tyler McKinney, that she planned to intervene with Edwards herself."
His decision to seek treatment was made after Booker's game. After Booker's game, he and his 8-year-old son Bentley talked tearfully about her ex-wife's problems with MTV and accused him of driving under the influence of taking Harbin medicine
"As previously reported by us weekly, Edwards was admitted to rehab earlier this year to address the problem of drug abuse."
"Edwards proposed to stand for a romantic dinner in December 2016, which was shown in an episode of teenage mom og broadcast earlier this year."
Mr. standiver said Edwards' former fiance, MACI bookout, was invited to the wedding and their 9-year-old son, Bentley, did not know that she and her father were married
"We've been working since the day we got engaged," she told e! "



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The takeaway: if set your curls like Shakira, just don’t forget to remove all the clips when you’re done!”
“Hey, at least the singer has a sense of humor about it.”
“In a LOL-worthy moment the singer posted a short video clip backstage mid-performance in which the glam duo is laughing because they’ve realized Shakira had an errant setting clip in her hair for the whole performance up to that point.”
“But with all of the curls and clips, sometimes things fall through the cracks.”
“We know this because Shakira snapped a video of her stylist extraordinaire showing off a peak into their pre-show ritual.”
“...with a small curling iron and individually amps up the coils for that iconic Shakira bodacious head of spirals that she can toss around while she performs during her El Dorado World Tour...”
“While it was an in process shot as Alvarez points out in her caption the colorful clips also provide a reference to Solange s iconic imagery with pins in her locks from her song Don t Touch My Hair Another secret once the curls have dried Alvarez goes back in...”
“The She Wolf took a snapshot of her golden coils drying with colored hair clips strategically placed down the length to perfectly set their pattern as they dry.”
“But now we have the secret to how she gets that enviably perfect curl pattern thanks to a handful of Instagram selfies shared on celebrity stylist Cynthia Alvarez’s feed.”
“And while the singer has oscillated between different tones of blonde throughout her career, she’s stayed true to her natural texture.”


"Takeout: if you curl up your hair like Shakira, don't forget to cut all the curls when you're done!"
"Hey, at least the singer has a sense of humor."
"At a moment worth laughing, the singer released a short video clip backstage, in which both fans were laughing because they realized that Shakira had a wrong set clip in her hair throughout the performance, until then."
"But with all the curls and clips, sometimes things fall through the cracks."
"We know this because Shakira made a video in which her stylist showed a peak in their pre show ceremony."
“… With a small curly iron and a single magnifying coil on the head of the iconic Shakira bodacious spiral, she can throw it around while she toured her world tour in Eldorado... "
"While it's a process of shooting Alvarez, the color clip in her title also provides a reference to sorange's iconic image with a needle in her hair from her song don't touch my hair another secret once curly hair dries back..."
"The female wolf took a picture. The golden hair circle in the picture is drying. The color of the hairpin is strategically put down along the length of the hairpin, so that the hairpin can put out its own pattern perfectly when it is drying."
"But now we have a secret about how she got the enviable perfect curly hair pattern thanks to a few instagram selfies shared in Celebrity Stylist Cynthia Alvarez's feed."
"Although the singer has been swinging between different blonde tones throughout her career, she has always maintained her natural quality."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
““You’ve been a role model and an inspiration and a voice of reason in uncertain times.”
“The former presidential candidate visited the show on Wednesday, and was treated to a special “Thank You Note” section on the show.”
“The female writers on the show all came out to pen some personalized thank yous.”
““Thank you, Hillary Clinton, for handling this difficult transition with more grace than I ever could have imagined,” one writer said.”
““That being said, call me day or night and I will be there with a gallon of ice cream and two spoons to tell you, girl you are so much better than him!”“You may get the call!” Hillary quipped back.”
“WATCH Jimmy Fallon and Miley Cyrus Photobomb Unsuspecting Fans In Adorable Tonight Show Sketch Another writer on the show noted You show girls everywhere that politics isn t a popularity contest because if it were you would have won by about three million votes One took advantage of Hillary s...”
“...signature campaign slogan saying Thank you Hillary Clinton...”
“I was with her, I’m still with her, and right now, I literally am with her!”But when singer Miley Cyrus came out, she was visibly emotional, breaking down in tears from the first word.”
““Thank you, Hillary for being a constant beacon of strength, hope, and determination for me and millions of other young women,” Miley said.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"In an age of uncertainty, you are an example, an inspiration, a rational voice."
The former presidential candidate visited the show on Wednesday and was entertained by a special "thank you note" section of the show
"All the female writers in the program came out and wrote some personalized thank-you letters."
One writer said, "thank you, Hillary Clinton, for handling this difficult transition in a more elegant way than I thought."
"Anyway, call me day or night, and I'll bring you a gallon of ice cream and two spoons to tell you, girl, you're much better than him!"! "You might get a call! "Hilary joked
"Watching Jimmy Fallon and Millie Cyrus bombard unsuspecting fans with photos in the show tonight's cute show, another author of the show points out that showing girls around the world politics is not a popularity contest, because if it is, you will win by about 3 million votes, and one of them takes advantage of Hillary's advantage..."
“… Sign the campaign slogan and say "thank you, Hillary Clinton..."
"I'm with her, I'm still with her, now, I'm really with her! "But when singer Miley Cyrus made her debut, she was obviously very emotional and burst into tears as soon as she opened her mouth."
"Thank you, Hillary has been a beacon of strength, hope and determination for me and millions of other young women," Miley said



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"I'm a 53-year-old middle-aged woman going through what middle-aged women go through if you know what I mean," she explained.”
“The shocking event captured on live TV caused quite a stir among concerned viewers, who feared she might have been having a stroke, heart attack, or something else more serious.”
“Williams assured her audience that what happened was not a planned stunt.”
“"It was scary," she recalled this morning, as she began to tear up.”
“"It was really scary."”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The host said after the incident, paramedics ran tests and found that her heart rate and blood pressure were "fine," but she was low on electrolytes.”
“"The costume got hot.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"I'm a 53 year old middle-aged woman, and if you know what I mean, I'll go through what middle-aged women go through," she explained
"This shocking event captured live on TV has caused quite a stir among the audience who are concerned that she may have suffered a stroke, a heart attack or other more serious diseases."
"Williams assured her audience that what happened was not a planned stunt."
"It was terrible," she recalled this morning, and she began to cry
"It's really scary."
"This content was imported from YouTube."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The host said that after the incident, the medical staff did a test and found that her heart rate and blood pressure were 'very good', but her electrolyte content was very low."
"The clothes are hot."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This was the highest it had ever been since the company that been founded in 2005 and Big Hit reported its net worth as $57 million (£45m), telling a very different story to when the company had been nearly bankrupt in 2007.”
“According to the label’s audit report, net profit rose 172.7 percent from 2016 and reached around $22.9 million (£18m).”
“Picking up the gongs for International Artist and Choice Fandom, BTS have enjoyed much success after becoming the first-ever group from South Korea to top the Billboard 200, which they did with Love Yourself: Tear.”
“K pop band BTS will soon perform at Citi Field in New York City on Saturday October 6 2018 In addition to their net profit for 2017 surging over 170 percent year over year after record music sales the band s label Big Hit Entertainment have also cashed in from...”
“...endorsement and collaborations the most recent being with Converse who will reimagine the iconic Chuck Taylors...”
“BTS Teen Choice Awards 2018BTS won the Choice International Artist and Fandom award at the Teen Choice Awards 2018, beating nominees BLACKPINK, EXO, GOT7, Super Junior and CNCO.”
“The Fandom award is won by fan votes and after trending repeatedly over the years, the win came as no surprise.”
“The Bangtan Boys also won the Teen Choice Award for Choice International Artist in 2017.”
“EpiphanySpeaking of BTS’s virality, the group dropped their comeback single Epiphany’s music video on Friday, August 10 and fans took to social media to discuss how different this project was to previous brightly-coloured videos, as reported on Metro.”
“Jin is seen in the artistic video that switches from colour to black and white throughout, sitting in an apartment closing the curtains and looking at himself in the mirror.”


"It's the highest since the company was founded in 2005, with big hit reporting a net asset of $57 million (45 million pounds), which is very different from the situation when the company almost went bankrupt in 2007."
"According to the company's audit report, net profit increased 172.7% from 2016 to about $22.9 million (18 million pounds),"
"BTS has achieved great success after becoming the first group in South Korea to be listed in the top 200 billboards. They used" love yourself: Tears "to show their success Yourself:Tear ）It was a success. "
"K pop band BTS will perform in Citi Field, New York on October 6, 2018 (Saturday), and its record sales of big hit entertainment will also benefit from it, with net profit soaring 170% year-on-year in 2017."
“… Recognition and collaboration recently with converse who will re imagine the iconic Chuck Taylor
"BTS youth Choice Award 2018bts beat nominators blacklink, exo, got7, super junior and cnco to win the" choose international artist and fan Award "of 2018 youth Choice Award
"The fan award was voted by fans, and after years of repeated agitation, it's no surprise that this award was won."
"In 2017, bontan boy also won the" youth Choice Award "International Artist Award."
On Friday, August 10, the band abandoned the music video for its return single epiphany, and fans discussed on social media how different the project was from the previous colorful video
"In this art video from color to black and white, Jin Yuxi sits in an apartment, closes the curtains and looks at himself in the mirror."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Today a dream brought me here.” The Person of the Year gala is the official kick-off to the 18th annual Latin Grammy Awards airing live on Univision Thursday, November 16, at 8 p.m.”
“We must dream high and we must daydream.”
“VIEW GALLERY Camila Cabello was one of the many stars who paid tribute to Alejandro with performances Photo: Getty ImagesAlejandro added, "That child wants to thank the Academy for this beautiful recognition.”
“"When I was a child I had a dream, then a guitar, a chord, a verse, a fear, a need, a song and I started singing," he said.”
“While accepting the honor, the Deja Que Te Bese singer was overcome with emotion as he talked about his dream that turned into reality.”
“VIEW GALLERY Nick Jonas, Residente and Anitta performed Looking for Paradise during the gala Photo: Getty ImagesMORE: Everything you can expect at the 2017 Latin Grammy AwardsThe 48-year-old singer was accompanied by his wife Raquel Perera and two of his four children — Manuela and Alexander.”
“Following the number of tributes, Alejandro took to the stage to perform the song that launched his career, Corazón Partío.”
“Meanwhile Residente, Nick Jonas and Anitta serenaded the audience with a performance of Looking for Paradise and Luis Fonsi performed Amiga Mía.”
“CLICK FOR FULL GALLERYVIEW GALLERY Alejandro was honored as the Latin Grammys' 2017 Person of the Year Photo: Getty ImagesCamila Cabello and Juanes performed Quisiera Ser.”
“During the star-studded affair, Alejandro’s music was celebrated by his peers in the music industry, who honored him with performances of some of his biggest hits.”


"Today, a dream brought me here." The person of the year awards show, the official start of the 18th Latin Grammy Awards ceremony, will be broadcast live on Thursday, November 16, at 8pm at Univision
"We have to look ahead, we have to daydream."
"The viewing gallery, Camilla Cabello, is one of many stars who perform in honor of Alejandro. Photo: Getty Images Alejandro added, "the child wanted to thank the Academy for its recognition of his beauty."
"When I was a kid, I had a dream, and then with a guitar, a chord, a poem, a fear, a need, a song, I started singing," he said
"While accepting the honor, the djakt bass singer was thrilled that her dream had come true."
"The viewing gallery Nick Jonas, residente and Anita performed" in search of paradise "during the evening. Photo: Getty imagesmore: everything you can expect at the 2017 Latin Grammy Awards. The 48 year old singer was accompanied by his wife Raquel Perera and two of his four children, Manuela and Alexander."
After countless mourning, Alejandro performed the song Corazon patio, which started his career
Meanwhile, Nick Jonas and Anita sang a serenade "looking for paradise" for the audience, while Louis fonsey performed "Amiga MIA."
"Click on the full screen galleryview gallery. Alejandro was awarded the honorary photo of Latin Grammy of the year 2017: Getty pictures. Camilla Cabello and Juan performed quesilla Searle."
In this star gathering, Alejandro's music was praised by his colleagues in the music industry, who saluted him with the performance of some of his most popular works



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photos Credit: ACE/INFphoto, s_bukley/Shutterstock.com,TELL US – TEAM BETHENNY OR TEAM CAROLE?”
“To defend my family and people I love.”
“After watching the episode play out after living through the shocking blowout months ago, Carole told readers that it is often eye-opening to hear to everything that is being said about her when she’s not around, especially when it comes to her one-time bestie, Bethenny.”
““Sometimes, like you, I’m shocked by what I see and hear,” Carole wrote.”
““In real life, you may never discover that a friend is being nice to your face only to make rude and hurtful comments behind your back.”
“But lucky (or unlucky) for me, I get to hear it all—Bethenny’s drumbeat of insults, her spate of digs, and her self-serving narrative.”
“Live on Bravo Wed 9e/8c!”According to Carole, she does her best to brush off Bethenny’s remarks because she seems “so angry and unhappy.” However, at the same time, she’s sad to see how much their relationship has changed.”
““I can’t help but feel sad that I let into my life a person who I thought supported me, respected me, and enjoyed me, and she has revealed herself to be the complete antithesis,” she explained.”
““I was taught to stand up for myself.”
“To be heard.”


"Photo source: ACE / infphoto, S / u bukley/ Shutterstock.com Website, tell us - betney or Carroll? "
"To protect my family and the people I love."
"After a shocking blowout a few months ago, Carol watched the episode and told readers that when she was away, it would be eye opening to hear everything about her, especially when it comes to her former good friend besseigne."
"Sometimes, like you, I'm shocked by what I've seen and heard," Carroll wrote
"In real life, you may never find a friend who is nice to you in front of you, but says something rude and hurtful behind your back."
"But fortunately (or unfortunately) for me, I heard all the insulting drumbeats of besseini, her series of sarcasm, and her selfish narrative."
"Live on 9E / 8C weekend! According to Carol, she tried to ignore besseini because she looked "angry and unhappy.". At the same time, however, she was sad to see how much their relationship had changed
"I can't help but feel sad because I let into my life someone who I think supports me, respects me and enjoys me, and she reveals that she is the opposite," she explains
"I was taught to stand up for myself."
"Listen to me."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See photos of all the best dressed stars of the week in the gallery!”
“Sandra Bullock, Anne Hathaway, Cate Blanchett and the cast of Oceans 8 were all stunning in Vegas, also for CinemaCon.”
“Gigi Hadid celebrated her golden birthday, turning 23 on April 23, by rocking a gold Versace mini.”
“She looked FLAWLESS.”
“Sister Bella Hadid looked gorgeous as well, supporting her big sis.”
“Priyanka Chopra did a whirlwind press day on April 26, promoting her show Quantico.”
“She stunned in a pink and yellow Prabal Gurung dress at Good Morning America, and changed a bunch more times throughout the day — see all of her outfits here!”
“Anna Kendrick wore a sexy black dress, a coiled diamond bracelet by Gismondi 1754, and diamond rings by Dionea Orcini at the 2018 CinemaCon Big Screen Achievement Awards on April 26.”
“That movie is going to be a game-changer!”
“J-Lo had a big week — she also looked AMAZING at the Latin Billboard awards, in purple sequins, AND, her makeup line with INGLOT launched!”


"See all the best dressed stars of the week in the gallery!"
Sandra Bullock, Anne Hathaway, Kate Blanchett and the cast of "ocean 8" are excellent in Vegas, as well as at the film festival
On April 23, Gigi Hadid celebrated his golden birthday with a golden Versace Mini
"She looks perfect."
"Sister Bella Hadid also looks beautiful, supporting her big sister."
"Priyanka Chopra gave a whirlwind press conference on April 26 to promote her program Quantico."
"Good morning in America, she wore a prabal Gurung dress in pink and yellow and changed clothes many times a day - look at all her clothes!"
"Anna Kendrick wore a sexy black dress, Gismondi's 1754 coiled diamond bracelet and dionea orcini's diamond ring at the 2018 cinemacon big screen achievement awards ceremony on April 26."
"That movie will change the rules of the game!"
"J-Lo has had an important week - she's wearing purple sequins, she looks glamorous at the Latin Billboard Awards ceremony, and her makeup line with Inglot has also been launched!"



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is yet another public institution that needs to be dismantled and rebuilt from its sexy foundations...”
“— not sexy:Blake Shelton looks like the dad in a drug commercial where they list off the side effects at the end while you watch him build a birdhouse.”
“...for its choice of Sexiest Man Alive which is a transparently PR driven exercise often jokingly equated to a best publicist award...”
“Gabe Delahaye gabedelahaye November 15 2017 blake Shelton looks like your middle school bus driver who got fired for buying four loko for the intimidating 8th graders who sit on the back of the bus https t co fQCpg4Xx2g maggie MaggieShmaggie November 15 2017 Of course People is routinely derided...”
“— nascarcasm (@nascarcasm) November 15, 2017Blake Shelton looks like a guy who gets shredded by everyone on Shark Tank for the outrageous valuation he places on his pre-revenue floating “beer cup” that he invented after his wife left him, and it doesn’t get much sexier than that.”
“Blake Shelton looks like a server at a Cracker Barrel in Gatlinburg.”
“For real.”
“— Kaleb Horton (@kalebhorton) November 15, 2017If Blake Shelton is voted #SexiestManAlive then Ray Black Jr. is 2017's most popular driver.”
“— DeShawn (@DeShawnstantine) November 15, 2017Let's set the record straight: Blake Shelton looks like a second-stringer on Justified who gets murdered over a horse crime.”
“...quick to compare Shelton s looks to things that are how can we put this...”


“…… It's another public institution that needs to be demolished and rebuilt on the basis of sexuality... "
"- not sexy: Blake Sheldon looks like a father in a drug ad, they list the side effects at the end of the ad, and you're watching him build a birdhouse."
“… Because it chose the sexiest man, it's a transparent PR driven exercise, often jokingly equivalent to a best PR Award... "
"Gabe delaye Gabe delaye November 15, 2017 Blake Shelton looks like your high school bus driver who was fired for buying four lokos for eighth graders in the back seat of the car. Of course, people are often ridiculed..."
"- nasarcasm (@ nasarcasm) November 15, 2017b, Lake Shelton looks like a man torn apart by everyone in a shark tank, because he has made an outrageous valuation of the pre income floating" beer glass "invented by his wife after she left him, and there is nothing sexier than that."
"Black Sheldon looks like a waiter in a biscuit bucket in Gatling."
"Really."
"- Kaleb Horton (@ kalebhorton) November 15, 2017 if Blake Shelton is selected as' sexy man ', ray black Jr. will be the most popular driver of 2017."
"- on November 15, 2017, deshawnstantine, let's make it clear: Black Sheldon looks like the second special agent of justice magazine who was murdered in a horse case."
“… Tell us what Sheldon looks like and what we should say... "



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on HBO.”
“So it feels like the television academy just needs to catch up.”“Insecure” launches Season 2 on Sunday at 10:30 p.m.”
““This is something that just started happening in the last couple of years, where you have shows led by women.”
““There’s not a big pool,” Rae said about this statistic.”
“However, it’s notable that none of the 14 series nominated for best comedy or best drama features a solo female showrunner or creator.”
“So we’ll just see what happens next year.”Also Read: 'Silicon Valley' Star TJ Miller on Why He's Thankful for His 'Curtain Call'There’s no question that TV has made definite strides in becoming more diverse over the years.”
“So for that alone, I was bummed.”Rae pointed out that the lack of Emmys attention “motivates us all to work harder.” She added that the show’s team is “very, very proud of the work that we’re doing and stand behind it.”
““And then when you get nominated for an Emmy, obviously more people pay attention — it sort of fast-tracks it.”
““All I could think was how dope it would have been and how great it would have been for the exposure of the show because I feel like more and more people are slowly becoming aware about our show,” the creator, showrunner and star of “Insecure” continued.”
“'”Also Read: What Is HBO's Next Breakout Comedy Hit?”


"Et on HBO."
"So I feel like the TV academy needs to keep up." Unsafe will launch its second season at 10:30pm on Sunday
"This is something that's only started to happen in recent years, where you have programs led by women."
"There's not a big pool," Ray said of the statistics
"However, it is worth noting that none of the 14 series nominated for best comedy or drama is a female soloist or creator."
"Then let's see what happens next year." You can also read: "why does Silicon Valley star TJ Miller thank him for his curtain call?". There is no doubt that television has made clear progress in becoming more and more diverse these years
"So I'm disappointed with that alone." Ray pointed out that the lack of attention of Emmy Awards "inspires us all to work harder." She added that the show's team "is very, very proud of what we are doing and supports it."
"Then when you get the Emmy nomination, obviously more people will notice it - it's a little fast."
"The creators, crew and stars of unsafe continued:" all I can think of is how cool the show will be and how well it will be exposed, because I think more and more people are becoming aware of our show. "
Also read: what is HBO's next breakthrough comedy hit



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reporting by Carly Sloane...”
“Us Weekly on newsstands now...”
“Those are just the things that we have to do right now until he gets older and we re perfectly fine with it For more on Portwood s life as a mother of two pick up the new issue of...”
““That was our little date night and we were happy and cuddled afterwards.”
“...explained...”
“We both kind of cooked dinner together and we just put James in like the little corner next to the table with us in a swing and we just had like a glass of wine and had some dinner she...”
“...for the future As for her relationship with Glennon Portwood told Us that the new parents are enjoying date nights at home...”
“I grew up really poor and it was really hard times and I just want to stop the cycle and I think I m doing a pretty good job of that now with my baby so I m just excited...”
““I’m just really excited to see you know, my kids grow up and just live a life differently than what I did,” she told Us.”
“...son and 9 year old daughter Leah whom she shares with her ex fiancé Gary Shirley grow up together...”


"Carly Sloan reports..."
"American weekly is on the newsstand now..."
"These are all the things we have to do now, until he grows up, we can fully accept this, more about porterwood's life as a mother of two children, pick up a new issue of..."
"It was our little date night, and then we had a good time and hugged each other."
“… Explain... "
"We made dinner together. We put James in the small corner beside the table and played on the swing with us. We had a drink and some dinner. She..."
"For the future, about her relationship with Glenn Portwood, she tells us that her new parents are at home enjoying a date night..."
"I've been very poor since I was a child. It was a very difficult time. I just want to stop this cycle. I think I'm doing very well with my children now, so I'm very excited..."
"I'm really glad to see that you know, my children have grown up and live a different life from me," she told us
“… Her son and 9-year-old daughter, Leah, grew up with her ex fiance, Gary Shirley



**Something goes wrong**
“Wojcicki also led a private real-estate holding company, Los Altos Community Investments (formerly Passerelle Investment Co.), which was known for its investment in the sustainable growth of Los Altos, California, where she lived.”
“Wojcicki and her ex-husband, Sergey Brin, a cofounder of Google, were codirectors of the Brin Wojcicki Foundation, a private grant-making organization with various interests.”
“Wojcicki received a B.S.”
“...degree (1996) in biology from Yale University.”
“She later worked as a researcher and as an investment analyst.”
“In 2006, while pursuing her interest in the potential to influence health care through personal genetic testing, Wojcicki cofounded 23andMe with American biologist Linda Avey.”
“Wojcicki and Avey believed that individuals provided with personal knowledge of disease risk would be empowered and better prepared to take steps toward disease prevention.”
“The company’s mission—to make genetic testing and its results, including findings about predisposition to disease, available to anyone who was willing to pay—was highly controversial, however.”
“Many officials were concerned about the implications for genetic privacy and about potentially flawed test results.”
“Moreover, much was yet unknown about gene-environment interactions and to what degree certain environmental factors ultimately influenced disease risk.”


Voicic also leads Los Altos community investments, formerly passerelle Investment Co., a private real estate holding company known for investing in sustainable development in Los Altos, California, where she lives
Voischiki and her ex husband Sergey Brin are co founders of Google. They are co directors of the brin voischiki foundation, a private donation organization with various interests
"Wojcich has a bachelor's degree."
"Degree in biology, Yale University, 1996."
"She later worked as a researcher and investment analyst."
"In 2006, while pursuing the potential to influence health care through personal genetic testing, wojcich co founded 23andMe with American biologist Linda Ivey."
"Wojcicki and Avery believe that individuals with personal knowledge of disease risk will be empowered and better prepared to take preventive measures."
However, it is controversial that the company's mission is to make genetic testing and its results available to anyone willing to pay, including the discovery of predisposition to disease
"Many officials are concerned about the impact of genetic privacy and possible defective test results."
"In addition, much remains unclear about the interaction between genes and the environment and the extent to which certain environmental factors ultimately affect disease risk."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to subscribe to the People Food newsletter.”
““In many ways I want Ina’s life.”
“Anthony Bourdain Says He Has Real Respect for Ina Garten Even If He Makes a Little Fun of Her Anthony Bourdain has had this fair share of beef with other notable chefs but there is one culinary star he holds to a high standard no matter what he s said...”
“...about her in the past...”
“In a new interview with Refinery 29, the site asked Bourdain if there’s anyone he thinks gets it right, and “after a long pause,” he professed his affection for Ina Garten.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’ll make a little fun of her now and then, it’s very perfect in Ina World, scarily so,” he said, but “what she cooks on TV is legit and instructive.”
“If you do as Ina does chances are you are going to get a good product I got real respect for her Image zoom Credit Stephen Lovekin REX Shutterstock Noam Galai WireImage The Parts Unknown host previously credited Garten as one of the few people on Food Network who can...”
“...actually cook When Ina Garten roasts a chicken she roasts it correct...”
“When Ina Garten makes mashed potatoes, those are some solid mashed potatoes,” he told Atlanta magazine.”


"Click here to subscribe to people's food news."
"In many ways, I want ina's life."
"Anthony Bowden said that he had great respect for ina Garten. Even if he made fun of her, Anthony Bowden also shared this beef with other famous chefs, but there was a cooking star who insisted on high standards no matter what he said..."
“… About her past... "
"In a new interview at refinery 29, the website asked buldan if there was anyone he thought was right. After a long pause, he expressed his love for ina Garten."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'll make fun of her from time to time, which is perfect in the world and terrifying," he said, but "what she does on TV is legal and educational."
"If you do like ina, it's likely that you will get a good product. I have great respect for her image. My credit card is Stephen lovekin Rex Stuart, stoke NOM Garay wire image. This unknown host used to think that Garten is one of the few people on the food network..."
“…… In fact, when ina Garten roasted the chicken, she roasted it right... "
"When ina Garten made mashed potatoes, they were solid mashed potatoes," he told Atlanta magazine



**Something goes wrong**
“The comedian got remarried to Meredith Salenger in July.”
“I'm so proud of you," he said.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoPatton Oswalt (R) and Meredith Salenger attend the Los Angeles premiere of "Black Panther" on January 29.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoPatton Oswalt praised Michelle McNamara after her book "I'll Be Gone in the Dark" debuted at No.”
“1 on the New York Times bestseller list.”
“File Photo by Christine Chew/UPI | License PhotoMarch 8 (UPI) -- Patton Oswalt is "so proud" his late wife's book is on the New York Times bestseller list.”
“The 49-year-old actor and comedian praised Michelle McNamara in a tweet Wednesday after her book I'll Be Gone in the Dark debuted at No.”
“1 on the weekly chart.”
“Advertisement"I hope you know, sweetie.”
“I feel like you know.”


"The comedian remarried Meredith Salinger in July."
"I'm so proud of you," he said
Jim luhman and Meredith Salinger attend the premiere of panther in Los Angeles on January 29
"Information photo of Jim rumen / UPI | license photo Patton Oswald praised Michelle McNamara after her book" I'll disappear in the dark "made its first place debut."
"Number one on the New York Times bestseller list."
On the 8th New York Times bestseller list, Patton Oswalt is "very proud."
"The 49 year old actor and comedian tweeted on Wednesday praising Michelle McNamara for her book I'll be gone in the dark, which made her debut in the first place."
"It's 1 on the weekly chart."
"I hope you know, dear."
"I think you know."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Ariana is due to perform at The O2 on Thursday and Friday and we will advise as soon as we can as to the status of those shows."”
“Our thoughts are with all those affected," the venue said on Twitter.”
“The pop star released the following statement on social media: "broken.”
“...from the bottom of my heart, i am so so sorry.”
“...i don't have words."”
“Grande later boarded a private plane with her mother, Joan Grande and returned to her hometown of Boca Raton, Fla."They were met at the airport by Ariana's boyfriend, Mac Miller," a source tells E!”
“News.”
“"When Ariana got off the plane, Mac greeted her on the tarmac with a long hug followed by a kiss.”
“Mac also gave Ariana's mom a hug.”
“It was a very emotional reunion and they stood talking for a minute before getting into the car.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“Don’t miss her on Wednesday’s Season 7 premiere of E!’s Total Divas this week.”
“Can’t get enough of Nikki?”
“The dance earned her just a 24, but the audience gave her a standing ovation.”
“Nikki won the hearts of the judges and America on Monday’s Halloween Week episode, however, performing a spooky jive with professional partner Artem Chigvintsev.”
“...her from the competition in a shocking double elimination where the Superstar was voted out alongside Vanessa Lachey...”
“Nikki Bella danced her way into America s hearts on Monday night but the Mirror Ball Trophy won t be hers on Season 25 of Dancing with the Stars While Nikki scored a season high 46 points from the judges last week that score combined with viewer votes still eliminated...”
“In a shocking double-elimination twist, Nikki Bella is voted out during the Halloween Week episode of ABC's "Dancing with the Stars."”


"Don't miss her Season 7 premiere on Wednesday! Total days of the week
"Not enough for Nicky?"
"The dance only won her 24 points, but the audience stood up and clapped for her."
"Nicky won the hearts of judges and American audiences on Monday's Halloween week show, but he had a weird swing with his professional partner, Artem chigvintsev."
“… She was knocked out in the shocking double knockout, and the superstar was knocked out with Vanessa roach
"On Monday night, Nicky Bella jumped all the way into the hearts of the American audience in the 25th season of dance with the stars, but the mirror ball trophy will not be hers, and Nicky got the season's highest 46 points from the judges last week, which, together with the audience vote, is still eliminated..."
In the shocking double knockout, Nicky Bella was eliminated from ABC's dancing with the stars Halloween week



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the recent episode of the series, the show ended with a cliffhanger as it featured Messer driving off in order to see her sick child.”
“She was also reported heading to her grandmother's house to drop off her second daughter, Addie, before rushing to the hospital.”
“The sad news came in during the recent "Teen Mom 2" episode.”
“According to the report from E!”
“News, the reality star received a phone call from her former partner, Corey Simms, and it was confirmed that Ali was immediately rushed to the hospital.”
“It was also learned that her condition has gotten worse.”
“Messer's 7-year old daughter needs nothing more but prayers.”
“Difficulty of breathingAccording to E!”
“News, Simms made a phone call to Messer since he noticed that their daughter was already catching her breath.”
“During their phone call, Messer has also asked her former partner about the recent condition of their daughter.”


In a recent episode, Mayer drives away to see her sick child. The play ends with a thrilling ending
"It is reported that she went to her grandmother's house to see her second daughter Eddie off before she went to the hospital."
"This unfortunate news came from the recent" teenage Mom 2. "
"According to e's report!"
"As soon as the news came out, the reality TV star received a phone call from his former partner, Corey Simms, confirming that Ali was immediately taken to the hospital."
"And she's getting worse."
"Mercer's 7-year-old daughter just needs to pray."
"Dyspnea according to e!"
"Good news, Sims called Mayer because he noticed that their daughter was out of breath."
"On their phone, Mayer also asked her former partner about her daughter's recent condition."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sources previously told PEOPLE that Jenner is determined to get back into pre-pregnancy shape because she wants to be a “really hot young mom.””
“...during pregnancy in a now-deleted tweet during a Q&A session with fans and followers.”
“On Friday, while answering some fan questions with her best friend Jordyn Woods, the 20-year-old mom opened up about how even though her body has “bounced back super fast” since welcoming her daughter in February, she’s still struggled with her share of post-baby body insecurities.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I feel like people think that I bounced back super fast which I guess I did the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star remarked in a new video posted on her YouTube page before adding that people can get the wrong idea on Instagram sometimes Want all the latest pregnancy...”
“...and birth announcements plus celebrity mom blogs...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletterFiring off a list of the most significant ways her body has changed, Jenner remarked, “My boobs are defiantly three times the size, which bothers me.”
“I have stretch marks on my boobs.”
“My stomach isn’t the same, my waist isn’t the same, my butt’s bigger, my thighs [are] bigger.”“And honestly, I’m finding I have to change my style a little because nothing in my closet fits me from before,” she continued.”
“After previously announcing in the video that she had “planned my first workout on Monday,” the Kylie Cosmetics mogul added, “I really want to get my core back.”“I feel like I have fake abs now, it’s just like, genetics.”


"The source told people earlier that Jenna was determined to return to her pre pregnancy state because she wanted to be a" really sexy young mother. "
“… During pregnancy, during Q & A sessions with fans and followers, on a tweet that has been deleted. "
On Friday, the 20-year-old mother, answering questions from fans with her best friend Jordan woods, admitted that although her body had "rebounded so fast" since welcoming her daughter in February, she was still struggling with physical insecurity after the baby was born
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I think people think I'm rebounding too fast, and I think I'm keeping up with this Kardashian star," she said in a new video posted on youtube, adding that people may have wrong ideas on instagram and sometimes want all the latest pregnancy information... "
“… And birth announcement plus celebrity mom blog... "
"It bothers me to click here and list the most important ways for her body to change in people magazine. My chest is three times as big as it used to be," Jenner said
"I have stretch marks on my chest."
"My stomach is different, my waist is different, my ass is bigger, and my thighs are bigger." "To be honest, I found that I had to change my style because there was nothing in my closet that was more suitable for me than before," she continued
Kelly cosmetics tycoon previously announced in the video that she "plans to exercise for the first time on Monday." she went on, "I really want to get my core back." I feel like I have fake ABS now, just like genes. "



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“He continued, "I think if somebody uses it as an excuse to be late, or insincere, or rude, or unapologetic, that’s not being an artist, that’s being a jerk.”
“Ready for it?”
“HERE YA GO:This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Good luck on your blog.”
“— Demi Lovato (@ddlovato) July 6, 2018Ummm, what now?!”
“As you can plainly see, Demi is shadily wishing someone "good luck" with their "blog," and the internet is determined to find out who she's talking about.”
“Including Ruby Rose who helpfully tweeted this in response While there are plenty of fan theories about who this could be most people seem to think the subject of Demi s tweet is Mike Bayer a life coach who s gone on tour with Demi and posted a video that...”
“...fans think was about her...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"He went on," I think if someone uses this as an excuse for being late, or being insincere, or rude, or not apologizing, it's not an artist, it's a jerk. "
"Are you ready?"
"Here you are: this content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Good luck on the blog."
"- Demi Lovato (@ ddlovato) July 6, 2018. Well, what now?"
"You can see clearly that Demi is secretly wishing good luck to someone's blog, and the Internet is determined to find out who she's talking about."
"Including Ruby Rose, she responded to this very helpfully on twitter, and there are many theories about who this may be. Most people seem to think that the theme of Demi's Twitter is Mike Bayer, who is a life coach, toured with Demi and released a video..."
“… Fans think it's because of her... "



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To receive the magazine, click here to subscribe.”
“Lappin wrote in his message to Kocher, shared by the latter on social media.”
“Saturday Night Live writer Nick Kocher turned to the internet on Emmys weekend for help with a fashion emergency.”
“After landing at LAX from New York's JFK on a Delta flight on Sept. 15, Kocher realized that he had grabbed the wrong garment bag.”
“Instead of his own — containing a navy Calvin Klein tuxedo that he looked "fresh as fuck in" — Kocher was holding someone else's, so he posted a lengthy plea on Twitter to his 15,000 followers detailing the dire situation.”
“"Whoever has my bag is also going to the Emmys, because I have their bag and there's a suit and tuxedo in it.”
“Repost this.”
“The more people who see it the better."”
“His post got retweeted more than 4,000 times, eventually making its way to Matt Lappin, a producer on The Late Show With Stephen Colbert.”
“"DUDE!”


To receive a magazine, click here to subscribe
In a letter to Koch, lapin wrote that Koch shared the letter on social media
"Saturday night live writer Nick Kocher turned to the Internet in a fashion emergency at Emmys weekend."
"On September 15, after landing at Los Angeles International Airport from Kennedy Airport in New York on a delta flight, Koch realized that he had grabbed the wrong clothing bag."
"Koch is not his own - there's a Navy Calvin Klein dress in it, which looks" as fresh as hell "- but someone else's dress, so he sent a lengthy request to 15000 followers on twitter detailing this terrible situation."
"Whoever has my bag will go to the Emmy, because I have their bag with suits and tuxedos in it."
"Republish this message."
"The more people you see, the better."
"His post was forwarded more than 4000 times and eventually reached Matt Lappin, the producer of Stephen Colbert's later show."
"Man!"



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're sure they'll be able to "keep up" with the good news!”
“"But, we do talk about it a lot, so I think they are really excited."”
“In an episode of "Keeping Up With the Kardashians" that aired last April, Kardashian West, who suffered with placenta accreta while pregnant with both of her children, revealed she experienced complications after undergoing a procedure she had hoped would allow her to carry another baby.”
“But that didn't stop Kardashian West from continuing to expand her family with husband Kanye West, 40.”
“In September, she confirmed that the couple was expecting their third child via a surrogate.”
“(She revealed on Wednesday's "The Ellen DeGeneres Show" she and West will welcome a girl.)”
“Now, Kardashian West is opening up about how the surrogacy experience is "really different" from that of carrying North, 4, and Saint, 1 — and not in the way she expected.”
“The Kardashian West entourage will soon have one more member.”
“Jacopo Raule / Getty Images"Anyone that says or thinks (surrogacy) is just the easy way out is just completely wrong," Kardashian West told Entertainment Tonight.”
“"I think it is so much harder to go through it this way, because you are not really in control."”


"We believe they will be able to keep up with the good news!"
"But we did talk a lot, so I think they were really excited."
"In an episode" keep up with Kardashian "broadcast last April, Kardashian West suffered from placenta accreta when she was pregnant with two children. She revealed that she had complications after undergoing an operation that she had hoped to have another child."
"But that doesn't stop Kardashian West from continuing to expand her family with her 40 year old husband, Kanye West."
"In September, she confirmed that the couple had a third child through surrogacy."
(she revealed on Wednesday's "Ellen DeGeneres Show" that she and West would welcome a girl.)
"Now Kardashian West has publicly said that the surrogacy experience is" really different "from north, 4, and Saint, 1, rather than what she expected."
"Kardashian's west side entourage will soon have one more member."
"It's totally wrong for anyone to say or think (surrogacy) is just a simple way out," Kardashian West told entertainment tonight
"I think it's hard to do that because you don't have real control."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the clip above.”
“ET on CBS.”
“The Late Show airs weeknights at 11:35 p.m.”
“The Hamilton mastermind was among the celebrities to previously share their photos, joining Jimmy Kimmel, Lena Dunham, and Seth Rogen.”
““If only we had one more awkward celebrity puberty photo… but we just don’t.”Not so fast, as Lin-Manuel Miranda emerged from backstage to great applause.”
““We made it so close, but what can we do?” said Colbert of coming up just short of $1 million.”
“Between them all, the total was sitting at $999,000.”
“The money raised for One America Appeal came from CBS, the Americone Dream Fund, Kroll, and his Netflix series Big Mouth.”
“On Thursday’s Late Show, Colbert and Kroll revealed that the #PuberMe campaign has resulted in $1 million raised.”
“Last week, the duo encouraged celebrities to share their most embarrassing photos from their teenage years with each one resulting in a $1,000 donation to Hurricane Maria relief in Puerto Rico.”


"Look at the clip above."
"CBS et."
"The evening program is on at 11:35 PM."
"Hamilton's planner was one of the celebrities who shared their photos before, joining Jimmy Kimmel, Lena Dunham and Seth Logan."
"If only we could take another embarrassing adolescence photo of a celebrity But we just don't do it. " It wasn't that fast. Lynmanuel Miranda was backstage with applause
"We almost succeeded, but what can we do? "Colbert said it was only a million dollars short."
"All in all, it's 999000 dollars."
"Funding for an American appeal came from CBS, the American dream foundation, Kroll and his Netflix series big mouth."
"On Thursday's evening show, Colbert and Kroll revealed that the adolescent movement has raised $1 million."
"Last week, they encouraged celebrities to share their most embarrassing photos of their youth, each of which received $1000 in donations for hurricane Maria rescue in Puerto Rico



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s nice to be back in action.”He also dedicated an Instagram post hours later to Cazzie.”
“We are a family and I appreciate all your love and support.”
“The Saturday Night Live cast member confirmed his split from Larry David‘s daughter, Cazzie, in a PEOPLE exclusive sneak peek of a video interview with Complex’s Open Late with Peter Rosenberg, which drops Thursday evening.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After Davidson, 24, was asked about his relationship status with 24-year-old Cazzie, he revealed, “We’re not together anymore.”“Very talented girl, she’ll be great and she’ll be fine,” he shared.”
““Yeah, I think she’ll be okay.”When Rosenberg said, “you’re going to be okay,” Davidson responded, “yeah, probably,” and added of Cazzie, “she’ll be fine.”Image zoom Cazzie David and Pete Davidson | Credit: Jamie McCarthy/GettyIn May 2016, the actor opened up about dating Cazzie.”
“When asked if he was intimidated about dating Larry’s daughter, Davidson told PEOPLE, “Well, I’m not dating him.”“I just love her very, very much,” he admitted.”
“Davidson said of Larry, 70, “He’s the sweetest man in the world, he’s the coolest,” and added, “We get along really well.”“I listen to everything he says very carefully because you want to retain it all,” the young comedian said.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”


"I'm glad to be back." A few hours later, he wrote a blog post for Kazi on instagram
"We are a family, and I thank you for your love and support."
"The actor, who was broadcast live on Saturday night, confirmed his breakup with Larry David's daughter, Kazi, in a video interview on Thursday night's" complex's open late with Peter Rosenberg. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
When 24-year-old Davidson was asked about his relationship with 24-year-old Kazi, he revealed: "we are no longer together." "A very talented girl, she'll be great, she'll be great," he said
"Yes, I think she'll be OK." When Rosenberg said, "you're going to be OK," Davidson replied, "yes, maybe," Kazi added, "she's going to be OK." Image zooming David and Peter Davidson | credit: Jamie McCarthy / gettin in May 2016, the actor made a public appointment with Katie
Asked if he was afraid of dating Larry's daughter, Davidson told people, "well, I didn't date him." "I just love her very, very much," he admits
"He's the cutest person in the world, he's the coolest person," Davidson said of Larry, 70 "We get along well," he added "I listen to everything he says very carefully because you want to keep everything," the young comedian said
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the “Game of Thrones” Season 7 trailer here or above.”
“The new season will debut July 16.”
“However, five prequel series are currently in the works at the premium cable network, with George RR Martin recently sharing new details on them with fans.”
“Season 7 will be the penultimate season of the incredibly popular fantasy series.”
“Meanwhile, Arya Stark appears to have found her way to the North, where Jon Snow and Sansa rule over Winterfell.”
“Meanwhile, we get brief glimpses of Daenerys’ army of the Unsullied and the Dothraki going to battle with Lannister soldiers.”
“In the trailer, Cersei tells her brother/lover Jaime that enemies surround them on all sides, but she intends to destroy them all.”
“HBO released the first full trailer for “Game of Thrones” Season 7 on Wednesday.”


Check out the game of Thrones Season 7 Trailer here or above
"The new season will premiere on July 16."
"However, five prequels are currently being produced on premium cable, and George RR Martin recently shared new details about them with fans."
"Season seven will be the penultimate season of the most popular fantasy series."
"Meanwhile, Arya stark seems to have found a way to the north, Jon Snow and Sansa ruling winter city."
"At the same time, we can also see that daenerys' incorruptible army and the doslacks are going to fight against the lannisters."
"In the trailer, cersei tells her brother / lover James that they are surrounded by enemies in all directions, but she intends to destroy them all."
HBO released its first full trailer for game of Thrones Season 7 on Wednesday



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 70-year-old actress got emotional while delivering a touching speech at the Christopher & Dana Reeve Foundation's annual "A Magical Evening" Gala in New York City on Thursday, where she reflected on the late actors and her friendship with them both.”
“"My first connection to Christopher Reeve was through Robin Williams, when we were shooting The World According to Garp.”
“It was the summer of 1982, when we were filming on Fishers Island," Close began.”
“"On Friday evenings, Chris would literally swoop in, piloting his own plane, scoop Robin up, and away they would fly for the weekend.”
“On Sunday, late afternoon, Chris would swoop back in and deliver Robin back -- I have to say a little worse for wear."”
“"Those were the heady days for them both," she continued.”
“"They were on top of the world.”
“They were living the kind of fast and crazy life that our business can hand to you if you become a wildly famous phenomenon, practically overnight."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
On Thursday, the 70 year old actress gave a touching speech at the annual "a magical night" Party of the Christopher & danareeve foundation, in which she reviewed the late actors and their friendship
"My first contact with Christopher Reeve was through Robin Williams, when we were filming the world based on Gallup
"It was the summer of 1982, when we were filming on Fisher Island," close began
"On Friday night, Chris will really fly in, fly his own plane, pick up Robin, and then they will fly out for the weekend."
"Later on Sunday afternoon, Chris will fly back to bring Robin back - I have to say he's a little uncomfortable in his clothes."
"It was an exciting day for both of them," she continued
"They're on top of the world."
"They live a fast and crazy life. If you become a very famous phenomenon overnight, our company can give you this kind of life."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brad designed the ring.” The couple had previously declared that they wouldn’t marry until gay marriage was legalized nationwide, but Pitt revealed that they changed their minds for their children’s sake.”
“There’s no date set at this time.”
“Ethiopia...”
“Aniston slammed the spread in a Vanity Fair interview saying There s a sensitivity chip that s missing The Office Space actress also revealed she was unaware of Pitt s Africa vacation saying The world was shocked and I was shocked That same month Jolie Pitt adopted daughter Zahara from...”
“Apparently, the spread was Pitt’s idea and the photos were taken in March.”
“July 2005The two were featured in a spread in W magazine’s July issue titled Domestic Bliss, in which they were were portrayed as a happy 1960s family with children.”
““[Brad and Angelina] wrapped their arms around each other [at the pool] and shared a long, passionate kiss.” Even after the images surfaced, both stars’ reps denied they were in a relationship.”
“It was clear that Brad and Maddox had a close relationship — they were joking around together,” an onlooker told Us at the time.”
““Maddox would hang out with Brad and followed him wherever he went.”
“In the famous photos from the couple’s Kenya vacation, the Troy actor played with Jolie Pitt’s son Maddox in the sand.”


Brad designed the ring. The couple had previously said they would not marry unless same-sex marriage was legalized nationwide, but Pitt revealed that they had changed their mind for the sake of their children
"No date has been set at this time."
"Ethiopia..."
"Aniston attacked this rumor in an interview with vanity fair, saying that a sensitive chip was lost. The office heroine also revealed that she didn't know about Pitt's African holiday, saying that the world was shocked and I was shocked. In the same month, Julie Pitt came from Adopted daughter Zahara. "
"Obviously, it was Pete's idea. The photo was taken in March."
In July 2005, the July issue of W magazine published an article entitled "family happiness", describing them as a happy family with children in the 1960s
"(Brad and Angelina) hugged each other by the pool and shared a long kiss." Even after the photos were exposed, the spokesmen of the two stars denied that they were in love
"It's clear that Brad and Maddox are close - they're joking together," a bystander told us at the time
"Maddox will be with Brad and will follow him wherever he goes."
In a famous photo of the couple on holiday in Kenya, a Trojan actor plays on the beach with Julie Pitt's son Maddox



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Watch below:EXCLUSIVE: 'Walking Dead' Star Jeffrey Dean Morgan Says Key to Success at Home Is Being Crazy on TV This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“I take out the trash."”
“"And my kid thinks I'm cool, so that works.”
“"I'm sweet all the time," Morgan joked.”
“He gets all his bad cop stuff out of the way at work and then he comes home and he's happy dad," Burton explained.”
“'Walking Dead' Star Jeffrey Dean Morgan Says Negan's Brutality Has Inspired 'Weird' Sexual Fan Mail"It's made him good cop at home.”
“ET spoke with the notoriously private pair in January, when Burton revealed why she loves her husband's brutal Walking Dead character, Negan.”
“Getty Images2017 Emmys: The Best and Worst Dressed StarsBurton, 35, and Morgan, 51, are already parents to son Augustus, whom they welcomed in 2010.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Look at the picture below: exclusive." Jeffrey Dean Morgan, the star of walking dead, said that the key to success at home is the craziness on TV. The video can't be played because we can't download information from the sponsors. "
"I take out the garbage."
"My kids think I'm cool, so it works."
"I've always been cute," Morgan joked
"He takes out all the bad cop stuff at work and goes home, and he's a happy dad," Burton explained
Jeffrey Dean Morgan, star of the walking dead, said Nigan's cruelty inspired "weird" sex fan emails "that made him a good cop at home."
"Et talked to the infamous illegitimate children in January, when Burton revealed why she liked her husband's cruel walking corpse character, Nigan."
"Getty Images 2017 Emmy Awards: best dressed and worst dressed 35 year old starsburton and 51 year old Morgan are already parents of their son Augustus, who ushered in their son in 2010."



**Something goes wrong**
““He always misses Dream when she is with Chyna.”In an exclusive sit-down with PEOPLE in July, Chyna insisted she’s committed to co-parenting her daughter with her ex.”
“...he does really care about Dream He loves spending time with her the source said...”
“...wants him to be quiet and not get into any more trouble said the source adding that Kardashian who has long struggled with his weight and depression isn t healthy and isn t making huge efforts to get healthier but...”
“FROM PEN Blac Chyna Recalls the Shocking Moment Rob Kardashian Uploaded Her Most Intimate Photos Online Earlier this week a source told PEOPLE that Kardashian was listening to advice from his family and instructions from his lawyer to behave Everyone...”
“...while accusing her of drug use alcohol abuse and infidelity...”
“Image zoom Credit Prince Williams WireImage The two feuded on social media throughout their relationship but the tension reached its peak on July 5 when Kardashian repeatedly shared graphic and expletive ridden content about his ex including three naked photos...”
“Kanye West who is now married to Kim Kardashian West...”
“The pairing initially raised eyebrows due to Chyna s complicated history with the Kardashian Jenner family She shares a son with Kardashian s sister Kylie Jenner s former boyfriend Tyga and is best friends with Amber Rose an ex of...”
“...in January 2016 when the two went public with their romance...”
“She will always have the right to go back into court if further incidents of domestic abuse occur Still Bloom says this agreement does not resolve all disputes between Chyna and Rob Kardashian and Chyna s roller coaster relationship began...”


"When she was with Zina, he always missed his dreams." In an exclusive interview in July, Zina insisted that she would raise her daughter with her ex girlfriend
“… He really cares about his dream of being with her, the source said
“…… I hope he calms down and doesn't cause any more trouble, "the source added. Kardashian, who has been struggling with weight and depression for a long time, is not healthy and has not made great efforts to become healthier, but..."
"The moment rob Kardashian posted her most intimate picture on the Internet earlier this week was shocking, according to pen Blake chener. A source told people that Kardashian was listening to her family's advice and lawyers' instructions to make everyone behave..."
“… And accused her of drugs, alcohol and infidelity... "
"On July 5, Kardashian repeatedly shared graphics and cursed his predecessor's content, including three nude photos..."
"Kanye West is now married to Kim Kardashian West..."
"The couple initially caught people's attention because of the complex history of Gina and the Kardashian Jenner family. She has a son with TEGA, the ex boyfriend of Kardashian's sister Kelly Jenner, and is best friend with amber Ross, an ex girlfriend... "
“…… In January 2016, they had an open love affair.... "
"If there is further domestic violence, she will always have the right to return to the court," bloom said. The agreement will not solve all the disputes between chener and rob Kardashian. Chener's roller coaster relationship has begun... "



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And according to a report by Daily Mail, it sounds like he had just that.”
“We had already heard that Prince Harry reportedly wanted a “carnival and festival-themed” after-party reminiscent of his favorite London night clubs, complete with vodka-filled ice luges, Wagyu beef, a steel band, and frozen tropical drinks.”
“How thoughtful.”
“Pretty Little Liars star Troian Bellisario, who is married to Meghan’s Suits onscreen husband Patrick J. Adams, showed on Instagram that guests at the afternoon reception were given very fancy slippers to change into if their heels were hurting them.”
“He’s got a wonderfully dry sense of humor.”Guests got to swap their heels for slippers.”
“One guest told the Daily Mail, “Prince Charles made a really gracious speech, it was amazingly endearing.”
“The Mirror notes that Prince Charles spoke of the man his “darling old Harry” had grown into, but he also cracked a joke about changing Prince Harry’s diapers as a kid.”
“Prince Charles, who escorted his new daughter-in-law part of the way down the aisle on Saturday, also reportedly gave a nice speech at the afternoon reception.”
“Photo: Leon Neal/Getty ImagesPrince Charles also gave a nice speech.”
“The couple after the wedding ceremony.”


"According to a report in the daily mail, it sounds like he is."
"It is reported that we have heard that Prince Harry wants to hold a" Carnival and festival theme "reminiscent of his favorite London nightclub after the party, including vodka ice sled, jade beef, steel strip and frozen tropical drinks."
"How thoughtful."
Troian Bellisario, the star of "the beautiful little liar", married her husband, Patrick J. Adams, who was wearing a suit on the screen. She told instagram that guests at the reception in the afternoon would get a pair of very chic slippers. If they hurt their heel, they could change them
"He has a very dry sense of humor." The guests have to change their high heels for slippers
A guest told the Daily Mail: "Prince Charles made a very cordial speech, which was amazing."
The mirror noted that Prince Charles talked about the man he "dear old Harry" grew up to, but he also joked about changing Harry's diapers as a child
According to reports, Prince Charles also made a wonderful speech at the afternoon reception. Prince Charles accompanied his new daughter-in-law down the aisle on Saturday
"Photo: Leon Neal / Getty emans Charles also gave a wonderful speech."
"The couple after the wedding."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"You already know...it's hard out in these streets while trying to do it gracefully in heels...lmao," she tweeted.”
“A fan has recently posted a video of the incident which occurred earlier this month and has seen Kordei being praised for handling the slip so well.”
“Did we mention she was wearing thigh-high high-heeled boots!?”
“The incident reportedly took place in Brazil during the song “Made You Mad” when she can be seen suddenly losing her footing, landing in a half-split before triumphantly flipping her hair and getting on with the performance.”
“Normani Kordei took a tumble while performing onstage with Fifth Harmony at one of their most recent concerts and has landed so perfectly that you could’ve assumed it was part of the routine.”


She tweeted: "you already know It's hard to perform gracefully in high heels on these streets lmao。”
"A fan recently released a video of an incident that happened earlier this month and saw that cordi was praised for handling it so well."
"Did we mention that she was wearing boots!"
"It's reported that this incident happened in the Brazilian song" make you crazy ", when people can see her suddenly fall, fall to the ground half cracked, then happily turn her hair and continue to perform."
"Normani kordei fell on stage with the fifth harmonic at one of their recent concerts and landed so perfectly that you can think of it as part of a regular performance."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She also gets candid about the lengths the couple have to go to for a semblance of privacy.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“The human rights lawyer, 40, gave Vogue a glimpse into her new life as a parent to twins Alexander and Ella – born in June 2017 – for the magazine’s May cover story.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Amal, who speaks three languages, revealed that the babies have said their first words, with husband George Clooney adorably prompting their kickoff into English.”
““We’ve had some ‘Mamas’ and ‘Dadas,’ ” Amal shared.”
““George was very careful to ensure that ‘Mama’ was the first word.”Amal told Vogue that mornings are for the family, with the babies spending “quality time” in their parents’ bed for a couple hours.”
“Despite her busy career, she makes sure not to schedule any calls until after 8 a.m.”
“Image zoom Credit: Annie LeibovitzAmal ClooneyImage zoom Credit: Annie LeibovitzWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Although she remarked that her son is “quite a healthy eater,” breastfeeding twins proved to be challenging.”


"For the sake of superficial privacy, she also said frankly how long it would take the couple."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"The 40 year old human rights lawyer introduced her new life as the parents of Alexander and Ella, twins born in June 2017, to the cover story of vogue magazine in May."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Amar, a trilingual speaker, revealed that the babies had already said their first words, and her husband, George Clooney, lovingly turned their opening remarks into English
"We had some moms and dads," Amar said
"George was very careful to make sure 'Mom' was the first word." Amar told vogue that morning was family time, and the children spent hours "having a good time" in their parents' bed
"Despite her busy career, she made sure she didn't arrange any calls until after 8 a.m."
Image zooming credit: Annie Leibowitz zamar Clooney image zooming credit: Annie Leibowitz wants all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blog? "
Although she said her son was a "fairly healthy dieter," breastfeeding twins proved to be a challenge



**Something goes wrong**
““Well deserved!”The 2018 Oscars were held at the Dolby Theatre at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4 and were telecast live on ABC.”
““Congratulations to my good friend @kobebryant for winning the Oscar for best animated short film,” Johnson, 58, tweeted.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The former Los Angeles Lakers player, 39, took home the Best Animated Short award Sunday night for Dear Basketball.”
“His director and animator Glen Keane thanked Bryant for helping write their award-winning short film.”
“Image zoom Bryant and Keane at the Academy Awards in Los Angeles March 4 | Credit: Kevin Winter/Getty“It’s a message for all of us,” Keane said in his acceptance speech.”
““Whatever form your dream may take, it’s through passion and perseverance that it’s possible.”Bryant chimed in, “Well I don’t know if anything is possible.”
“As a basketball player we’re really supposed to shut up and dribble.”Fox News anchor Laura Ingraham used the phrase “shut up and dribble” last month when she told Cleveland Cavaliers star LeBron James to stop commenting on politics.”
“RELATED VIDEO: We Are Counting Down the Best Moments Between LeBron James and Kobe BryantBryant went on to thank composer John Williams, his wife Vanessa and their three daughters Natalia, 15, Gianna, 11, and Bianka, 14 months.”
““‘I feel better than winning the championship,” Bryant told reporters following his victory.”


"Well deserved! "The 2018 Academy Awards ceremony was held on March 4 at the Dolby theatre in Hollywood and Highland Center and broadcast live on ABC."
Johnson, 58, tweeted: "congratulations to my friend @ KobeBryant for winning the Oscar for best animated short film."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The former Los Angeles Lakers player, 39, won the best animated short film award for" Dear basketball "on Sunday night
"His director and animator Glenn Keane thanks Kobe for helping them create the award-winning short film."
Kobe and Keane take a picture at the Oscars ceremony in Los Angeles on March 4. Photo source: Kevin winter / Getty. "This is a message for all of us," Keane said in his acceptance speech
"No matter what your dream is, it can only be realized through passion and perseverance." Kobe echoed, "I don't know what's possible."
"As a basketball player, we really should shut up and dribble." Fox News Anchor Laura Ingram told Cleveland Cavaliers star LeBron James to stop commenting on politics last month, using the phrase "shut up dribble."
"Related video: we are counting down the best moments between LeBron James and Kobe Bryant. Bryant went on to thank composer John Williams, his wife Vanessa and their three daughters, 15-year-old Natalia, 11-year-old Gianna and 14-month-old Bianca
"I think it's better than winning the championship," Kobe told reporters after the victory



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Roselyn carried a colorful JuJuBe diaper bag in one hand, no doubt practicing for the arrival of her new baby.”
“Baby on board!”
“'I was shocked my first baby was a girl.”
“'When I was pregnant with Sebella, I was convinced I was going to have a boy,' The Game Plan starlet said.”
“After years of trying to get pregnant, the couple attempted multiple rounds of in vitro fertilization before conceiving their sonTheir five-year-old daughter Sebella enjoyed the festivities during the family-filled afternoon, weeks before she becomes a big sister.”
“Layered in lace: The 44-year-old actress kept an undeniably radiant pregnancy glow throughout the afternoon soiree which included a surfboard cake, bubble machine and festive decorations throughout the backyard brunchBubbles!”
“But I am feeling much better.'”
“'It’s been more difficult than the first pregnancy for sure.”
“'I have a high-risk pregnancy because of my age,' Sanchez said.”
“After years of trying to get pregnant, the couple attempted multiple rounds of in vitro fertilization before conceiving their son.”


"With a colorful jujube diaper bag in one hand, Roselyn is undoubtedly practicing to welcome her new baby."
"Baby's on the boat!"
"I was shocked that my first child was a girl."
"When I'm pregnant with Sabella, I'm sure I'll have a boy," said the little star of the game plan
"After years of trying to conceive, the couple tried multiple rounds of IVF before they conceived their son. Their five-year-old daughter, sebella, enjoyed the festival on a family afternoon and became a big sister a few weeks later
"Lace level: the 44 year old actress kept an undeniable shine during her pregnancy at the party all afternoon, including surfboard cakes, bubble machines and holiday decoration bubbles for backyard brunch!"
"But I feel better."
"It must be more difficult than the first pregnancy."
"Because of my age, I have a high risk of pregnancy," Sanchez said
"After years of trying to conceive, the couple tried multiple rounds of IVF before they conceived their son."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So actresses, the verdict is in: Stick to your day jobs.”
“Her character on Modern Family, though, is less business-savvy.”
“Also fun?”
“Making a salary that is often quite a bit higher than what your on-screen counterpart makes.”
“The 15 highest-paid TV actresses made $208.5 million in the 12 months to June, while their on-screen characters would have made about $2.2 million, just 1.1% of the actresses’ total.”
“If the end goal is big money, these actresses should stay on the small screen.”
“Case in point: Kaley Cuoco ranks second on our list, earning $24.5 million between June 1, 2015 and June 1, 2016.”
“Her character on The Big Bang Theory, Penny, is a pharmaceutical sales representative, a career that makes an average salary of $68,173, according to Glassdoor—or 0.28% of Cuoco’s salary.”
“Most of Penny’s fellow television characters don’t fare much better when compared to their real-life corollaries, although The Good Wife’s Alicia Florrick comes the closest.”
“As a partner at prestigious law firm Florrick, Agos and Lockhart, Julianna Margulies’ on-screen persona likely makes in the high six figures a year.”


"So, actresses, the conclusion is: stick to your daily work."
"However, her role in modern family is not very business savvy."
"Is it still fun?"
"Wages tend to be much higher than those on the screen."
"In the 12 months to June this year, the top 15 TV actresses earned $208.5 million, while their on-screen roles earned about $2.2 million, or just 1.1 percent of their total income."
"If the ultimate goal is to make big money, these actresses should stay on the small screen."
"For example: kaley cuoco is second on our list, earning $24.5 million between June 1, 2015 and June 1, 2016."
"Her role in the big bang, penny, is a pharmaceutical sales representative whose average salary, according to Glassdoor, is $68173, or 0.28% of Kuco's salary."
"Compared with the real-life characters, most of Penny's TV colleagues are not performing well, but Alicia florrick in good wife is the closest."
"As a partner of florrick, agos and Lockhart, Juliana Margulies' image on the screen is likely to reach six figures a year."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“DID YOU READ HER BOOK?”
“Everybody’s doing it, all the time.”
“During an interview with OUT magazine, the Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star explained that while she included many happy moments in her book, she didn’t want to get too deep into the hardships and her personal issues.”
““I left all the massive hard things out as I believe one should,” she admitted.”
“According to Erika, 46, she believes everyone should keep certain things to themselves and said she didn’t want to allow her dark moments to bring down the vibe of her publication.”
““I don’t think anybody should know anyone’s whole, complete story because its no one’s but your own, whether you’re famous or not, some things are just [for] you,” she said.”
“The book is playful and meant to be fun and meant to make you smile In other Erika Girardi news the reality star and pop star who is also known as Erika Jayne recently appeared on E s The Daily Pop where she opened up about the sex lives of...”
“...her co stars...”
““They don’t [talk about sex],” she told host Justin Sylvester.”
““I don’t know why because it’s not that big of a deal.”


"Have you read her book?"
"Everyone's doing it, all the time."
"In an interview with out magazine, Beverly Hills star's real housewife explained that although she included many happy moments in the book, she didn't want to get too deep into the hardships and her personal problems."
"I forget all the difficult things because I think it should be done," she admits
"According to Erica, 46, she thinks everyone should keep something secret and says she doesn't want her dark moments to break the atmosphere of the publication."
"I don't think anyone should know the whole, complete story of anyone, because it's not someone else's, it's your own, whether you're famous or not, some things are just for you," she said
"This book is fun, is for fun, is to make you laugh at other Erica Girardi news reality show stars and pop stars who are also known as Erica Jan recently appeared in E's daily pop music, she opened up about sex life..."
“… Her partner... "
"They don't talk about sex," she told host Justin Sylvester
"I don't know why, because it's no big deal."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“McKee executive produces with Shondaland’s Rhimes and Betsy Beers for ABC Studios.”
“Jaina Lee Ortiz and Jason George star along with Jay Hayden, Alberto Frezza, Grey Damon, Okieriete Onaodowan, Danielle Savre and Miguel Sandoval.”
“From the captain to the newest recruit, the show revolves around the men and women as they risk their lives and hearts both in the line of duty and off the clock.”
“Station 19, from Grey’s Anatomy creator Shonda Rhimes’ Shondaland and written by Grey’s executive producer/co-showrunner Stacy McKee, follows a group of heroic firefighters in Washington’s largest city.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllThe series was not an out-of-the-gate hit for the network but has done respectably well ratingswise, averaging a 1.08 in the key 18-49 demo and 5.4 million viewers.”
“Grey’s Anatomy spinoff Station 19 has been renewed for a second season at ABC.”


"McKee executives produce for ABC Studios in partnership with Sundaland's Rhimes and Betsy beers."
"Jenna Lee Ortiz stars with Jason George, as well as Jay Hayden, Alberto Fraser, gray Damon, ogirit onawan, Danielle Safir and Miguel Sandoval."
"From the captain to the recruits, the show revolves around men and women, who risk their lives and hearts at work and after work."
Station 19 is adapted from shodarland by shoda rimes, creator of Gray's anatomy, and written by Stacy McKee, Gray's executive producer / CO star. It tells the story of a group of brave firefighters in Washington's largest city
"Prime time panic your pilot guide and go straight to the series order to see that all the series are not an attack network, but have done quite well with an average score of 1.08 in key 18-49 demos and 5.4 million viewers."
"Gray's anatomy 19 has been on ABC for the second season."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO:”
““Only the Brave” star Miles Teller will play Goose’s son and Maverick’s new protege.”
“Paramount Pictures made the announcement on Wednesday.”
“The extra time will give filmmakers the opportunity to work out the logistics of presenting flight sequences with new technology and planes.”
“The sequel will be set in a world of drone technology and will explore the end of the era of dogfighting, with Cruise portraying a flight instructor.”
“In May, Cruise posted a photo of himself in front of what appeared to be a Boeing F/A-18 Super Hornet.”
““Oblivion” helmer Joe Kosinski is directing the film, a sequel to 1986’s “Top Gun,” from a script by Peter Craig, Justin Marks, and Eric Warren Singer.”
“Jerry Bruckheimer, who produced the first movie with the late Don Simpson, will produce with Cruise and Skydance CEO David Ellison.”
“Goose, the co-pilot to Cruise’s character in the original, was played by Anthony Edwards.”
“He’s working on the script for the sequel.”


Related videos:
"Only brave" star miles Taylor will play the son of goose and the new disciple of calf
"Paramount Pictures announced the news on Wednesday."
"This extra time will give filmmakers an opportunity to work out the logic of presenting flight sequences with new technologies and new aircraft."
"The sequel will take the world of UAV technology as the background to explore the end of dog fighting era, and cruise will play a flight instructor."
"In May this year, cruise posted a picture of himself in front of a plane that looks like a Boeing f / A-18 Super Hornet."
"Forgetting" Helmer Joe Kosinski is directing the film, which is a sequel to the 1986 "top gun," based on the scripts of Peter Craig, Justin marks and Eric Warren Singh
"Jerry brookheimer CO produced his first film with the late don Simpson, which he will co produce with cruise and skydance CEO David Ellison."
"Gus is the co pilot of Cruise's role in the original, played by Anthony Edwards."
"He's writing a script for the sequel."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...this vulgar behavior these crews aren t trust worthy this MTV family is a disgusting gang of power tripping failed producers executives who have failed...”
“As I become the best Farrah I can be I won t let a man or network be little me try to break me lie about who I am to my core I m bullied surrounded hurt by all the manipulation I no longer will allow as a protective mother...”
“After announcing she was “moving on” from the MTV series last month, blasting the show as “hateful” and “horrible,” the reality star is taking legal action, suing parent company Viacom for $5 million.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to court documents obtained by The Blast, Abraham claims she was fired because of her decision to work in the adult entertainment industry.”
“The 26-year-old previously released sex tapes with Vivid Entertainment in 2013 and 2014 with porn star James Deen, and since then, she has done adult webcam shows and appearances at strip clubs.”
“She has also endorsed sex toys.”
““We respect Farrah’s decision to pursue other endeavors and we wish her the best,” a Viacom spokesperson tells PEOPLE.”
“Regarding her suit the claims are without merit In the complaint Abraham who is mom to 8 year old daughter Sophia alleges Viacom wrongfully terminated her employment because she did not conform to gender stereotypes Image zoom Farrah Abraham Credit Rodrigo Varela Getty According to Abraham in October 2017 she...”
“...was confronted by 16 Pregnant and Teen Mom executive producer Morgan J Freeman at her Texas home where she alleges she was harassed humiliated discriminated against disrespected ridiculed degraded and sex shamed for her recent decision to pursue opportunities in the adult entertainment industry Abraham alleges Freeman and his production...”


“… This vulgar behavior of these staff members is not trustworthy, and this MTV family is a disgusting power to trip the failed producers and managers who failed the gang... "
"When I become the best Farah I can, I won't let a man or Internet ego try to break my lies, who am I at my core, I am bullied around, hurt all the manipulators, I'm no longer allowed to be a protective mother..."
The reality star announced last month that she would "move away" from the MTV series, lashing out at the show's "hateful" and "horror", and is taking legal action to sue parent company Viacom for $5 million in damages
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to court documents obtained by the explosion, Abraham claimed that she was fired because she decided to work in the adult entertainment industry."
"The 26 year old released lively and entertaining sex videos with porn star James deen in 2013 and 2014. Since then, she has done adult online video shows and appeared in strip clubs."
"She also supports sex toys."
A Viacom spokesman told people: "we respect Farah's decision, hope she can continue to work hard and wish her all the best."
"With regard to her lawsuit, the plaintiff, Abraham, the mother of her 8-year-old daughter Sophia, claimed that Viacom mistakenly terminated her job because she did not conform to gender stereotypes, which is groundless. According to Abraham, in October 2017, she... "
“…… At her home in Texas, she confronted Morgan J. Freeman, executive producer of 16 pregnant and underage mothers. She claimed that she had been harassed, humiliated, discriminated against, disrespected, ridiculed, belittled and sexually humiliated for her recent decision to seek opportunities in the adult entertainment industry. Abraham accused Freeman and her works... "



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo courtesy of Instagram...”
“What Surgeries Are Involved?”
“While some women are able to lose pregnancy weight and regain their figures through diet and exercise, most women experience physical changes that may require additional help.”
“Fortunately, plastic surgeons are able to perform a mommy makeover to address sagging breasts, loose abdominal muscles and skin, and excess fat in the abdomen, flanks, hips, and thighs.”
“For most patients, a mommy makeover is something that they want to do to look and feel better about themselves.”
“Women may have friends that have had this procedure or know of celebrities or social media stars that have had a surgical body transformation.”
“Such is the case with Teen Mom’s star Briana DeJesus, who recently underwent a Mommy Makeover procedure.”
“What Is a Mommy Makeover?”
“A mommy makeover includes several plastic surgeries, which may be performed at once, to help women reshape and contour their bodies after they have given birth.”
“Many patients will be treated with a breast lift, breast augmentation, tummy tuck, liposuction, and other body contouring treatments.”


"Photo provided by instagram..."
"What operations are involved?"
"While some women are able to lose weight during pregnancy and get back in shape through diet and exercise, most women experience physical changes, which may require additional help."
"Fortunately, plastic surgeons have been able to perform mammoplasty to solve the problems of sagging breasts, flabby abdominal muscles and skin, and excess fat in the abdomen, sides, hips and thighs."
"For most patients, the makeover of Mommy is what they want to do to make themselves look and feel better."
"Women may have friends who have had the surgery, or celebrities or social media stars who know about it."
"That's what happened to teen mom star Briana DeJesus, who recently underwent a mammy conversion operation."
"What's a new look for Mommy?"
"Mammoplasty involves several plastic surgeries, which may be performed at the same time to help women reshape and shape their bodies after childbirth."
Many patients will receive breast augmentation, breast augmentation, abdominal plastic surgery, liposuction and other body shaping treatments



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She closed her response with an all bold question for the USOC: “What’s it going to take for you to do the right thing?””
“In her statement, Raisman called for the board members to clean house and open an independent investigation into why so many adults failed to step in on the athletes’ behalf.”
“She said she and several other athletes blame the USOC for being complicit, failing to protect athletes, and remaining unaccountable for the role they played in allowing Nassar’s behavior to continue.”
“Raisman read a powerful impact statement during the trial last Friday and pointed out that back in August 2016, the Indy Star revealed that the Olympic Committee declined to investigate allegations of Nassar’s abuse.”
“More than 100 women have provided victim impact statements during his hearing, and Nassar is expected to spend the rest of his life behind bars.”
“He has already pleaded guilty to several charges of sexual assault and was sentenced to 60 years in federal prison on three counts of child pornography.”
“...national team doctor has been accused by more than 140 women of sexual abuse...”
“She went on to call them out for not acknowledging their own role in this mess and taking ZERO accountability saying It s like none of us were ever abused Thoughts on USOC s statement pic twitter com hygTV6nNXd Alexandra Raisman Aly_Raisman January 23 2018 Nassar a former U S”
““Over the weekend, the USOC released a statement shamelessly taking credit for a few USAG resignations (note: not fired), as though they’re addressing this problem,” the Needham native said in a statement on Twitter.”
“But Raisman, who has been a vocal advocate for the abused athletes, called out the U.S. Olympic Committee and the sport’s leaders for not going far enough.”


Finally, she asked the USOC a bold question: "what do you need to do to do the right thing?"
"In the statement, Reisman called on board members to clean up and conduct an independent investigation into why so many adults failed to intervene on behalf of athletes."
"She said she and several other athletes accused the USOC of being complicit in failing to protect the athletes and remain irresponsible for their role in allowing Nasar's actions to continue."
"Reisman read a strong statement of influence at the trial on Friday, pointing out that as early as August 2016, the Indy star revealed that the Olympic committee refused to investigate the alleged abuse of Nasar."
"More than 100 women provided victim impact statements at his hearing, and Nasar is expected to spend the rest of his life in prison."
"He has pleaded guilty to several sexual assault charges and has been sentenced to 60 years in federal prison for three child pornography crimes."
“…… National team doctors are accused of sexual abuse by more than 140 women... "
"She continues to call on them not to recognize their role in this chaos and to take zero responsibility, which is just like the statement of the US Olympic Committee that none of us has ever been abused. Picture of twitter website hytv6nnxd Alexandra Reisman ALI / Reisman Nasar, USA before January 23, 2018"
"Last weekend, the U.S. Olympic Committee issued a statement shamelessly admitting several resignations of the U.S. government as if they were solving the problem," Needham said in a twitter statement
"But Reisman has always been a spokesman for these abused athletes. He called on the leaders of the U.S. Olympic Committee and the sports industry not to go too far."



**Something goes wrong**
“The woman once known as "Hottest NBA Wife" also made several appearances on Kourtney and Kim Take Miami, as Kim Kardashian's close friend.”
“Following her positive experience on the Housewives, it was announced that she and Scottie will star in their own reality series on WE tv, titled Big Pippen, slated for a 2013 debut.”
“As she says, when she is not busy turning her three little boys in star athletes or shopping for her princess, Larsa is spending a little time on herself.”
“A snarky beauty as she is, Larsa boasts that she is successful at everything she does, including playing the 24/7 role of a wife and mother of four.”
“As of December 2019 they were in the process if finalizing their divorce.”
“Larsa and Scottie Pippen tied the knot in 1997, and the couple has four children together.”
“The wife of a former NBA star, Scottie Pippen, she earned a spot on the Bravo's reality series Housewives that debuted on February 22, 2011.”
“Born on July 6, 1974, Larsa Pippen rose the fame as star of the TV reality show The Real Housewives of Miami..”
“She is also the ex-wife of NBA Super Star, Scottie Pippen.”
“Larsa Pippen earned fame through her modeling career, and as a member of the cast of The Real Housewives of Miami.”


The woman, once known as "the hottest NBA wife," has also appeared in Courtney and Kim Tucker Miami as Kim Kardashian's close friend
"Following her positive experience on housewives, it is reported that she and Scotty will play in their own reality series, big Pippen, on our TV station (wetv), which is scheduled to premiere in 2013."
"As she said, when she's not busy turning her three little boys into star athletes or shopping for her Princess, Lhasa spends a little time on herself."
"Although Lhasa is a charming beauty, she boasts of her success in everything, including playing a 24-hour wife and a mother of four."
"As of December 2019, they are in the process of divorce."
"Lhasa and Scotty Pippen married in 1997, and the couple have four children."
"As the wife of former NBA star Scotty Pippen, she won a place in the Bravo reality series housewives, which premiered on February 22, 2011."
Born on July 6, 1974, Lassa Pippen became famous for her role in the reality TV show the real housewife of Miami
"She's also the ex-wife of NBA superstar Scotty Pippen."
Lhasa Pippen is famous for her modeling career and a member of the Real Housewives of Miami



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m okay with it.””
“Chmerkovskiy’s DWTS partner, Heather Morris, initially broke the news during a Tuesday appearance on Good Morning America following her Monday night elimination, revealing that Chmerkovskiy could not do the interview with her because of the alleged incident.”
“Shai Aleksander are all okay after an intruder attempted to break into their Los Angeles home...”
“PEOPLE confirmed that Los Angeles police responded to a “civil dispute” on Tuesday morning at the home of the Dancing with the Stars pros after a man tried to break into the property.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Early this morning, there was a trespasser who attempted to break into our home,” Chmerkovskiy, 37, tells PEOPLE.”
““The LAPD responded and my family and I are all okay.”A source tells PEOPLE that a man claiming to own the couple’s rental property tried to get into the residence Monday night.”
“The insider adds that police arrived to peacefully sort out the situation.”
“Image zoom Credit: Stefania Orru/All Things Fam & GlamThe couple’s 3-month-old son, Shai, was in the home at the time.”
“An LAPD spokesman described the incident as a civil dispute telling PEOPLE that officers responded to the 1500 block of Sunset Plaza Drive between 1 30 and 2 a m but made no arrests because there was no crime A police spokeswoman tells PEOPLE that officers suggested that all parties...”


"I don't mind."
"Heather Morris, Mr. chimmelkovsky's DWTS partner, revealed this on Tuesday's" Good Morning America "program after being eliminated on Monday night, and revealed that Mr. chimmelkovsky could not be interviewed because of the so-called incident."
"After an intruder tried to break into their home in Los Angeles, Shay Aleksander was all right..."
"It has been confirmed that Los Angeles police responded to a" civil dispute "at the home of a professional dancer with a star on Tuesday morning after a man tried to break into the property."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Early this morning, an intruder tried to break into our house," zimmerkovsky, 37, told people
"LAPD responded. My family and I are OK." A source told people that on Monday night, a man who claimed to own the couple's rental property tried to enter the house
"The person familiar with the matter added that the police are here to solve the problem peacefully."
"Thanks to the image zooming: the three month old son of Stefania orru / all things fam & glamt, Shai, was at home."
"A spokesman for the Los Angeles Police Department described the incident as a civil dispute. He told people that the police responded to 1500 blocks of sunset square Avenue between 1:30 a.m. and 2:00 a.m., but did not arrest anyone because there was no crime. A police spokesman told people that the police suggested that all parties... "



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED STORIESFamily Devastated as Dream Home They Bought Just 5 Days Ago Burns to the Ground in California WildfireFirefighters Rescue Farm Animals While Battling California Wildfires'Despacito' Singer Daddy Yankee Hand Delivers Boxes of Food in Puerto Rico...”
““Emergency requires that we don’t plan, we don’t meet — we go, we find a kitchen, we get food and we begin cooking and feeding anybody in need," said Andres, who also volunteered his time and skills in Puerto Rico after the devastating hurricanes.”
““We are chefs and we know one thing, which is to feed people.”They’ve gathered in a local mission and are putting together dishes like savory bread pudding using donated ingredients.”
““It’s very simple,” Andres said.”
“Celebrity Chef Jose Andres is also offering his culinary skills and generosity by bringing together local chefs to put together meals for those fighting the fires.”
“Lowe has been posting on Instagram about the wildfires since they began earlier this month, and even uploaded a picture of himself in full fire gear and a garden hose as he attempted to protect his own house.”
“The 270,000-acre wildfire has already destroyed several homes in Montecito and is estimated to have destroyed 1,000 homes in Ventura and Santa Barbara.”
“Officials say it is only 50 percent contained.”
“Another photo caption read: “Thank you to all the crews from all over the country who stood tall and saved my town.”Lowe’s home in Montecito was most recently threatened by the Thomas Fire, which has been burning since Dec. 4.”
““Dinner with our new friends at our house,” Lowe wrote.”


"The family was destroyed because their dream home, which they just bought five days ago, was burned to the ground in a California wildfire. Firefighters rescued farm animals while fighting a California wildfire." desperate "singer Yankee's father personally delivered boxes of food in Puerto Rico..."
"Emergencies require us not to plan, not to meet - we go, we find the kitchen, we get food, we start cooking, we provide food for anyone who needs it," Andres said He also volunteered to invest time and skills in Puerto Rico after a devastating hurricane
"We're cooks, and one thing we know is to feed people." They gathered in a local mission to make delicious bread, pudding and other dishes with donated ingredients
"It's very simple," Andres said
"Famous chef Jose Andres also showed his cooking skills and generosity by calling on local chefs to prepare meals for firefighters."
"Lowe has been posting information about wildfires on instagram since the beginning of this month, and even uploaded a photo of himself wearing fire fighting equipment and garden hose trying to protect his house."
"The 270000 acre wildfire has destroyed several houses in Montecito and an estimated 1000 houses in Ventura and Santa Barbara."
"Officials say it's only 50 percent under control at the moment."
Another photo was titled: "thank you to all the rescuers from all over the country who came forward and saved my city." Roy's home in Montecito was recently threatened by the Thomas fire, which has been burning since December 4
"Dinner at our house with our new friends," Lowe wrote



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My secret to losing the baby weight was just working out and eating healthy and having a real healthy lifestyle,” the 36-year-old tennis champion remarked.”
“Image zoom Serena Williams and daughter Alexis Olympia | Credit: Serena Williams/InstagramDespite missing her daughter’s first steps, Williams’ baby girl previously made a sweet visit to the courts at the All England Club to cheer her mother on to victory.”
“...first milestones...”
“And no one knows that more than Serena Williams.”
“On Saturday, the tennis star revealed that while she was busy training for Wimbledon, her 10-month-old daughter Alexis Olympia took her first steps.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She took her first steps… I was training and missed it,” the 7-time Wimbledon champion wrote on Twitter, adding that she “cried” after learning the news.”
“The new mother is currently still in contention to score her eighth title at the annual tournament, having won her third-round match on Friday, defeating Kristina Mladenovic of France.”
“She will face off against fellow mother Evgeniya Rodina on Monday.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"My secret to losing weight is to exercise, eat healthily and have a really healthy lifestyle," said the 36 year old tennis champion
"Image zooming Serena Williams and her daughter Alexis Olympia | image source: Serena Williams / instagram despite missed her daughter's first step. Williams's baby girl once sweetly came to the all England Club stadium to cheer for her mother's victory."
“… The first milestone... "
"No one knows that better than Serena Williams."
"On Saturday, the tennis star revealed that her 10 month old daughter, Alexis Olympia, took the first step while she was busy training at Wimbledon."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She took the first step I was training, but I missed it, "the seven time Wimbledon champion wrote on twitter, crying after hearing the news
"The new mother is still fighting for her eighth title in the annual championship, which she won by beating Christina mladovic of France in the third round on Friday."
"She will fight her mother evgenia Rodina on Monday."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more Gold Derby entertainment news.”
“Find out which other winners have also raised their voice in song by clicking through the photo gallery above.”
“...drag queens...”
“In the photo gallery above, catch up with each of these fierce fillies.”
“The very first winner was BeBe Zahara Benet who edged out runner-up Nina Flowers way back on March 23, 2009.”
“Since she sashayed off with the title, BeBe has been one busy bee.”
“She released eight singles and one EP, “Kisses & Feathers.” And she just made it to the final four on “RuPaul’s Drag Race All Stars 3.”Trixie Mattel won that special edition of the franchise, pulling off an upset over frontrunner Kennedy Davenport on March 15, 2018.”
“That day was a banner one for Trixie as it was also when she dropped her second album, “One Stone.” She has been promoting this platter around the country.”
“As you will see, the styles that have won over the judges have varied over the years, with some drop-dead beauties including season 3 champ Raja.”
“See our contest rules and sound off with other fans in our reality TV forum.”


"Read more golden Derby entertainment news."
"Click on the photo gallery above to find out which other winners have also raised their voices in the song."
“… "Drag queen..."
"In the photo gallery above, catch up with these ferocious little mares."
"The first champion was Bebe Zahara Bennett, who beat runner up Nina flowers on March 23, 2009
"Since she left with her title, Beibei has been a busy bee."
"She released eight singles and one EP kiss and feather. She just made it to the top four in "All Star 3 of Rubal's drag game.". Trichet Martel won the special edition of the series, beating lead runner Kennedy Davenport on March 15, 2018. "
"It was an important day for Trixie, and it was when she gave up her second album, a stone, and she was promoting it all over the country."
"As you will see, the style of winning the judges has changed a lot over the past few years, with some dying beauties, including season 3 champion Raja."
"Look at the rules of our game and speak with other fans on our reality show forum."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““New Girl” Season 7 kicks off on Fox Tuesday night at 9:30 p.m.POPULAR VIDEO ON VARIETY”
“Stay-at-home dad Schmidt and working mom Cece are raising their daughter, Ruth, and Winston and Aly are married, with a child on the way.”
“While fans are already mourning the end of the popular Fox comedy series, star Zooey Deschanel said filming the end of the show was not a sad occasion.”
““It felt like we were ready for it to be the end, in a bittersweet way,” Deschanel told Variety.”
““But it wasn’t difficult.”
“It was like finishing a marathon, like we did this really long run for seven years and we’ve played these characters a long time.”
“It’s not like there was any unfinished business.”
“It felt like the right time to be ending it in the best way.”
“I’m sad not to see my friends that I’ve worked with every day for so long, but it was all really positive in the end.”“I really wanted to do another season just so that we could send the show off properly,” she continued.”
““I appreciated that opportunity.”The seventh season picks up three years after the Season 6 finale.”


New Girl Season 7 will be on Fox at 9:30 p.m. on Tuesday
"Stay at home father Schmidt and working mother Ceci are raising their daughter Ruth, Winston and Ellie are married, and there is a child on the way."
"Although fans are already mourning the ending of the fox comedy series, star Zoe de Chanel said that shooting the ending of the series is not a sad moment."
"It feels like we're ready for it to end in a bittersweet way," Deschanel told variety
"But it's not hard."
"It's like finishing a marathon, like we've been running for seven years, and we've been playing these roles for a long time."
"It doesn't seem like an unfinished business."
"It feels like it's time to end in the best way."
"I'm sorry I didn't see my friends. I worked together for such a long time every day, but in the end I was very positive." "I really want to do another season so we can show it properly," she continued
"I appreciate the opportunity." Season seven starts three years after season six



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The scenario dictates his role.”Think Mario was ever a real doctor?”
““With (1983's) Mario Bros., we brought in Luigi and a lot of the game was played underground so we made him to fit that setting and, we decided he could be a plumber,” Miyamoto previously told USA Today.”
“According to Shigeru Miyamoto, the character, then named “Jumpman,” was “basically a carpenter” in 1981's Donkey Kong, because the game takes place on a construction site.”
“As a matter of fact, he also seems to have worked as a plumber a long time ago...AdvertisementMario hasn’t always been a plumber.”
“Here is how the recently uploaded Mario profile explains the character:All around sporty, whether it’s tennis or baseball, soccer or car racing, he [Mario] does everything cool.”
“Doesn’t appear so!”
“But doesn’t going down Warp Pipes count?”
“This shouldn’t be a total surprise, because the character seems to do everything but plumbing.”
“According to Mario’s newly updated, official Japanese-language profile, the iconic character isn’t working as a plumber.”


"The scene determines his character." Do you think Mario used to be a real doctor? "
Miyamoto previously told USA Today: "with the help of the Mario Brothers (1983), we introduced Luigi. Many games are played underground, so we let him adapt to this environment, and we decided that he could become a plumber."
"According to Miyamoto, the character, then called 'flying man', was" basically a carpenter "in 1981's King Kong donkey, because the game took place on a construction site."
"In fact, he seems to have worked as a plumber a long time ago Mario doesn't always work as a plumber. "
"Here's how Mario's profile was recently uploaded to explain the characters: in all directions, whether it's tennis or baseball, football or racing, he (Mario) is athletic and everything is cool."
"It doesn't look like that!"
"But isn't it a pipe down?"
"It shouldn't be a complete surprise, because the character seems to do everything but pipe."
"According to Mario's latest official Japanese profile, this iconic figure is not a plumber."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I would feel pretty alone if I didn’t have a partner in crime in all of this.””
“I’m your kid!’ But I’m so lucky to have that.”
“Charlize Theron has gradually learned this throughout her years as a mother-of-two, and just even revealed that her own children, Jackson and August, can sometimes be “a–holes”!”
““I just see things clearer.”
“A child in my twenties was the scariest idea I could think of.”
“When I got to my thirties, I was so ready.”
“But there’s a moment where you’re like, ‘Oh God, I hope once I have my kids, I’m still going to want to be a parent this much,'” she explained to ELLE.”
““I have bad days.”
“I make mistakes.”
“Going through the tantrum stages when they’re such little a–holes.”


"If I didn't have a criminal partner in all this, I would feel lonely."
"I am your child! "But I'm lucky to have this."
Charlize Theron, a mother of two, has learned this over the years, even revealing that her children, Jackson and Auguste, can sometimes be "a hole!"
"I just see better."
"A kid in his twenties is the scariest idea I can think of."
"In my thirties, I'm ready."
"But there's a moment when you say, 'oh my God, I hope once I have children, I'll still want to be a parent,'" she explained to eller
"I have a hard time."
"I made a mistake."
"When they're a small hole, they go through the stage of losing their temper."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[wdi_feed id=”1″]”
“In June 2017, Kim visited Tokyo with husband Kanye West for a surprise trip for his 40th birthday.”
“Meanwhile, Kim posted images of what looked like hot pink toy car (that matched her hair, obvs) but was actually a flip phone.”
“The trio sisters appear to be having a blast, taking to Instagram to share several images of the girls-only vacay.”
“Despite being in her third trimester, the pregnant reality star wanted to go on a final trip with her beloved sisters.”
“Kim Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian hit up Toyko on Monday for one last sister trip with Khloe Kardashian, who is 8-months pregnant, before she gives birth to her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“Olivia Anderson – World Stars MagThe Kardashians are big in Japan!”


“[wdi_ feed id=”1〃]”
"In June 2017, Kim Jong Il and her husband Kanye West visited Tokyo for a surprise trip for his 40th birthday."
Meanwhile, Kim released a photo that looked like a pink toy car (matching her hair and obv) but was actually a flip phone
"The three sisters seem to have a good time. They shared a few pictures of vacay girls on instagram."
"Even though she is three months pregnant, the pregnant reality TV star still wants to go on her last trip with her beloved sisters."
"Kim Kardashian and kurtany Kardashian met with Toyko on Monday for their last sisterhood trip with eight month pregnant Khloe Kardashian before giving birth to their first child with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson."
"Olivia Anderson - the kardashians are big stars in Japan!"



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hugh Hefner's life reminds us that the cutting edge can grow dull.”
“He promoted jazz, and financed legal cases for free speech, civil rights and abortion rights.”
“When I was growing up in Chicago, the formidable women who were my mother's friends considered Playboy a good place to work for a single woman.”
“Women at the Playboy Club were well-paid, got chauffeured home in cabs, and customers — stars, politicians, even, it was rumored, spoiled Middle Eastern princes — were thrown out if they weren't gentlemen.”
“My Auntie Abba trained Playboy bunnies.”
“When Gloria Steinem and others said the bunny costume which wrenched a woman s bodice upwards so her chest resembled ice cream scoops were Exhibit A in the way Hugh Hefner made women into idealized sex objects my Auntie Abba sniffed and said Well they wear some pretty ridiculous costumes...”
“...at the Metropolitan Opera too...”
“Hugh Hefner was considered progressive and hip, in a time of button-down shirts and bigotry.”
“Playboy printed articles by Nobel laureates on the flip side of foldouts.”
“Hugh Hefner hired the late Dick Gregory and other black comics to work the Playboy Clubs when nightclubs were largely segregated.”


"Hugh Hefner's life reminds us that the edge may become dull."
He promoted jazz and funded legal proceedings for freedom of speech, civil rights and abortion rights
"When I grew up in Chicago, my mother's friends thought Playboy was a good place for single women to work."
"The women in the Playboy Club are well paid, they're driven home, and customers - stars, politicians, even the legendary spoiled Prince of the Middle East - are thrown out if they're not gentlemen."
"My aunt and dad train Playboy rabbits."
"When Gloria Steinem and others say that the rabbit costume twists a woman's bra up, making her breasts like ice cream spoons, Hugh Hefner turns women into idealized sex objects. My aunt and dad sniff and say that they are wearing some ridiculous clothes..."
“… At the Metropolitan Opera House, too... "
"Hugh Hefner is considered progressive and fashionable in an era of shirt buttons and paranoia."
"Playboy printed the Nobel Prize winner's article on the back of the fold."
"Hugh Hefner hired the late Dick Gregory and other black comics to work for the Playboy Club while the nightclub was basically segregated."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photos by WENN.com, Getty Images...”
“She lived in Toronto and they saw each other a handful of times in between his royal duties in London.”
“Oddly, Meghan hopped a flight to Los Angeles a day after she made her first public appearance on Harry's arm since they announced their unlikely engagement.”
“Tongues were wagging in London when Meghan jetted to L.A. to visit her mom, Doria Ragland, for two weeks.”
“Many Brits say it is highly inappropriate for a newly-engaged woman to suddenly abandon her fiancé and fly to another continent 5,000 miles away.”
“Brits say Meghan tricked poor lovestruck Harry into proposing to her by promising she would move to London.”
“She even shipped one of her rescue dogs to London just to show him she was serious.”
“Relationship experts say women like Meghan, who are products of divorced parents, are damaged goods who show more ambivalence and tend to keep their significant others at arms length.”
“The 36-year-old American actress hardly saw Prince Harry in the year that they dated.”
“She also lived apart from her first husband, Trevor Engelson, before dumping him for a celebrity chef in Toronto.”


Photo author, Getty pictures... "
"She lives in Toronto and they met several times during his royal duties in London."
"It's strange that Megan appeared on Harry's arm for the first time after announcing that they were unlikely to be engaged, and jumped on the flight to Los Angeles one day later."
"When Megan flew to Los Angeles to see his mother, Doria Raglan, for two weeks, there was a lot of talk in London."
"Many Britons say it's very inappropriate for a newly engaged woman to suddenly abandon her fiance and fly to another continent 5000 miles away."
"The Englishman said Megan cheated poor Harry into proposing to her and promising her to move to London."
"She even brought a rescue dog to London just to show him she was serious."
Relationships experts say women like Megan are the product of divorced parents. They are damaged goods, show more ambivalence and tend to keep away from important others
"The 36 year old American actress hardly met Prince Harry in the year they were dating."
"She also separated from her first husband, Trevor engelson, and later left him to a famous chef in Toronto."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sligh made news Thanksgiving 2014 when he was beaten by two men in a Los Angeles Rite Aid parking lot, suffering a broken arm and multiple injuries.”
“The child said Sligh also grabbed her hand, forcing her to touch him inappropriately.”
“According to the paper, the Walton County Sheriff’s Office was contacted Sept. 27 by a mother who said Sligh touched her young daughter inappropriately while they were vacationing on an area beach.”
“The Northwest Florida Daily News reports that Sligh faces additional child molestation charges in Walton County, Florida.”
“Police reported that the molestation took place between April and September 2016.”
“Sligh was arrested in October 2016 after parents of the victim, who was under the age of 10, reported the molestation in September of that year.”
“The model/actor played a bartender on "The Young and the Restless," and appeared on TV's “All About Lizzie."”
“Sligh, a Georgia native, has not been sentenced but faces five to 20 years in prison on the felony child molestation conviction, according to The Cherokee Tribune.”
“He was cleared of another count of molestation.”
“A Cherokee County jury convicted Sligh, 30, last month of one count of child molestation, according to court records.”


"Sley made the news on Thanksgiving in 2014 when he was beaten by two men in a courtesy aid parking lot in Los Angeles, with broken arms and multiple injuries."
"The child said sley still held her hand and forced her to touch him improperly."
According to the newspaper, Walton County Sheriff's office received a phone call on September 27 from a mother who said sley improperly touched her little daughter while on holiday at the local beach
Sley faces more child molestation charges in Walton County, Florida, according to the Florida northwest daily
"Police reported that the indecency occurred between April and September 2016."
"Sley was arrested in October 2016, when the victim's parents were under the age of 10, and they reported the indecency in September of that year."
The model / actor played a bartender in young people and the restless and appeared in the TV series all about Lizzie
According to Cherokee Tribune, a Georgia native, slim has not been sentenced, but faces five to 20 years in prison for child molestation
"He was excluded from another indecent offence."
According to court records, a Cherokee County jury last month found 30-year-old sley guilty of child molestation



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[31]Track listings [ edit ]Digital download[32]"Échame la Culpa" – 2:53Digital download – Not on You remix[33]"Échame la Culpa" (Not on You remix) – 2:53Charts [ edit ]Certifications [ edit ]Release history [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“(English: What's up Demi?)”
“[7] On November 14, 2017, Lovato took to social media to announce the song's release, along with a snippet of the song featuring only her part,[8][9][10][11] as Fonsi posted a shot of himself lying in bed with pillows covered in the song's title.”
“[6] In a clip shared by Billboard on November 13, 2017, Lovato and Fonsi can be seen meeting each other via a FaceTime call to discuss details about their collaboration.”
“He also revealed that the song would premiere in two weeks.”
“[5] In an interview with Billboard at iHeartRadio Fiesta Latina in Miami, Fonsi admitted: "It's a fun song, a fun record, we already filmed the video."”
“[4] On November 1, 2017, MTV News reported that the collaboration will be titled "Échame la Culpa", a song Fonsi has been performing solo during live shows across the summer.”
“It's a wrap",[3] to which Lovato replied: "Hola Fonsi".”
“Release and promotion [ edit ]Lovato first teased a photo from the music video shoot via Instagram on October 21, 2017,[2] to which Fonsi commented: "What's up Demi...", and later posted a behind-the-scenes picture on his own Instagram, captioned: "Finished!”
“The song is certified Platinum or higher in ten countries, including Diamond in Brazil and Mexico.”


"[31] track list [Edit] digital download [32]" É chame La culpa "– 2:53 digital download – not in your mix [33]" É chame La culpa "– 2:53 chart [Edit] certificate [Edit] release history [Edit] see also [Edit]"
"What's the matter with Demi?"
"[7] on November 14, 2017, Lovato announced the release of the song on social media, and also released fragments of the song, of which only part was her, [8] [9] [10] [11] Fang Xi released a picture of herself lying in bed, with a pillow on the Title."
"[6] in a video shared by billboard on November 13, 2017, Lovato and Fonsi can be seen meeting by phone through FaceTime to discuss the details of their cooperation."
"He also revealed that the song will premiere in two weeks."
"[5] in an interview with billboard of iHeartRadio Fiesta latina in Miami, Fonsi admitted:" it's an interesting song, an interesting record, and we've made a video. "
[4] On November 1, 2017, MTV News reported that the cooperation will be entitled "É chame La culpa", a song that Fonsi sang solo during his live performance all summer
"It's a package," Lovato replied, "hello."
"Release and promotion [editor] Lovato first teased a picture in a music video taken through instagram on October 21, 2017, [2] Fang Xi commented on this:" Hello, Demi... " Later, he posted a behind the scenes photo on his instagram titled "done!"
"The song is platinum or higher in 10 countries, including diamonds from Brazil and Mexico."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Celebrity Fan Photos and Agency Pictures of stars are © to their respective owners.”
“Other vital statistics like weight or shoe size measurements have been sourced from newspapers, books, resumes or social media.”
“Average Guess 3 Votes Peak 5ft 9 33in 176 1cm Current 5ft 8 5in 174cm Heights are barefeet estimates derived from quotations official websites agency resumes in person encounters with actors at conventions and pictures films...”
“½ Peak Height 5ft 7 ½ 5ft 7 ¾ 5ft 8 5ft 8 ¼ 5ft 8 ½ 5ft 8 ¾ 5ft 9 5ft 9 ¼ 5ft 9 ½ 5ft 9 ¾ 5ft 10 5ft 10 ¼ 5ft 10 ½ 5ft 10 ¾ 5ft 11 5ft 11 ¼ 5ft 11 ½”
“Comment Your Guess Optional 5ft 6 ½ 5ft 6 ¾ 5ft 7 5ft 7 ¼ 5ft 7 ½ 5ft 7 ¾ 5ft 8 5ft 8 ¼ 5ft 8 ½ 5ft 8 ¾ 5ft 9 5ft 9 ¼ 5ft 9 ½ 5ft 9 ¾ 5ft 10 5ft 10 ¼ 5ft 10”
“Television Presenters You May Be Interested Oprah Winfrey 5ft 6 168 cm 5ft 6 168 cm Charlie Rose 6ft 1 185 cm 6ft 1 185 cm Hoda Kotb 5ft 9 175 cm 5ft 9 175 cm Katie Couric 5ft 2 ½ 159 cm 5ft 2 ½ 159 cm Add a...”
“On twitter she once called herselfand mentioned her weight in 2016, how she went from 184.5 pounds and lost 25 pounds with weight watchers.”
“Photos by PR Photos Photos by PR Photos American TV presenter, who is a co-host at CBS This Morning.”
“Gayle King's Height 5ft 8 ½ (174 cm) Peak height was 5ft 9 ½ (176.5 cm) "5'10" and mentioned her weight in 2016, how she went from 184.5 pounds and lost 25 pounds with weight watchers.”


"Celebrity fan photos and brokerage company photos of the star are owned by their respective owners."
"Other important statistics, such as weight or shoe size measurements, come from newspapers, books, resumes or social media."
"The average guess is 3 votes, and the peak value is 5 ft 9 33 in 1761 cm. The current height of 5 ft 8 5 in 174 cm is barefoot. It's estimated that the CV of the organization quoted from the official website has personal contact with the actors in conferences and movies..."
"1 / 2 peak height 5ft 7 / 5 ft 7 / 5 ft 8 / 5 ft 8 / 5 ft 8 / 5 ft 9 / 5 ft 9 / 5 ft 9 / 5 ft 9 / 5 ft 9 / 5 ft 10 / 5 ft 10 / 5 ft 10 / 5 ft 10 / 5 ft 11 / 5 ft 11 / 5 ft 11 / 5"
"To comment on your guess, you can choose 5ft 6 / 5ft 6 / 5ft 7 / 5ft 7 / 5ft 7 / 5ft 7 / 5ft 7 / 5ft 8 / 5ft 8 / 5ft 8 / 5ft 8 / 5ft 8 / 5ft 9 / 5ft 9 / 5ft 9 / 5ft 9 / 5ft 10 / 5ft 10"
"TV presenter, you may add Oprah Winfrey 5 ft 6 168 cm 5 ft 6 168 cm Charlie Ross 6 ft 1 185 cm 6 ft 1 185 cm Hoda Kotb 5 ft 9 175 cm 5 ft 9 175 cm Katie Couric 5 ft 2 / 159 cm 5 ft 2 / 159 cm..."
"On twitter, she once called herself to talk about her weight in 2016, how she lost 184.5 pounds to 25 pounds, and how she lost weight with weight watchers."
American TV host, CBS co host this morning
"Gail King's height is 5 ft 8 / 2 (174 cm), peak height is 5 ft 9 / 2 (176.5 cm)" "5 ft 10", she mentioned her weight in 2016, how she reduced from 184.5 pounds to 25 pounds



**Something goes wrong**
“Madam Secretary airs Sundays at 10 PM on CBS.”
“Barbara Hall, Lori McCreary, David Grae, Eric Stoltz and Morgan Freeman are executive producers for CBS Television Studios in association with Revelations Entertainment.”
“In addition to Leoni, Madam Secretary stars Tim Daly, Zeljko Ivanek, Keith Carradine, Sebastian Arcelus, Patina Miller, Geoffrey Arend, Erich Bergen, Kathrine Herzer, Wallis Currie-Wood and Evan Roe.”
“Ramirez previously won a Tony Award for her performance in Monty Python’s Spamalot.”
“She’s currently the voice of Queen Miranda on Disney Jr.’s hit animated series Sofia the First and the voice of Mamá Calaca in Vampirina.”
““From the moment she walked on set with her talent, intellect and spirit, she became part of the family!”This is Ramirez first series regular TV role since her departure last year from ABC’s Grey’s Anatomy, where she appeared for over a decade as Dr. Callie Torres.”
““She brings a fresh perspective and a fun, energetic quality to the State Department staff.”“We are thrilled to have Sara join the Madam Secretary State Department team,” said Lori McCreary, executive producer.”
““We’re very excited that Sara is joining the cast,” said Barbara Hall, executive producer and series creator.”
“CBS says Ramirez’s character will be introduced the November 19 episode.”
“Ramirez will play Kat Sandoval, a brilliant political strategist, legendary in D.C. for her talent and for abruptly dropping out of politics until Elizabeth (Téa Leoni) manages to coax her back into the State Department.”


"Mrs. Secretary of state on CBS at 10 p.m. Sunday."
"Barbara hall, Lori mcleary, David gray, Eric Stoltz and Morgan Freeman are executive producers at CBS television studios, working with Apocalypse entertainment."
"In addition to Lionel, the wife of the Secretary of state stars Tim Daley, Zeljko ivanek, Keith kaladin, Sebastian arcelos, pattina Miller, Geoffrey Arend, Erich Bergen, Katherine herzer, Wallis curry wood and Evan Rowe."
"Ramirez previously won the Tony Award for his performance in Python."
"She is currently the voice of Queen Miranda in little Disney's hit cartoon Sofia one, and also the voice of Mama Karaka in vampire."
"From the moment she came into the set with talent, intelligence and spirit, she became a member of the family! "This is Ramirez's first regular role in a TV series since she left ABC's" Grey's Anatomy "last year, where she worked as Dr. Callie Torres for more than a decade."
"She brings a new perspective and interesting, dynamic quality to the State Department staff." "We're very happy to have Sarah on the Mrs. secretary's team," said executive producer Lori McCreary
"We're very excited to have Sarah on the set," said Barbara hall, executive producer and creator of the show
"CBS said the role of Ramirez will be broadcast on November 19."
"Ramirez will play Kate Sandoval, a brilliant political strategist who is legendary in Washington because of her talent and sudden withdrawal from politics until Elizabeth (t é a Leoni) successfully persuades her to return to the State Department."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just didn’t want to give up.””
“Time will pass you by, life will pass you by.”
““I want to put your story to one side and judge you as a singer, it was amazing … It was remarkable.”Following her performance, Harvey further explained to host Tyra Banks: “There’s really not much you can do if you stay on the ground.”
“You haven’t heard Adele, Ed Sheeran, Taylor Swift, but your voice is so current, so amazing,” Cowell told Harvey.”
“My emotions feel like I’m in a washing machine.”“You lost your hearing 10 years ago.”
“Cowell was overcome with emotions, so much so, that he said, “I can’t take much more of this.”
““‘I have two choices: I can stay here forever or I can make the difficult choice to stand up and move forward and run.’ That’s what got me here today,” she recalled of her decision to try out for the 12th season of AGT.”
“'” said Harvey, whom Cowell chose as the recipient of his coveted Golden Buzzer during the auditions.”
“...and thought to myself ‘Is this it?”
““One day I was walking and I fell down the stairs, I couldn’t move.”


"I just don't want to give up."
"Time will pass, life will pass."
"I want to put your story aside and judge you as a singer, which is great It's amazing After her performance, Harvey further explained to the host, Tara banks, "if you stay on the ground, you really have nothing to do."
"You haven't heard Adele, ed Sheeran, Taylor Swift, but your voice is so loud, so wonderful," Cowell told Harvey
"My mood is like in a washing machine." "You lost your hearing 10 years ago."
Cowell was so emotional that he said, "I can't stand it."
"I have two choices: I can stay here forever, or I can make hard choices and stand up and run forward." That's why I'm here today, "she recalled her decision to play AGT for the 12th season."
"Harvey said that Cowell chose Harvey as the recipient of his dream golden buzzer in the audition."
“…… I thought, "is that it?"
"One day when I was walking, I fell down the stairs and couldn't move."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m just putting it out there into the universe because I’m harboring a little secret idea and we’ll see what happens!”Dawson’s Creek is currently streaming on Hulu.”
“But in my mind, I have this thought that there’s a way to suspend your disbelief where everyone can get the happily ever after,” she said at the time.”
“However, Dawson’s parents, played by Mary-Margaret Humes and John Wesley Shipp, were not invited.”
““OK, so let me get this off my chest as the initial hurt has subsided just a bit,” Humes, 63, wrote in an Instagram post on Thursday, March 29.”
“I send an enormous amount of love and shout outs to the thousands of followers messages and love that both johnwesleyshippjr and I have read about being left out of entertainmentweekly s dawsonscreek reunion photos She continued This was their choice not ours it was done behind our backs and...”
“...we both were literally blindsided by it when we woke up yesterday in NYC and LA”
“We both did a short telephone interview after the fact, but were never told about the reunion.”
“For months, I have been posting #behindthescenes photos to share my experiences of six years on this show.”
“We were a family I know how much the photos mean to you from all the love you send me in comments Yes I do read them She went on to explain that she will continue posting throwback photos from her time on the show and couldn t be more...”
“...thankful for her costars and for the fans...”


"I just put it in the universe, because I have a little secret, let's see what happens! "Dawson Creek is running on Hulu at the moment."
"But in my opinion, I have an idea that there is a way to make you no longer doubt that everyone can get happiness from then on," she said at the time
However, Dawson's parents, played by Mary Margaret Hume and John Wesley Heep, were not invited
Humes, 63, wrote on instagram on Thursday, March 29: "well, let me talk about it, because the initial pain has eased a little."
"I sent out a lot of love and cry to thousands of followers. Both John sleichp and I read about the news and love of being excluded from the entertainment industry. She continued that it was their choice, not ours. It was done behind our backs, and..."
"When we woke up in New York and Los Angeles yesterday, we were blinded by it."
"We all did a short telephone interview afterwards, but no one told us about the reunion."
"For months, I've been releasing photos of backward scenes to share my six years of experience on this show."
"We are a family, and I know how important these photos are to you, because of the love you gave me in the comments. Yes, I did read these photos, and she went on to explain that she will continue to post photos of her time in the show, and there are no more..."
“… Thanks to her partner and fans... "



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Next: Kate’s relationship with her father-in-law seems a bit strained.”
“She and her royal grandmother have only grown closer since then.”
“Lady Louise of WindsorThen-8-year-old Lady Louise Windsor watches the London 2012 Paralympic Games with the Duchess of Cambridge.”
“3.”
“Next: A 22-year age gap doesn’t hurt this relationship.”
“It seems the princess has a future of her own to focus on.”
“Both the royal family and her fiance’s family expressed delight over the upcoming nuptials.”
“In January 2017, Buckingham Palace announced Eugenie’s engagement to long-term boyfriend Jack Brooksbank.”
“But Eugenie is reportedly on good terms with the whole family, especially Princes William and Harry.”
“Of course, Eugenie remains most loyal to her sister, Princess Beatrice (more on that drama later).”


"Next: Kate's relationship with her father-in-law seems a little strained."
"Since then, she and her royal grandmother have become closer and closer."
"Madame Windsor - 8-year-old Lady Louise Windsor and Duchess of Cambridge watch the 2012 London Paralympics."
“3.”
"Next step: the 22-year-old age gap won't hurt the relationship."
"It seems that the princess has her own future to focus on."
"The royal family and the fiance's family are happy with the coming wedding."
"In January 2017, Buckingham Palace announced Eugenie's engagement to her longtime boyfriend Jack Brooksbank."
"But Eugenie and her family are reported to have a good relationship, especially Prince William and Prince Harry."
"Of course, Eugenie is still the most loyal to her sister Princess Beatrice (I'll talk about the play later)."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To get full episodes, behind-the-scenes video and more, sign up for the weekly Dead Alert.”
“Click here to add the premiere to your calendar.”
“The Walking Dead returns Sunday, February 25 at 9/8c on AMC.”
“Angela is a big part of the heart and soul of The Walking Dead, and I’m thrilled to help facilitate her vision of the show’s next era."”
“The Walking Dead with new narratives like Fear the Walking Dead and a whole host of truly cool stories ahead...”
“As the show closes in on its tenth year I can t wait to keep working with the talented dedicated people behind and in front of the camera to make it all it can be while expanding the world of...”
“...stories that excite audiences and make them deeply connect with its characters adapting Robert Kirkman s brilliant comic book Gimple said...”
“Binge the First Eight Episodes of The Walking Dead Season 8 The Walking Dead is a special show which started in an entirely different era of TV and continues in this new era to confidently take chances to tell compelling...”
“Executive Producer Angela Kang, who has been a writer/producer on the show since 2011, is being promoted by Gimple to showrunner of The Walking Dead, beginning with season nine.”
“Dead Fear the Walking Dead and potential franchise extensions on a variety of platforms...”


"For full episodes, behind the scenes videos, etc., please register for weekly death alert."
"Click here to add the premiere to your calendar."
"Return of the walking dead Sunday, February 25, 9:8 am at AMC."
"Angela is the soul and an important part of the soul of the walking dead, and I'm happy to help her realize her vision of the next era of the play."
"Walking dead and new stories like fear walking dead and a bunch of really cool stories ahead..."
"As the tenth year approaches, I can't wait to continue working with talented and dedicated people in front of and behind the camera to expand "Do the best you can in the world."
“… The exciting story connects the audience with the characters in Robert Kirkman's wonderful comic book "gimple said"
"The first eight episodes of the eighth season of binge drinking" the walking dead "is a special program. It started in a completely different era of television, and in this new era, it continues to confidently seize the opportunity to tell convincing stories..."
"Executive producer Angela Kang has been the screenwriter / producer of the show since 2011 and will be promoted from gimple to the producer of the walking dead from the ninth season."
"The dead are afraid of the walking dead and the potential franchise expansion on various platforms..."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s in a very good place.””
““We’re all super supportive of her, so she’s good,” Bure added.”
“He was later placed under arrest.”
“Police also found a firearm on Hodak which is illegal as he is a convicted felon.”
“...when he pulled down a 7 foot bookcase...”
“RELATED Prince William talks about the shock of losing his mother and how he s never truly recovered According to legal docs Sweetin claimed Hodak had been abusing drugs and alcohol on the night of the incident and things escalated...”
“Sweetin was granted a restraining order against her ex that he then violated two times.”
““She’s being a trooper and handling everything with grace.”Sweetin and Hodak were together for nearly three years before an explosive fight led to their breakup.”
“News.”
““She’s doing great,” Bure told E!”


"She's in a very good place."
"We're all very supportive of her, so she's fine," Bray added
"He was arrested later."
"Police also found an illegal gun on hodak because he is a felon."
“… When he knocked down a seven foot bookshelf
"Related Prince William talked about the shock of losing his mother and that he never really recovered. According to legal documents, swighting said that hodak abused drugs and alcohol on the night of the incident, and the situation escalated..."
"SweetIn was given a restraining order against her predecessor, and then he broke it twice."
"She's a cavalry and she handles everything gracefully." Swift and hodak had been together for nearly three years, and an explosive battle led to their breakup
"News."
"She did a good job," Bray told her



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ah, the tranquillity of the great...”
“...when to make turns...”
“She then explained that the real reason she walked backwards was because of the paparazzi I saw the guy with the camera and wasn t in the mood so I hiked the whole trail backward and my security told me...”
“According to TODAY, Swift responded by posting a dancing "Bridesmaids" GIF that read, "If I was drunk, would I be able to do this?"”
“After this photo leaked, one fan on Tumblr wrote, "It's like she's doing that test that police officers do to see if you're drunk or not."”
“Yes, backwards.”
“Taylor SwiftHere's Swift hiking ...backwards?”


"Ah, great peace..."
“… When to turn... "
"Then she explained that the real reason why she walked backward was because of the paparazzi. I saw the guy with the camera in a bad mood, so I walked the whole path backward, and my security told me..."
According to today, swift replied that he had posted a "Bridesmaid" GIF that said, "if I'm drunk, can I do it?"
After the photo leaked, a Tumblr fan wrote, "it's like she's doing a police test to see if you're drunk."
"Yes, back."
"Tyler swift, this is a fast hike Back? "



**Something goes wrong**
“We’ll let this strange cover fly, Marie Claire — because we love you regardless.”
“But this photo caused us to react the same as we did when our dad shaved his beard off during our terrible twos: Who is that person and why are they in our house?”
“But when we saw Kidman’s October 2018 Marie Claire cover, we were a bit shocked.”
“Through no fault of her own, Kidman looks nothing like herself.”
“Is it just us or…?”
“Her dyed red hair against the cherry red background paired with bright red lips is a lot to take in all at once.”
“But after cutting through the color, it’s still so hard to figure out whose face is gracing the October 2018 issue of Marie Claire.”
“Thankfully, “Nicole Kidman” is written in bold white lettering right next to her portrait so we can put two and two together.”
“Although the photo is beautiful and is giving us grunge ’90s vibes, having so much of Kidman’s face concealed by her new, unrecognizable hair may be to blame for us not registering who the heck it is.”
“Or maybe Photoshop is to blame…This cover comes several months after Marie Claire underwent a total rebrand, remarking its territory as a prominent fashion and lifestyle magazine.”


"We're going to let this strange cover fly, Mary Claire - because we love you no matter."
"But this picture aroused our reaction, just like when our father shaved his beard when we were two years old: who is that person and why are they in our house?"
"But when we saw the cover of Kidman's" Mary Claire "in October 2018, we were a bit shocked."
"It's not her fault. Kidman is nothing like herself."
"Just us or
"Her red hair against a cherry red background and bright red lips have attracted a lot of people all of a sudden."
"But after cutting off the color, it's still hard to figure out whose face is beautifying the October 2018 issue of Mary Clare."
"Thank goodness," Nicole Kidman "says in bold white next to her portrait, so we can put two and two together."
"Although this picture is beautiful and brings us the weird atmosphere of the 1990s, Kidman's face is covered by her new, unrecognizable hair, which may be why we don't record who it is."
"It could be Photoshop The cover came a few months after Mary Clare went through a radical rebranding of her field as a well-known fashion and lifestyle magazine



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Eatin bites and seein sites w/ @iamjessicalucas #fiancéjessica #tourists #italy,” he wrote.”
“Days before getting engaged, Jermasek shared an image of his new fiancée taking a bit of a “Panini con salami piccante.”And after posting about their recent engagement, the professional butcher shared an image of his bride-to-be enjoying some pizza and wine.”
“✨#engaged.”RELATED VIDEO: Learn Celebrity Jeweler Neil Lane’s Rules for Engagement Ring ShoppingThe couple has been documenting their trip to Italy on the social media app, and by the looks of it, have thoroughly enjoyed eating their way through the European country.”
“Living the dream.”
“She said yes.”
“Jermasek, who is a co-head butcher at chef Curtis Stone’s Gwen restaurant in Hollywood, also took to the social media platform to announce the exciting news: “Asked the woman I love if she would marry me.”
“Love you @alexjermasek,” she captioned the sweet image, which was captured at Ponte Amerigo Vespucci in Florence, Italy.”
“Can’t wait to spend my life with this man.”
““Feeling like the luckiest girl in the whole world!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Eat something and go to the Italian website, where there are @ iamjessicalucas ţ fiance Jessica ţ tourists," he wrote
A few days before his engagement, gemasek shared a picture of his new fiancee eating a little Italian sausage. After announcing their recent engagement, the professional butcher shared a picture of his bride to be enjoying pizza and wine
“ ✨ #Engagement. "Related video: learn about celebrity jeweler Neil Lane's engagement ring buying rules. The couple have been recording their trip to Italy on social media apps. From the appearance, they have thoroughly enjoyed eating in European countries."
"Live in a dream."
"She said yes."
Gemasek, CO butcher of Curtis stone's Gwen restaurant, also announced an exciting message on the social media platform: "ask if the woman I love will marry me."
"Love you @ alexjermasek," she wrote for this sweet photo taken by ponteamerigo Vespucci in Florence, Italy
"I can't wait to spend my life with this man."
"Feel like the luckiest girl in the world!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“Earlier in the day, Garner was spotted picking up a cake from her go-to store, Brentwood Country Mart.”
“The actor turned 45 on Tuesday, August 15, and celebrated with his three kids.”
“The Batman actor enjoyed dinner with Violet, 11, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5, whom he shares with estranged wife Jennifer Garner, at Barton G restaurant in West Hollywood.”
“Affleck was seen arriving at the hot spot in a T-shirt, gray blazer, jeans and gray sneakers.”
““He was having fun spending quality time with [the kids],” an eyewitness tells Us Weekly.”
“The whimsical, kid-friendly restaurant was a perfect choice for the celebration.”
“The onlooker tells Us the group ordered fun dishes such as Studio 54 — The Disco Ball Pasta dish with meatballs, Lobster Pop Tarts and a Marie Antoinette’s Head dessert topped with three feet of cotton candy.”
“It seems the 13 Going on 30 star, 45, may have played a part in the planning, too.”
“She looked chic in a simple white top, jeans and oversized sunglasses.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"Earlier in the day, Ghana was found taking cakes from her shop, Brentwood country Mart."
On Tuesday, August 15, the actor, 45, celebrated with his three children
The Batman has dinner with violet, 11, Serafina, 8, and Samuel, 5, at Barton g restaurant in West Hollywood, and with his separated wife, Jennifer Garner
Affleck was seen wearing a T-shirt, grey suit, jeans and grey sneakers to the hot spots
"He had a good time with [the children]," one witness told us
"This fantastic, child friendly restaurant is the best choice for celebrations."
"The onlookers told us that the group ordered some interesting dishes, such as studio 54, disco ball pasta, which had meatballs, lobster pie and Mary Antoinette's dessert with three feet of marshmallow on it."
"It seems that these 13 on-going 30 star and 45 star may also be involved in the planning."
"She looks fashionable in a simple white top, jeans and oversized sunglasses."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Casual, light and ready for daytime adventures!”
“For instance, Emily Ratajkowski was photographed in LA wearing a Hat Attack straw cross-body (celebs really love this brand) with a floral dress and white sneakers.”
“Last summer may have been all about the straw and pom-pom combos, but this season sees plenty of new ways to play with the coarse fibers.”
“Straw handbags will also see a resurgence this year—and not just to the beach.”
“When it comes to the rest of your outfit, complement the natural material with super-feminine fabric, like Vanessa's lace top, or juxtapose the texture with a soft, shiny satin piece.”
“Personalize a wide-brim number with an inspirational message, funny phrase or simply your name to make it feel fresh and modern.”
“Sun hats, especially of the straw variety, can look a little too perfect for the farm, but you don't need to be a country girl or grandma to sport one.”
“Coachella—wearing a Hat Attack Monogrammed Hand Embroidered Sun Hat with her name on it.”
“The style star was spotted in her natural habitat—a.k.a.”
“Now, Vanessa Hudgens is making monogrammed sun hats a thing.”


"Relax, relax, prepare for adventure in the daytime!"
"For example, Emily ratajkovsky was photographed in Los Angeles wearing a hat, white sneakers and a flowery skirt (celebrities really like the brand)
"Last summer may have been a combination of straw and POM POM, but this season there are many new ways to deal with crude fiber."
"Straw bags will come back this year, not just to the beach."
"When it comes to your other clothes, use super feminine fabrics to complement natural materials, such as Vanessa's lace top, or match the texture with soft and shiny satin."
"Personalize the wide edge number with inspiring information, interesting phrases or simple names to make it feel fresh and modern."
"The sun hat, especially the straw hat, looks a little too perfect for the farm, but you don't need to be a country girl or grandmother to wear it."
"Cochella is wearing a hat with a hand embroidered sun hat engraved with her name."
"Fashion stars are found in her natural habitat, that is to say."
"Now, Vanessa Huggins is making a sun hat with a monogram on it."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“I don’t think I would be feeling this great without them!"”
“I am so grateful for my husband and amazing team at the Natural Birthing Center.”
“I’m feeling pretty good!”
“He was and is everything we imagined.”
“"Dana caught him with my midwife, Simona, and when he handed him to me, I was absolutely overwhelmed with joy.”
“Jordin and Dana shared photos of their new bb boy to Instagram over the weekend, and he is high-key cute:"It was miraculously beautiful," Jordin told People.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"I don't think I would feel so good without them!"
"I am very grateful to my husband and the amazing team at the natural birth center."
"I feel good!"
"He used to be, and now is everything we imagine."
"Dana and my midwife Simone caught him together, and when he handed him over to me, I was ecstatic."
Jottin and Dana shared photos of their new BB boy on instagram over the weekend, and he was very cute: "it's so beautiful," jottin told people
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Getty Images this content is imported from {embedded name}."



**Something goes wrong**
“In late May, he told Elle, “The couple have been keen to explore other countries in Africa, and I’m certain we will see them do that on this honeymoon.””
“It looks like Royal expert Omid Scobie was right all along.”
“Then, there was the speculation that the couple would jet to the beachside town of Noosa in Queensland, Australia, which was challenged one day later by a TMZ report that named Alberta, Canada, as the royal honeymoon spot.”
“News refuted that rumor.”
“Mere days after the ceremony, though, E!”
““Restorative and the perfect holiday before starting a very busy second half of 2018.”Months before the royal wedding on May 19, the British tabloids were convinced that the Duke and Duchess of Sussex were going to honeymoon in Namibia, Africa.”
“News.”
““It was the perfect break and blend of their passions,” the source told E!”
“Earlier this month, the couple apparently visited more than two countries in East Africa, where they went on safaris, participated in “outdoor adventures,” and did a whole lot of relaxing.”
“News, the newlyweds ended up in the one place where Harry apparently “feels like he can be himself”: Africa.”


"In late May, he told Elle," the couple have been keen to explore other countries in Africa, and I'm sure we'll see them on this honeymoon. "
"It seems that royal expert Omid Scobie has always been right."
"At the time, there was speculation that the couple would fly to Nusa, a coastal town in Queensland, Australia, and a day later, a TMZ report challenged Alberta, Canada, as a royal honeymoon resort."
"The news refuted the rumor."
"But just a few days after the ceremony, e!"
"Restorative, perfect vacation, and then start a very busy second half of 2018." A few months before the royal wedding on May 19, British tabloids were convinced that the Duke and Duchess of Sussex were going to Africa for their honeymoon in Namibia
"News."
"It's a perfect combination of their passions," the source told e! "
"Earlier this month, the couple apparently visited more than two countries in East Africa, where they traveled, took part in 'outdoor expeditions' and did a lot of relaxation activities."
According to sources, the newlyweds finally arrived at a place where Harry apparently "felt he could be himself": Africa



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““As described in the restraining order and divorce settlement, money played no role for me personally and never has, except to the extent that I could donate it to charity and, in doing so, hopefully help those less able to defend themselves,” Heard said in a statement.”
“Heard announced in August she would be donating the money.”
“Depp was accused of throwing a cellphone at Heard during a drunken attack.”
“Their ugly split was surrounded by claims that Depp physically and verbally abused Heard.”
“The couple met on the set of “The Rum Diary" in 2011.”
“Heard filed for divorce from Depp in 2016 after being married for 15 months.”
“Heard previously said her philanthropic work “centered around medical care, especially women and children.”It's unclear when Heard made the donations to the other charities.”
“...charities with a particular focus to stop violence against women People reported...”
“On behalf of all the children and families whose lives you have impacted and everyone at Children s Hospital Los Angeles we offer our sincere thanks the hospital wrote in its 2017 annual report under the Honor Roll of Donors The rest of the divorce settlement money was divided among...”
“Children’s Hospital Los Angeles revealed Monday that the 31-year-old actress donated between $1 million and $5 million sometime during the July 2016 to June 2017 fiscal year.”


"As described in the restraint order and the divorce agreement, money has no effect on me personally, and it has never worked, but I can donate money to charities in the hope of helping those who are unable to defend themselves," Hurd said in a statement
"Hurd announced in August that she would donate money."
"Depp is accused of throwing a cell phone at Hurd in a drunken attack."
"Their ugly division is surrounded by Depp's physical and verbal abuse."
"The couple met on the set of the 2011 Rum Diary."
"Hurd filed for divorce with Depp in 2016 after 15 months of marriage."
Hurd previously said her charity work "centers on health care, especially for women and children." It's not clear when Hurd donated to other charities
“…… Charities that pay special attention to ending violence against women - according to reports... "
"On behalf of all the children and families affected by you, as well as every employee of Los Angeles children's Hospital, we would like to express our sincere thanks to you. In its 2017 annual report, the hospital wrote that under the donor honor list, the remaining divorce settlement money was allocated to.... "
"Los Angeles children's Hospital revealed on Monday that the 31 year old actress donated between $1 million and $5 million sometime in the fiscal year from July 2016 to June 2017."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pictures were taken while Affleck is filming Netflix movie Triple Frontier in Hawaii with Garrett Hedlund Charlie Hunnam and Oscar Isaac who were also photographed in the water...”
“Ben Affleck BenAffleck March 29 2018 The New Yorker article drew backlash online this week as the story also appeared to fat shame Affleck with lines like his gut is pooching and a blue gray towel is wrapped protectively around his midsection recalling a shy teen at the local pool...”
“Thick skin bolstered by garish tattoos.”
“@NewYorker I’m doing just fine.”
“The New Yorker article argued that ever since Affleck’s 2015 split from Jennifer Garner, paparazzi photos have shown a “Sad Ben,” from him vaping in his car to the low-energy interviews he gave during the “Batman v Superman” press tour.”
“When the tattoo was first spotted in 2016, Affleck insisted it was fake and just for a movie.”
“Thick skin bolstered by garish tattoos,” Affleck wrote, making light of his highly buzzed-about look.”
““@NewYorker I’m doing just fine.”
“...large tattoo of a phoenix on his back...”
“Ben Affleck wants everyone to know he s doing just fine The actor took to Twitter on Thursday morning to respond to a recent New Yorker article titled The Great Sadness of Ben Affleck which suggested he was depressed after new photos surfaced of Affleck on a beach with a...”


"These pictures were taken by Affleck when he was shooting the Netflix film triple frontier in Hawaii, when Garrett Hedlund Charlie Hennan and Oscar Isaac were also photographed in the water..."
"Ben Affleck on March 29, 2018, the new Yorker article caused a strong response on the Internet this week, because it also seemed to make Affleck feel very ashamed. His intestines were defecating. A blue gray towel protected his abdomen and recalled a shy teenager in the local swimming pool..."
"Gorgeous tattoos set off the thick skin."
"@ New Yorker, I did a good job."
According to the new Yorker article, ever since Affleck broke up with Jennifer Garner in 2015, there has been a "sad Ben" in paparazzi photos, from smoking in the car to the incompetent interview he received during the "Batman V Superman" reporter tour
"When the tattoo was first discovered in 2016, Affleck insisted that the tattoo was fake, just to make a movie."
"The thick skin is covered with fancy tattoos," Affleck wrote, understating his energetic appearance
"@ New Yorker, I did a good job."
“… There's a phoenix tattoo on his back... "
"Ben Affleck wants everyone to know that he's doing well. The actor tweeted back on Thursday morning to a recent new Yorker article entitled "Ben Affleck's great sadness," which suggested he was frustrated when new photos of Affleck on the beach surfaced



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Definitely—this was the first place a lot of people were introduced to Katt Williams and Kevin Hart.”
“In the past you’ve compared Wild ’N Out to Def Comedy Jam and In Living Color, and you’ve certainly helped launch the careers of a bunch of comedians, and black comedians specifically.”
“We discussed King of the Dancehall, co-parenting with Mariah Carey, and his passion for show-stopping turbans.”
“During a recent phone call with The Daily Beast, Cannon further articulated his “boss” mentality.”
“My moral principles will easily walk away from the millions of dollars they hang over my head.”In many ways, it’s this insistence on creative autonomy at any cost that truly sets Nick Cannon apart.”
““Not to get too detailed but this isn’t the first time executives have attempted to ‘put me in my place’ for so called unruly actions… I will not stand for it.”
““There is no amount of money worth my dignity or my integrity,” Cannon wrote in a subsequent Facebook post.”
“So the host of the wildly popular summer talent competition quit instead.”
“NBC allegedly believed that the joke “disparaged their brand,” and may have even gone so far as to threaten Cannon with termination.”
“The implication was that Cannon felt somehow controlled or censored by the expectations of the network hosting gig.”


"This is definitely the first time many people have met Kate Williams and Kevin Hart."
"In the past, you used to compare wildness to Comedy Jam and color of life. You must have helped a group of comedians, especially Black Comedians, start their own business."
"We talked about the king of the ballroom, raising children with Maria Carey, and his passion to stop performing headscarves."
"In a recent telephone interview with the Daily Beast, cannon further elaborated on his" boss "mentality."
"It's easy for my code of ethics to disappear from the millions of dollars I have on my head." In many ways, it's this spirit of creative autonomy at all costs that really sets Nick Cannon apart
"I don't want to go into too much detail, but this is not the first time executives have tried to 'put me in my place' for so-called unruly behavior I will not tolerate it. "
"Not much money is worth my dignity and integrity," cannon wrote in a subsequent Facebook post
"As a result, the host of the popular summer talent competition resigned."
NBC is said to think the joke "belittles their brand" and may even threaten cannon to terminate his contract
"The implication is that cannon feels controlled or censored to some extent by the expectation of hosting a concert online."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Affleck has a rental house for the duration of the shoot while Garner is staying at a nearby resort.”
“Jen seemed happy for the kids and stepped back to let Ben have his time with them,” says the source.”
“The kids were happy to see Ben and were holding his hand and hugging him.”
“They went and saw a movie and then had shave ice and milkshakes after.”
““Ben had Good Friday off from filming and spent the day with the kids.”
“The 13 Going on 30 actress gave her ex-husband plenty of space with the kids.”
“News that they will be spending their spring break there.”
“A source told E!”
“For Easter Sunday, Jen took her kids to be with their father in Hawaii, where Ben is shooting a film.”
“Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck may have split up, but they sure know how to be great parents.”


"Affleck had a rental house during filming, while Ghana lived in a nearby resort."
"Jane seems to be happy for the children and step back and let Ben be with them," the source said
"The children were very happy to see Ben, holding his hand and hugging him."
"They went to the movies and had shaved ice and milkshakes."
"Ben took a day off to film Good Friday and was with the children."
"The 13-year-old, 30-year-old actress gave her ex husband enough space to be with the children."
"The news that they are going to spend spring break there."
"A source told me!"
On Easter Sunday, Jane takes her children to Hawaii with their father, where Ben is making a movie
"Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck may have broken up, but they do know how to be good parents."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Recently, Weinstein’s ex-assistant filed a sexual harassment lawsuit against him, while the NYPD, LAPD and Beverly Hills Police Department have all opened investigations into sexual misconduct allegations involving the producer.”
“The allegations were first reported last October by both The New York Times and The New Yorker, while other women, including several high profile actresses, have since come forward with their own stories.”
“She was very clear about the fact that getting into that hot tub was something that she did consensually and that in hindsight it was also something that she regretted having done.”McGowan is one of dozens of women to accuse Weinstein of sexual assault and harassment.”
“I have no knowledge about anything Rose did or claimed to have done.”As for McGowan’s former manager, Brafman quotes Messick as saying that McGowan “hesitantly told me of her own accord that during the meeting that night before she had gotten into a hot tub with Mr. Weinstein.”
“Any accounts to the contrary are false.”
“Brafman’s statement, however, quotes an e-mail from Affleck to Weinstein, in which the actor says, “She never told me nor did I ever infer that she was attacked by anyone.”
“McGowan said Affleck responded,”God dammit, I told him to stop doing that,” suggesting the actor knew Weinstein had a history of inappropriate behavior.”
“During her interview with GMA, McGowan reiterated her claim that she told Affleck about her encounter with Weinstein the day after it happened during a press event for their film, Going All the Way.”
“...witnesses are McGowan s former manager Jill Messick and actor Ben Affleck...”
“Watching the performance by Rose McGowan as she looks to promote her new book however has made it impossible to remain quiet as she tries to smear Mr Weinstein with a bold lie that is denied not only by Mr Weinstein himself but by at least two witnesses The two...”


"Recently, Weinstein's former assistant filed a sexual harassment lawsuit against him, while the New York Police Department, the Los Angeles police department and Beverly Hills police department all investigated sexual misconduct charges involving the producer."
"These accusations were first reported by the New York Times and the new Yorker last October, and other women, including several well-known actresses, later came forward to tell their stories."
"She realized very clearly that getting into the hot tub was something she volunteered to do and, in hindsight, something she regretted doing." McGovern is one of dozens of women accused Weinstein of sexual assault and harassment
"I don't know what rose did or claimed to have done." As for McGovern's former manager, braffman quoted mesic as saying that McGovern "hesitated to take the initiative to tell me that she and Mr. Weinstein had a hot bath at the meeting that night."
"Any statement to the contrary is false."
However, braffman's statement quoted an email from Affleck to Weinstein in which the actor said: "she never told me, and I never inferred that she was attacked by anyone."
McGovern said that Affleck replied, "oh my God, I told him not to do that again," which shows that the actor knows Weinstein has a history of misconduct
"In an interview with GMA, McGovern reiterated her story, telling Affleck that her encounter with Weinstein took place on the second day of their film's press conference, all the way."
“…… The witnesses were former agent Jill mesic and actor Ben Affleck... "
"However, looking at Rose McGowan's performance in promoting the new book, she tried to slander Weinstein with a bold lie, which was denied not only by Weinstein herself, but also by at least two witnesses - the two witnesses..."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He's posted a couple of videos since Dwayne's rant, but he hasn't directly replied.”
“View this post on Instagram A post shared by Vin Diesel (@vindiesel)Not really, nope.”
“The producer in me is happy about this part.”
“"Bottom line is it'll play great for the movie and fits this Hobbs character that's embedded in my DNA extremely well.”
“When you watch this movie next April and it seems like I'm not acting in some of these scenes and my blood is legit boiling - you're right.”
“Candy asses.”
“Paramount"The ones that don't are too chicken shit to do anything about it anyway.”
“Some conduct themselves as stand up men and true professionals, while others don't.”
“"My male co-stars however are a different story.”
“My female co-stars are always amazing and I love 'em.”


"Since Dwayne growled, he has released several videos, but he didn't reply directly."
"Viewing this article on instagram is an article shared by Vin Diesel (@ vindiesel). It's not true, it's not."
"The producers in my heart are very happy with this part."
"At the end of the day, the film will be very good, very suitable for this Hobbes role, which is deeply embedded in my DNA."
"When you watch this movie next April, I don't seem to be performing in these scenes. My blood is boiling - you're right."
"Candy butt."
The less timid ones of paramount would never do anything at all
"Some people act like people who stand up and are really professionals, while others are not."
"But my male partner is a different story."
"My female partners are always great. I like them."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"Christmas in Miami?”
“The mom-to-be's burgeoning belly was on display as she ran errands in Miami Beach, Florida, on Christmas Eve.”
“Joined by her friend Maria Bravo, Eva rocked a sheer black tank top with a striped sports bra and black leggings for a trip to Whole Foods.”
“She accessorized with a baseball cap, sunglasses and a Chanel chain-strap purse worn around her waist.”
“Splash NewsEarlier in the day, the 42-year-old actress and her husband, Jose Baston, looked cute as could be as they did some shopping around Miami, including a peek into a Williams Sonoma store.”
“The two snuggled and walked arm-in-arm, even sneaking in a sweet kiss as they enjoyed the warm Florida temps.”
“Splash NewsEva has been getting into the holiday spirit with some famous pals, including Olivia Munn.”
“While they may not be having a white Christmas down in Florida, they certainly enjoyed a joyous daytime barbecue.”
“When friends become family ❤️?," Munn, 37, captioned an Instagram pic with Eva on Sunday.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Christmas in Miami?"
"The mother to be is showing off her budding belly as she runs errands in Miami Beach, Florida, on Christmas Eve."
Accompanied by her friend Maria Bravo, EVA took part in a total eclipse tour in a pure black vest, striped sports underwear and black tights
She was wearing a baseball cap, sunglasses and a Chanel Chain Purse around her waist
Earlier in the day, the 42 year old actress and her husband, Jose Baston, were shopping in Miami, including a Williams Sonoma store, looking very cute
"They nestled together, walked hand in hand, and even secretly kissed each other while enjoying the warm weather in Florida."
"Splash newseva and some famous friends, including Olivia Munn, joined in the festive atmosphere."
"Although they may not have had a white Christmas in Florida, they did enjoy a happy daytime barbecue."
"When friends become family ❤️ "Munn, 37, added a caption to instagram's photo with EVA on Sunday."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow her on Twitter at @arr_scott...”
“Becky Scott is the editor of The Schmooze.”
“This will hopefully serve as a lesson to Block — educate yourself or stop tweeting.”
“And I’m starting now.”It’s nice to know that we live in an era where people are called out when they cross lines.”
“We can’t make the future better until we make ourselves better.”
““Our Society should have no place for hate that targets any minority group.”
““I come forward honestly and openly, to extend my sincere apology for the tweet from my account on Monday, June 19th regarding the current season of The Bachelorette,” wrote Block.”
“Block, acutely aware that she was out of her depth, issued a long apology on her Facebook page, vowing to be try harder in the future.”
“...tweets of his own...”
“Let me know if she wants to meet Lee they sound like they would have a lot in common Rachel Lindsay TheRachLindsay June 20 2017 Lindsay is referring to Lee Garrett a contestant on her own season who made headlines for his extremely offensive Twitter account replete with racially charged...”


"Follow her on twitter @ arr / u Scott..."
"Becky Scott is the editor of gossip."
"It will hopefully be a lesson to stop - educate yourself or stop tweeting."
"I'm going to start now." It's good to know that we live in an era when people cross the line and are yelled
"Only by making ourselves better, can we make the future better."
"There should be no hatred against any minority in our society."
"I stand up and apologize for the tweet on my account on June 19 (Monday) about the season of bachelor," Bullock wrote
"Bullock was acutely aware that he couldn't do it. He issued a long apology on Facebook and vowed to work harder in the future."
“… His own micro blog... "
"Let me know that if she wants to meet Lee, they will sound like they have a lot in common. Rachel Lindsey serachi Lindsey June 20, 2017 Lindsey refers to Lee Garrett, one of her competitors this season, who made headlines because her aggressive twitter account is full of racial discrimination..."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The channel authorities later learned about the blunder and apologized for the technical blooper created by some of its staff members.”
“And in another incident which stands as a faux pas, one of the upcoming episode of “Game of Thorns” was accidentally aired on HBO Nordic and HBO Espana Platforms for 1 full hour.”
“...so asked the press to wait for the latest to publish...”
“...accounts linked to the HBO s official twitter page were also hacked and that includes the accounts of shows such as Last week Tonight Veep The Leftovers Looking Silicon Valley True Blood and Vinyl When contacted HBO said that the investigation on its twitter hack is still going on and...”
“It left a message to the HBO that Ourmine is here we are just testing your security Please contact us to upgrade the security ourmine org contact A second tweet which surfaced this early morning on HBO s official twitter page reads Let s make HBOHacked Trending The other twitter...”
“On Wednesday night this week, a hacking group named “ OurMine” gained access to the Twitter accounts of HBO.”
“After two days time details such as emails, financial balance sheets, employment agreements and marketing strategies also emerged on the web.”
“Since, HBO failed to react to the hacker’s call, few episodes of “Game of Thornes” containing the water mark “ HBO is Falling” were leaked to the web.”
“When FBI was pressed into the probe, it discovered that the data was leaked as soon as the hackers got hold of the email credentials of Leslie Cohen, HBO’s Vice President for film programming.”
“Furthermore, the hacker issued a warning to the HBO officials that if they fail to pay the ransom within a couple of days, the leaked data will be dumped onto the dark web.”


"The channel management later learned of the error and apologized for the technical fault made by some staff members."
In another impolite incident, an episode of the upcoming game of thorns unexpectedly aired on HBO Nordic channel and HBO Spanish channel for an entire hour
“… So ask the media to wait for the latest news release... "
“…… Accounts related to HBO's official twitter page have also been hacked, including those on last week's "tonight" and other shows. When contacting HBO, veep the lefts looking Silicon Valley true blood and vinyl said that the investigation of its twitter hacking attack is still in progress, and.... "
"It left a message to HBO. We are testing your security. Please contact us to upgrade your security. Our organization contacted the second tweet, which appeared on HBO's official twitter page this morning. It said: let's make hbohacked another twitter trend..."
On Wednesday night, a hacker group called ourmine entered HBO's Twitter account
"Two days later, details such as email, financial balance sheet, employment agreement and marketing strategy also appeared on the Internet."
As HBO failed to respond to the hacker's appeal, several episodes of "game of thorns" with the sign of "HBO is falling" were leaked to the Internet
"When the FBI was forced into the investigation, it was found that the data was leaked as soon as the hacker got the e-mail credentials of Leslie Cohen, HBO's vice president in charge of film production."
"In addition, hackers have warned HBO officials that if they do not pay the ransom within a few days, the leaked data will be thrown on the dark network."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Her sisters Kourtney and Kim Kardashian celebrated Easter with model Chrissy Teigen on Sunday.”
“Revenge Body follows Kardashian as she helps fans "transform into who they want to be" with the assistance of personal trainers and stylists.”
“The reality star confirmed Monday that "Revenge Body" will return for a second season.”
“File Photo by Dennis Van Tine/UPI | License PhotoApril 17 (UPI) -- Revenge Body with Khloe Kardashian was renewed Monday for Season 2.”
“The 32-year-old reality star confirmed the series will return for a second season on E!”
“...after the network announced the news in a press release.”
“Advertisement"Revenge Body is BACK for season 2!!”
“I can't wait to help transform more lives for the better!”
“Mind, body and spirit," she tweeted to her 23.6 million Twitter followers.”
“Season 2 will consist of eight one-hour episodes and feature a longer period of time for the makeovers.”


"Her sisters Courtney and Kim Kardashian celebrate Easter Sunday with model Chris tegan."
"Avenger" follows Kardashian and, with the help of her personal trainer and stylist, helps her fans "turn into what they want."
The reality star confirmed on Monday that revenge will return in the second season
"On April 17, Dennis van tine's profile photo," revenge with Khloe Kardashian, "continued its second season on Monday
"The 32 year old reality star confirmed that the show will be in E!"
“…… After the release on the Internet. "
"Advertising" revenge comes back in the second season
"I can't wait to help more people become better!"
"Mind, body and spirit," she tweeted to 23.6 million twitter fans
"The second season will be made up of eight episodes and an hour's worth of episodes, with longer time for a makeover."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not doing anything, just sitting in a bar in Westchester cracking jokes with the locals.’ So I stopped.””
““I just looked at the big picture, like, ‘What am I doing?”
“On Thursday, the 38-year-old pro skateboarder and former star of Jackass — who has been open about his struggle with alcoholism — shared a photo on social media announcing the news and thanking his friend for checking him into the rehab facility.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Thanks to @johnnyschillereff of element skateboards for checking me into alcohol rehab today.”
“No phones here, see y’all soon,” he wrote.”
“He also shared a snapshot of his bathroom inside the facility.”
““Rehab privileges- having my own bathroom, i can piss and floss simultaneously, and I get to use my phone an hour a day!” he wrote.”
“Margera was arrested by California Highway Patrol officers around 8 a.m. on Sunday in Los Angeles, Officer Juan Galvan — a public information officer with the CHP’s Southern Division — previously confirmed to PEOPLE.”
“According to Galvan, CHP officers were in the area for unrelated business when they observed Margera on his cell phone, which prompted an interaction.”


"I didn't do anything but sit in a bar in Westchester and joke with the local people. So I stopped. "
"I just look at the big picture, like 'what am I doing?"
"On Thursday, the 38 year old pro skater and former ass star shared a photo on social media to announce the news and thank his friends for putting him in rehab."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Thanks to @ johnyseff of element skateboards for sending me to rehab today."
"There's no phone here, see you later," he wrote
"He also shared a snapshot of the bathroom in the facility."
"Rehabilitation privilege - I have my own bathroom, I can floss while I urinate, and I can use my cell phone for an hour every day!"! "He wrote
Around 8 a.m. Sunday, the California Highway Patrol arrested magra in Los Angeles, as police officer Juan Galvan, a news officer in the southern part of the center for health protection, confirmed earlier
"According to Calvin, when CHP officials were doing unrelated business in the area, they saw him on magra's mobile phone, which triggered an interaction."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It would be absurd even to think that the who cheated on his partner with multiple women, would be secretly a gay man hiding in the closet.”
“However, this doesn't mean that he is gay in real life.”
“Even though Elizabeth was shocked with her boyfriend's infidelity, she didn't break up with him as it was a thing of the past and William had vowed never to commit these transgressions again.”
“Jacqueline added that once she found out that her partner was in a relationship and had even fathered a child, she immediately broke up with him.”
“She mentioned that William had lied to her about breaking up with Elizabeth and said that he was single at the time.”
“Earlier in 2017, Mexican actress Jacqueline Bracamonte revealed that she had an affair with William after the starred together in a soap opera in 2009.”
“But, that was hardly the end of William's cheating incident!”
“The couple eventually got back together and resumed their romance until 2017 when another incident of William's past infidelity was disclosed.”
“Although the pair didn't reveal the reason for their split, it was apparent that the trigger was William's adultery.”
“Following the incident, Elizabeth broke up with her boyfriend in December 2014.”


"It's absurd to think that people who cheat with many women will secretly be gay men hiding in the closet."
"However, that doesn't mean he's gay in real life."
Although Elizabeth was shocked by her boyfriend's infidelity, she didn't break up with him because it was a thing of the past. William vowed never to commit these crimes again
"Jacqueline added that as soon as she found out her partner was in love or even had a child, she broke up with him."
"She mentioned that William lied to her about breaking up with Elizabeth and that he was single at the time."
"Earlier in 2017, Mexican actress Jacqueline Bracamonte revealed that she had an affair with William after they starred in soap operas together in 2009."
"But William's cheating is not over yet!"
"The couple finally got back together and resumed their relationship until another infidelity in William's past was revealed in 2017."
"Although the two did not disclose the reason for the breakup, it is clear that the fuse is William's adultery."
"After the incident, Elizabeth broke up with her boyfriend in December 2014."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“He’s telling her he’s never met anyone like her before.”Although the duo kept their romance under wraps, they were spotted packing on the PDA during a vacation in Mexico earlier this month.”
““They’re keeping it on the down-low.”
““They definitely have a connection because they’ve been FaceTiming and texting nonstop while she’s been in England working,” the insider added.”
““After, Josh reached out to a mutual friend and asked for Eiza’s number.”Since then, the former couple seemed inseparable.”
““They drank and partied together until very late,” a source told Us at the time.”
“The pair met in early February at Jennifer Lopez’s pre-Super Bowl concert at the Minneapolis Armory and hit it off.”
“Us broke the news in February that the Safe Haven actor started seeing the From Dusk till Dawn alum less than five months after announcing his split from wife Fergie after eight years of marriage.”
“A source close to the Baby Driver actress, 28, tells Us that the pair broke up “a couple of weeks ago” because “they just drifted apart.”Duhamel, 45, allegedly told photographers in L.A. on Monday, July 23, that he and Gonzalez are “done,” according to the Daily Mail.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
"He told her he had never seen anyone like her before." Although the couple kept their relationship secret, they were found packed on a PDA while on holiday in Mexico earlier this month
"They're keeping a low profile."
"They must be in touch because they kept joking and texting while she was working in the UK," the person familiar with the matter added
"After that, Josh contacted a mutual friend and asked for eza's phone number." After that, the old couple seemed to be inseparable
A source told us at the time: "they drink together, party together, until very late."
"The two met at a pre Super Bowl concert in Minneapolis armory in early February and hit it off."
"In February this year, it was reported in the United States that the actor in the safe haven began to see the alum from morning to night less than five months after he announced his separation from his wife, Fergie, who has been married for eight years."
A source close to the 28 year old driver told us they broke up "a few weeks ago" because "they just alienated," the Daily Mail reported. Duhamel, 45, is said to have told photographers in Los Angeles on July 23 (Monday) that he and Gonzalez were "finished."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She looked smitten.”The couple was spotted the following month working out together while Holmes visited her beau in Atlanta where he was filming the upcoming movie Just Mercy with Michael B. Jordan.”
“She had this incredible smile on her face.”
““They were never on their phones.”
““They were totally engaged with each other,” a beachgoer explained to Us in August.”
“Foxx and Holmes’ outing comes just two months after the pair finally confirmed their nearly five-year relationship during a PDA-packed beach outing after shying away from getting cozy together in public for years.”
““He was playing lots of ’90ss hip-hop and hyping the party up, he really made everyone turn up and was a great DJ.”The source added that Foxx even took four shots of Patron in 20 minutes before he quipped, “s–t I’m drunk now!” to the crowd.”
““Jamie went to the DJ booth and started spinning for the party,” the source told Us of the Collateral actor.”
“...because the 39 year old Dawson s Creek alum stayed put it didn t stop Foxx 50 from embracing the celebration...”
“The insider noted that Jamie held her hand as she stepped up onto the ramp and they looked very much like a couple before the pair walked quickly through the party and were taken to private quarters in the back where Katie stayed the rest of the night However just...”
““Jamie was holding Katie’s hand when they got out of their car and then they walked onto the boat together,” an onlooker told Us Weekly about their arrival at Chelsea Piers prior to the event.”


"She looks fascinated." The next month, when Holmes visited her boyfriend in Atlanta, the couple were found working together while he was filming the upcoming film just mercy with Michael B. Jordan
"There was an incredible smile on her face."
"They never called."
"They're completely engaged," one beach tourist explained to us in August
"Only two months ago, Fox and Sherlock Holmes finally confirmed their love affair for nearly five years in a beach full of PDAs, because they have avoided intimacy in public places for many years."
"He played a lot of hip-hop in the '90s and made a lot of parties. He really made everyone come. He's a great DJ." Fox even took four pictures of the guardian in 20 minutes, the source added, and then joked, "I'm drunk now! "To the crowd."
"Jamie went to DJ and started spinning for the party," the source told our associate
“… Because the 39 year old Dawson s stream alum stayed in place, it didn't stop fox 50 from embracing the celebration. "
"People familiar with the matter noticed that Jamila took her hand and walked up the slope. They looked very much like a couple. Then they quickly walked through the party and were taken to the private dormitory in the back. Katie stayed there all night, but only..."
"When they got out of the car, Jamie took Katie by the hand, and then they got on the boat together," a bystander told us, as they arrived at Chelsea pier before the event



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In March, Lovato revealed she celebrated six years of sobriety, but three months later, in June, she released a new song, “Sober,” in which she suggested that she had relapsed.”
“She relapsed after she left the treatment center, then entered a sober living facility for a year.”
“...her family and ex boyfriend Wilmer Valderrama as she recovers from her apparent overdose...”
““She’s resting and getting better in the hospital,” a source tells PEOPLE.”
““Her whole family and Wilmer are just there to support her through recovery.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Wilmer has spent hours at the hospital with Demi every day,” says a second source.”
““He seems very concerned about her.”Valderrama rushed to Lovato’s side on Wednesday after initially being very “shocked” by the news, a source close to the former couple previously told PEOPLE.”
“The 38-year-old actor, who dated the singer for six years before their split in June 2016, has visited Cedars-Sinai multiple times since Tuesday morning, when Lovato was transported to the hospital following an apparent overdose that occurred at her Hollywood Hills home.”
“Valderrama was seen visiting Lovato again on Thursday, when a photo of him at the hospital emerged.”
“Image zoom Credit SplashNews com A source close to the former couple previously told PEOPLE on Tuesday that while Valderrama knew she was going through a tough time the actor wasn t prepared for this He saw her through so many ups and downs and was her rock through some...”


"In March, Lovato revealed that she had celebrated six years of waking up, but in June, three months later, she released a new song, waking up, in which she hinted that she had relapsed."
"She had a relapse after leaving the treatment center and then went to a rehab facility for a year."
“… Her family and ex boyfriend Wilmer waldrama have recovered from an apparent overdose. "
"She's resting in the hospital and getting better and better," a source told people
"Her whole family and Wilmer are there to support her through her recovery." Get news, feature, etc
"Wilmer and Demi are in the hospital for a few hours a day," another source said
"He seems to care about her." Waldrama arrived at Lovato on Wednesday, initially "shocked" by the news, a source close to the former couple told people earlier
"The 38 year old actress, who dated the singer for six years before breaking up in June 2016, has visited sidas Sinai many times since she was taken to hospital on Tuesday morning after apparently taking an overdose at her Hollywood villa home."
On Thursday, waldrama visited Lovato again, and photos of him in the hospital showed up
"A source close to the former couple told people on Tuesday that although waldrama knew that she was going through a difficult period, the actor was not prepared for it. He saw that she had gone through so many ups and downs. It was her rock that experienced some..."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Andy continues to pour salt in the wound for Peggy when he asks about the “my dad beating up your dad” line Kelly spewed at Peggy.”
“Peggy, the lady in red, decided to show up to the feast, but it doesn’t end well.”
“You all remember.”
“Besides the baby talk, Andy also drudges up the Meghan vs. Kelly incident.”
“...yet the women react as if Meghan was getting her left foot amputated...”
“Frankly I don t know what Meghan sees in Jimmy besides his boat loads of cash but hey there s a lid to every pot Meghan announces that she is expecting baby 2 a little boy which is super exciting...”
“Personality Jim.”
“She is adorable, which is miraculous, since I have yet to catch a smile out of Mr.”
“When reviewing Meghan’s reel of the season, the major focus is of course on her baby daughter, Aspen.”
“Your loss, Peg.”


When Andy asks Kelly what he said to Peggy, "my dad beat your dad," he continues to salt Peggy's wound
"Peggy, the lady in red, decided to go to the party, but it didn't turn out very well."
"You all remember."
"In addition to the baby talk, Andy also talked bitterly about Megan's affair with Kelly."
“… But the women reacted like Megan was going to amputate her left foot... "
"Frankly, I don't know what Megan saw in Jimmy, except for the cash on his boat, but hey, Megan announced that she was pregnant with two children, a little boy, which is so exciting..."
"Jim."
"She's lovely. It's amazing, because I haven't got a smile from Mr. Li yet."
"When looking back on Megan's season, the main focus is, of course, her little daughter Aspen."
"Your loss, PEG."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There’s just no excuse for behaving like that.””
“I’ve never seen anybody do that to that level and that’s just not right.”
“Photo Cindy Ord Getty Images for SiriusXM In a new interview with Gothamist David Cross addressed comments made in a piece published yesterday by the New York Times in which Jessica Walter was brought to tears while discussing an instance of her being berated on the set of Arrested Development...”
“...by Jeffrey Tambor...”
“Cross apparently logged off of Twitter shortly after the Times interview went live and had not yet seen the apologies issued by his co stars Jason Bateman and Tony Hale who along with Will Arnett essentially gaslighted Walter by minimizing the effect Tambor s behavior had on her during the...”
“...conflict even as she emphasized that she had never been treated so poorly by someone in her 60 year career...”
“For coming to Tambor’s defense (he told the Times that the actor has “learned from the experience and he’s listening and learning and growing,” adding “That’s important to remember”) instead of empathizing with the actively weeping Walter, Cross told Gothamist, “I will unequivocally apologize to Jessica.”
“I’m sorry that we behaved the way we behaved.”
“Whatever the criticisms are, I will own up.”
“I don t even know what they are as I said I saw the initial thing but I jumped off of Twitter at the behest of various people He also said that I think we kind of got what we deserved because they never addressed Tambor s blow up as...”


"There's no excuse for that."
"I've never seen anyone do that. It's not right."
"A photo taken by Cindy ord Getty Images for Sirius XM, in a recent interview with David cross, a gotamian, talked about the comments in an article published by the New York Times yesterday, in which Jessica Walter shed tears when discussing an example of the reprimand she received when she was shooting" blocked development "...."
“… Geoffrey temple... "
"Cross apparently wrote off twitter shortly after the Times interview. He hasn't seen any apologies from his partners Jason Bateman and Tony hale. Together with will Arnett, they have minimized the impact of Tambor's behavior on Walter..."
“…… Conflict, even though she stressed that in her 60 years of career, no one has ever treated her so badly... "
"For Tambor's defense (he told the times that Tambor" learned from his experience, he's listening, learning and growing, "and added that" it's important to remember that "), cross told the gotamians that he didn't sympathize with Walter, who was crying." I'll make an unambiguous apology to Jessica. "
"I'm sorry, we did."
"Whatever the criticism is, I will admit it."
"I don't even know what they are, because I said I saw the first thing, but I jumped Twitter's orders, all kinds of people, and he also said, I think we got what we deserve, because they never talked about the explosion of Tambor is..."



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“- CL”
“Dano’s meltdown here is so raw, and so positively tragic, that it’ll be a hard job to ever forget that epic f-bomb as the years pass.”
“One scene that guarantees its elevation above the rabble sees teenager Dwayne (Paul Dano) realise he’s colour-blind, and thus will never be able to achieve his dream of becoming a jet fighter.”
“...always remain one film left standing in the ashes Jonathan Dayton and Valerie Faris Little Miss Sunshine...”
“Some have indeed come off this false and cloying Zach Braff s Garden State others smarter and keener last year s Me and Earl and the Dying Girl but as the fires of kook devour all in sight there will...”
“Misfit boys finding new meaning to their existence in the arms of pink-haired manic pixie dream girls; sun-dappled bike rides as the latest band to feature a ukulele solo play softly in the distance.”
“Little Miss Sunshine - Within its own genre, yesThe ‘Sundance Effect’ has unfortunately developed a near plague of insufferable, self-conscious mawkishness over the years.”
“Which recent movies will become classics?”


“-CL”
"The collapse of Dano here is so primitive and tragic. With the passage of years, it will be a hard work to forget the epic atomic bomb."
"There's a scene that guarantees it's higher than the mob. Young Dwayne (Paul Dano) realizes that he's color blind, so he'll never realize his dream of becoming a jet fighter."
“… Always a movie left in the ashes, Jonathan Dayton and Valerie Faris, Little Miss Sunshine... "
"Some people do come out of Zach Braff's garden state, some are smarter and sharper, last year's Earl and I and the dying girl, but with the fire of the freaks, it's eating everything
"The unsociable boy finds a new meaning in the embrace of the pink haired, manic elf dream girl; the sun dappled bicycle ride becomes the latest band, featuring the Quartet solo playing softly in the distance."
"Miss Sunshine - in its own type, yes, the Sundance effect has unfortunately developed over the years into an intolerable, self-conscious, disgusting near plague."
"Which movies will become classics recently?"



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think we have the Kardashians to thank for that,' said Gina.”
“'As long as there are no hard lines, the make-up will always look pretty and soft on screen.'”
“It's very hydrating and makes the skin look beautiful,' said Gina.”
“My favorite products are from Glycelene.”
“Camera-ready: Gina revealed the stay-all-day products shes uses to keep JoJo's make-up intact through long shooting days, tears, make-out sessions and humid locationsSKIN'Because it is long hours and a lot of travel, I start JoJo out with a good skincare routine.”
“Below, Gina shares the bullet-proof products she always keeps in her kit.”
“But perhaps the most important aspect of the artist's job is creating a look that can withstand long days of shooting, kissing, humid climates and tears.”
“'Nothing looks worse on camera.'”
“She also shies away from shimmer and glitter-flecked products.”
“To get the reality star camera-ready, Gina stresses the importance of blending everything.”


"I think we should thank the kardashians for that," Gina said
"As long as there is no hard line, make-up always looks beautiful and soft on the screen."
"It's very moisturizing and makes the skin look beautiful," Gina said
"My favorite product is glycelene."
"Get ready to take pictures: Zina revealed the products she used to keep JOJO's make-up intact throughout the day in long filming, tears, makeup and wet environments. Because it's a long journey, I started with a good skin care program to make up for Joe. "
Next, Gina shares the bulletproof products she carries with her
"But perhaps the most important aspect of an artist's work is to create a form that can withstand long periods of filming, kissing, wet weather and tears."
"There's nothing worse than that."
"She doesn't like shiny products either."
"In order to get the reality star camera ready, Gina stressed the importance of integrating everything."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jeremy Scott marks his label’s 20th anniversaryRaf Simons’ horror-film-inspired sophomore collection for Calvin Klein is scary goodAdvertisementTom Ford leads off NYFW with strong shoulders, bright colors and lots of leg...”
“ALSO:Viva Avant Garde!”
“With silver bells, and cockle shells,And pretty maids all in a row.”AdvertisementThat nursery rhyme was looping over and over in my head after the finale of Christian Siriano’s garden-inspired spring 2018 runway show at Pier 59 Studios here Saturday.”
“The garden theme is a perennial one for spring and summer collections, and this season has been no exception with impressive installations of flowers and shrubbery flanking runways all over town and floral motifs sprouting like weeds.”
“Fashion farmer Siriano managed to harvest his garden twice this season.”
“The first time was by incorporating some of the literal references — think grass-green suiting, sunflower-yellow dresses and a parade of psychedelic floral brocades.”
“The second time was by tying into the idea of inclusivity, specifically the slogan, “We all grow in the same garden,” which appeared on a cropped black hoodie worn by a model named Joel, who may have identified as male.”
“Or female.”
“Or neither.”
“Joining Joel on the runway were models that reflected real-life shapes, sizes and skin tones: curvy women, statuesque women, women of color.”


"Jeremy Scott marks the 20th anniversary of his brand. Ralph Simmons' horror movie inspired Calvin Klein's sophomore series. It's a terrible advertisement. Tom Ford leads New York FW with strong shoulders, bright colors and plump legs..."
"In addition: long live avant garde!"
"Silver bells, Cocker shells, beautiful girls in a row." This nursery rhyme echoes back and forth in my mind after the last scene of Christian Siriano's garden inspired spring 2018 fashion show, which was held in the studio of pier 59 last Saturday
"Garden theme is the perennial theme of spring and summer collection, and this season is no exception. The flowers and shrubs on both sides of the runway in the town are impressive, and the flower patterns germinate like weeds."
"Fashion farmer siliano has harvested his garden twice this season."
"The first was by combining some text references - think grass green suits, sunflower yellow dresses and psychedelic brocade parades."
"The second time is by integrating the concept of inclusiveness, especially the slogan" we all grow in the same garden ", which appears on the Short Black Hoodie worn by a model named Joel. Joel may have confirmed that he is a man."
"Or women."
"Or neither."
"On the runway with Joel are models who reflect the shape, size and skin color of real life: curved women, sculpted women, colored women."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair were all smiles in a photo with 16-year-old sister Piper Palin and their dogs last week on Instagram.”
“Bristol and Willow are the daughters of former Alaska governor Sarah Palin.”
“...the bride-to-be captioned a photo of herself holding a "I said yes to the dress" sign.”
“She said in an Instagram post Friday that wedding planning had "officially begun," and that she found her gown Monday in Anchorage, Ala."Thank you @bateaubridalboutique for making this so easy!"”
“Willow got engaged to Bailey at Rockefeller Center in New York in December.”
“"#MOH #1."”
“Bristol captioned the post, adding heart eyes emojis.”
“"it's official, i cannot wait!!"”
“...spelled out in olives and a gift basket containing a candle, nail polish, gourmet gummy bears and other goodies.”
“Willow sent her sibling a pizza with "MOH?"”


"Last week, the two posed with their 16-year-old sister Piper Palin and their dog on instagram, smiling."
"Bristol and willow are the daughters of former Alaska Governor Sarah Palin."
“…… The bride to be is holding a picture of the sign "I promise to wear a dress."
In an instagram post on Friday, she said the wedding plans had "officially begun" and found her wedding dress in Anchorage, Alabama, on Monday. "Thanks to @ bateaubridalboutique for making it so easy!"
"Yang Liu was engaged to Bailey at Rockefeller Center in New York last December."
“#MOH#1.”
Bristol added a look of heart to the title of the post
"This is official news. I can't wait!"
“…… Use olive and a gift basket with candles, nail polish, delicious bear gum and other sweets.
Willo gave her brothers and sisters a pizza with the words "Mo?"



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...who she was first pictured with at the Cannes Film Festival...”
“Younes seemed at ease next to his lady love as he sported a black T-shirt with the Camel cigarette logo emblazoned on his chest and back.”
“And Kourtney Kardashian flaunted her fit figure while on a romantic date night with boyfriend Younes Bendjima in Rome on Wednesday evening.”
“The 39-year-old reality television personality was dressed to impress for dinner wearing a tight beige dress after leaving La Taverna Flavia restaurant.”
“Scroll down for videoLovely: Kourtney Kardashian flaunted her fit figure while on a romantic date night with boyfriend Younes Bendjima in Rome on Wednesday eveningKourtney's sweeping taupe dress was partially sleeveless, with a large piece of fabric draped across one shoulder.”
“The nearly-sheer number hugged her svelte waistline and billowed down to her toes, revealing a pair of black mesh mules.”
“She carried a black Fendi tote in one hand, with the brand's name plastered across the small purse.”
“The look of love The 39 year old reality television personality was dressed to impress for dinner wearing a tight beige dress after leaving La Taverna Flavia restaurant Walk this way Kourtney s sweeping taupe dress was partially sleeveless with a large piece of fabric draped across one shoulder Date...”
“...night The nearly sheer number hugged her svelte waistline and billowed down to her toes revealing a pair of black mesh mules The mother of three wore her raven hued hair straight to her shoulders and dusted just a touch of highlighter onto her cheekbones...”
“The Algerian-born model sported a pair of black cargo pants, with black trainers laced to his feet.”


“… Who did she take her first picture with at Cannes Film Festival? "
"When younes was wearing a black T-shirt with Camel Cigarette logo on his chest and back, he was very comfortable with his lover."
"On Wednesday night, Courtney Kardashian showed off her figure on a romantic date night in Rome with her boyfriend yones bengima."
"The 39 year old reality TV star left La taverna Flavia restaurant and was impressed to attend the dinner in a beige tight dress."
"Scroll down to see the lovely video: Courtney Kardashian shows off her figure on a romantic date night with her boyfriend yones bengima in Rome on Wednesday night. Courtney's Taupe dress is partially sleeveless, with a large piece of fabric over one shoulder
"Almost absolute numbers embrace her slender waistline and roll to her toes, revealing a pair of black mesh mules."
"She's holding a black fendi handbag in one hand, with the brand name on her little wallet."
"Look of love, the 39 year old reality TV star, left La taverna Flavia restaurant wearing a beige tight skirt for the dinner party. To impress, Kourtney's tawny long skirt is partly sleeveless and one shoulder is covered with a large piece of cloth..."
“… At night, the almost absolute number hugs her slender waistline, rolling to her toes, revealing a pair of black mesh mules. The mother of three wears her crow colored hair until her shoulders and dust are just touched by a fluorescent pen in her cheekbones... "
The Algerian born model wore black trousers and black sneakers



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After graduating from California State University Fresno in 1957, Christopher began his career as an art director, working […]”
“A rep confirmed to Variety that Christopher died in his sleep.”
“He was 85.”
“...awards shows as well as Murphy Brown Frasier and Wings died on Feb 2”
“What the artist does with that spot ultimately is down to them Some artists let their artistry do the talking Adele 2008 work in an Roy Christopher Famed Production Designer Behind Tony Awards Oscars and Murphy Brown Dies at 85 Roy Christopher the multiple Emmy winning production designer behind numerous...”
“Phoebe Bridgers Makes Her Mark on ‘Saturday Night Live’ With Screaming, Guitar-Trashing FinaleFor a new artist, a debut appearance on “Saturday Night Live” is a career milestone: an iconic show hedging the bet that you’re ready to go to the next level.”
“'SNL' satirizes cancel culture with Child Cancellation Project sketch"Saturday Night Live" made fun of social media cancel culture during a "Weekend Update" sketch.”
“Only Jamie Foxx and Maggie Smith have received four nominations in one year in the award show's 26-year history.”
“Chadwick Boseman makes history with 4 posthumous SAG nominationsChadwick Boseman received four Screen Actors Guild Award nominations this year, a personal best for the late actor.”
“Morgan Wallen’s sister defends country music star, blames cancel culture amid racial slur scandalMorgan Wallen’s sister is coming to the country music star’s defense days after the singer was caught using a racial slur.”


After graduating from California State University at Fresno in 1957, Christopher began his career as an art director ]Work
"A representative confirmed to variety that Christopher died in his sleep."
"He's 85 years old."
“…… The awards ceremony and Murphy Brown's underwear and wings died on February 2
"What artists do to this is ultimately up to them. Some artists let their artistry do Adele's work in 2008. Behind Roy Christopher's famous production design, Tony Oscar and Murphy Brown died at the age of 85. Behind Roy Christopher's many Emmy award-winning production designers, countless..."
"Phoebe bridges made a spectacular debut in live on Saturday night, bringing a stunning ending to a new artist. The debut of live on Saturday night is a milestone in her career: it's an iconic show that can hedge your bets on getting ready for the next level."
"SNL satirizes the cancellation of culture and children's cancellation project" Saturday night live "teases the" weekend update "sketch during the cancellation of culture by social media."
"In the 26 year history of the awards ceremony, only Jamie Fox and Maggie Smith have received four nominations in one year."
Chadwick Bosman made history with four posthumous sag nominations. This year, Chadwick Bosman won four Screen Actors Guild Awards nominations, which are the personal best nominations for the late actor
Morgan Warren's sister defended the country music star, accusing him of eliminating culture in the racial scandal. Morgan Warren's sister will defend the country music star a few days after the singer was found using racial slander



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Video: Next-Level Grilled Peanut Butter and Jelly Sandwiches...”
“We’ll take peanut butter anything over some obnoxiously-flavored fad candy any day.”
“But by keep doing what you’re doing, what we really mean is stick to the classics and don’t get too creative.”
“Keep doing what you’re doing, Oreo.”
“It’s all just a matter of texture (which already has us thinking of Combos, for some reason).”
“In fact, a savory Oreo doesn’t sound like the worst idea.”
“From cannoli and avocado to nacho cheese and tutti frutti, clearly no idea is too out of the ordinary.”
“Consumers can submit ideas by simply using the hashtag #MyOreoCreation on Instagram or Twitter, with the winner receiving $500,000 and the title of Oreo VIP (aka our dream job).”
“Taking a page out of Lay’s “Do Us a Flavor” competition, Oreo has also debuted the #MyOreoCreation contest which encourages fans from around the country to submit ideas for new Oreo flavors.”
“We’re just concerned about the choice in jelly, seeing as there is a huge difference between grape and strawberry (the latter being the best option, obviously).”


"Related video: the next level of roasted peanut butter and jelly sandwich..."
"Any day, we will replace some smelly fashion candy with peanut butter."
"But stick to what you're doing. What we really mean is to stick to the classics and not be too creative."
"Keep doing what you're doing, Oreo."
"It's all just a matter of texture (for some reason, we've started to think about combinations."
"In fact, delicious Oreo doesn't sound like the worst idea."
"From canary and avocado to Nacho and dutty, there's obviously no idea that's too different."
"Consumers just need to use the tag" my Oreo creation "on instagram or twitter to submit their ideas, and the winner will receive a $500000 bonus and Oreo VIP (also known as our dream job)
Oreo also launched the "myoreo creative competition" to encourage fans from all over the country to offer suggestions for Oreo's new taste
"We only care about the choice of jelly, because there is a big difference between grapes and strawberries (strawberries are obviously the best choice)



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’m so happy to be on this journey together with you and creating this angel from the man above,” the Cleveland Cavaliers player, 26, wrote on Instagram following Kardashian’s pregnancy confirmation.”
“The baby boy on the way is the first child for Kardashian; her boyfriend Tristan Thompson is also dad to 1-year-old son Prince Oliver.”
“The expectant Keeping Up with the Kardashians star, 33, shared her exercise routine on Snapchat Thursday while inside of her home gym where she did workouts for her abs and lunges with bands.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Earlier this week, Khloé was shamed on social media by people who believed she was working out too much for a pregnant woman, but the Revenge Body star responded Tuesday on Twitter to call them out.”
“Image zoomWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom“For the ones who think they are physicians all of a sudden,” wrote Kardashian posting a link to a fitpregnancy.com article about the benefits of exercising while expecting.”
““MY doctor and I communicate and my workouts are cleared and highly recommended,” she added.”
““Thanks kiddos!”


"I'm very happy to be on this journey with you and create this angel from the man above," Kardashian, a 26 year old Cleveland Cavaliers player, wrote on instagram after confirming her pregnancy
"The baby boy on the road is Kardashian's first child; her boyfriend Tristan Thompson is also the father of her 1-year-old son Prince Oliver."
"The 33 year old Kardashian star's mother to be shared her exercise program with the band at her home gym on Thursday, where she works out her abs and lunges with the band."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Earlier this week, some people thought on social media that khlo é was too active for a pregnant woman, which made her feel ashamed, but the avenging star responded on twitter on Tuesday by calling them out."
"Image zooms in on all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"People who suddenly think they're doctors can use" image zooming "Fett pregnancy" for articles about the benefits of exercising during pregnancy, "Kardashian wrote in a link to a website
"My doctor and I communicate that my exercise is clear and strongly recommended," she added
"Thank you, children!"



**Something goes wrong**
“He said people say to him, “is he your dad?” The only response he can muster is merely to shake his head.”
“AdvertisementAnd surprisingly – even though he’s super famous as an actor – people still ask him if he’s related to Michael Jordan, the legendary basketball player.”
“Additionally, Michael intends to make an appearance in HBO’s adaption of Fahrenheit 451, the series which is based on the classic dystopian novel.”
“He gained it everywhere, in the chest, on his back, his legs, his quads; according to the star, he was massive.”
“He even put on twenty pounds of muscle for the movie.”
“Jordan said he intends to create “a performance that people will remember,” something which is different.”
“To get ready for his character as Erik Killmonger, he studied other actors’ performances such as Heath Ledger and Michael Fassbender.”
“And while some might be disappointed Michael hasn’t found luck, it’s not likely he would be able to make it work anyway; he’s always busy preparing for roles.”
“They moved out to Los Angeles to be with him after his career took off.”
“That’s right, Michael’s roommates are his mom and dad.”


He said people asked him, "is he your father?"? "The only response he can make is to shake his head."
"It's amazing that even though he's very famous as an actor, people still ask him if he's related to the legendary basketball player Michael Jordan."
Michael also plans to appear in HBO's 451 Fahrenheit, a series based on classic dystopian fiction
"He's got it all over the place, chest, back, legs, limbs; according to the astrology, he's a big man."
"He even gained 20 pounds of muscle for the movie."
Jordan said he intended to create a "show that people will remember," something different
To prepare to play Eric kilmenger, he studied the performances of other actors, such as Heath Ledger and Michael Fassbender
"While some may be disappointed that Michael didn't find good luck, he's unlikely to succeed anyway; he's always busy preparing for the role."
"After his career took off, they moved to Los Angeles to be with him."
"Yes, Michael's roommates are his parents."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She admitted her doctor warned her about getting back in the ring, saying: 'For the rest of my life I will have issues with my neck.'”
“It kind of messes with your mind.'”
“'It's so hard.”
“...emotional rollercoaster and today has been like double that she said...”
“Historical event Nikki Bella gave a toast after competing in the first all female Royal Rumble on Sunday s episode of Total Bellas Bold entrance The 34 year old wrestling star received thunderous applause upon her entrance to the Royal Rumble I feel like I ve been on such an...”
“But Nikki was struggling not to be consumed by her split from John - especially when she saw him at the event without them speaking.”
“The episode titled The Bella Comeback showed Nikki preparing to make her big return to the ring at the first all-female Royal Rumble, which twin sister Brie Bella said was their chance to 'put our names in the history books.'”
“...feared her split from John would ruin the biggest moment of her wrestling career...”
“Talk about it The 34 year old wrestler chatted with twin sister Brie about Cena s recent public appearances and her conflicting feelings about their relationship Somber Cena While Brie agreed with Nikki she also seemed hopeful that the powerhouse couple would get back together Earlier in the episode Nikki...”
“Or he could say what he did say,' Brie said.”


"She admitted that doctors had warned her not to return to the ring, saying: 'I'll have problems with my neck for the rest of my life.'
"It's kind of disturbing your mind."
"It's too hard."
“… Emotional roller coaster, as she said today... "
"Historical event Nikki Bella raised her glasses to celebrate after the first all women's Royal Rumble on Sunday. The 34 year old wrestling star received thunderous applause when she took part in the Royal Rumble. I think I've been on such a stage all the time..."
"But Nicky tried not to be swallowed by her breakup with John - especially when she saw him at the event and they didn't talk."
"An episode called Bella comeback shows that Nicky is ready to return to the ring in the first all female Royal Rumble, and twin sister brie Bella says it's their chance to" put our name down in history. "
“… Worried that her breakup with John would ruin the most important moment of her wrestling career... "
"At this point, the 34 year old wrestler and twin sister Bree talked about Senna's recent public performance and her ambivalence about the relationship. Senna was gloomy, and Bree agreed with Nikki. She also seems to hope that the strong couple can reunite with Nikki earlier in the episode. "
"Or he could say what he said," Bree said



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just about every song in “Mary Poppins Returns” has a 1964 antecedent.”
“...kids literally enter the surface of their mother s cracked decorative bowl leading to an updated version of the sequence of Mary Poppins which is wonderfully executed here hitting that same note of colliding daffiness...”
“And the key to what works about it is that it lets you access and celebrate something that’s deeply square.”
“The movie overflows with delirious good vibes.”
““Mary Poppins Returns” doesn’t have to replace “Mary Poppins” in our affection to be more than a spoonful of sugar.”
“...present day...”
“...of sweetness and light and vaudeville fairy dust the more the movie mimics Mary Poppins the less it can be Mary Poppins But what it can be is something else a 1960s movie cleansed of shadow improbably delivered into the...”
“It s just like that classic we love so much Nostalgia in Mary Poppins Returns is a transporting emotion yet the movie is as calculated a piece of re enactment as The Force Awakens Even as it throws off sparkles...”
“But, of course, when you first watched “Mary Poppins” (and I’m old enough to have seen it when it came out — in fact, I saw it five times), you weren’t thinking, “Look!”
“...can count it s just like the earlier film...”


"Almost every song in Mary Poppins' return has a 1964 prelude."
“… The children really got into the surface of their mother's broken decorative bowl, leading to an updated version of the Mary Poppins sequence, which here perfectly completes the sequence, hitting the same crashing sound... "
"The key to it is that it allows you to touch and celebrate something very square."
"The film is full of delirious good atmosphere."
"The return of Mary Poppins doesn't have to replace Mary Poppins in our relationship, not just a spoonful of sugar."
“… Today... "
“…… The dust of sweet, bright and juggling fairy tales -- the more a movie imitates Mary Poppins, the less likely it is to be Mary Poppins, but it can be something else - a film of the 1960s, which clears the shadow and cannot be delivered to... "
"Just like the classic nostalgia we love so much in the return of Mary Poppins, it's a way to convey emotion, but this movie is like the spark of the force when it wakes up, it's a reappearance..."
But when you watch Mary Poppins for the first time (I've grown up and seen it when it came out - in fact, I've seen it five times), you don't think, "look!"
“… It's like the old movies. "



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“By signing up you are agreeing to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy .”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“She refuses to go, insisting on staying with her friends.”
“Perry arrives soon after, ordering her to the car.”
“Celeste joins them.”
“Sporting the most elaborate Audrey Hepburn costume ever, Renata (Laura Dern) interrupts and apologizes to Jane for mistreating her.”
“Jane runs after her, and consoles her.”
“Ill-advised karaoke:During Ed’s (Adam Scott) cringe-inducing song to Madeline (Reese Witherspoon), she’s so overcome by guilt about cheating on him that she races to the caution-taped site of her affair with Joseph.”
“She scrambles to set her hastily prepared escape plan in motion before the party.”
“Later on, Perry discovers that as he feared, Celeste is leaving him.”


"By registering, you agree to our terms of service and privacy policy."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"She refused to go and insisted on staying with her friends."
"Perry will be here soon. Order her to get in the car."
"Celeste joined them."
"Wearing the most exquisite Audrey Hepburn costume ever, Renata (Laura Dean) interrupts Jane and apologizes for abusing her."
Jane ran after her and comforted her
"Unwise karaoke: during ED (Adam Scott), she cringes to lead a song to Madeleine (Reese Witherspoon). She is overcome by the guilt of cheating him, so she runs to the warning video of her extramarital affair with Joseph
"She was busy starting her hasty escape plan before the party."
"Later, Perry found out, as he was worried, that Celeste was leaving him."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“- PA”
“— Cheryl (@CherylOfficial) July 1, 2018The parents said separating had been "a tough decision for us to make".”
“The singers said they were "going our separate ways" in nearly identical posts to their 40 million Twitter followers.”
“The former Girls Aloud star, who turned 35 on Saturday, and One Direction member, 24, have a one-year-old son, Bear.”
“We are sad to announce that we are going our separate ways.”
“It's been a tough decision for us to make.”
“We still have so much love for each other as a family.”
“Bear is our world and we ask that you respect his privacy as we navigate our way through this together.”
“The statement added: "We still have so much love for each other as a family.”
“They welcomed their son in March last year after being an item since 2016.”


"- Pa"
"Cheryl (@ Cheryl official) parents said on July 1, 2018 that separation was a difficult decision for us."
"These singers said they were" going their separate ways "in almost the same posts as 40 million twitter fans."
"The former actress turned 35 last Saturday, and a director, 24, has a one-year-old son, bear."
"We are sad to announce that we will go our separate ways."
"It was a difficult decision for us."
"As a family, we still love each other so much."
"The bear is our world, and we ask you to respect his privacy, because we navigate this way together."
"As a family, we still have so much love for each other," the statement added
"They've been a project since 2016, and last March they had a son."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Megan McCluskey at megan.mccluskey@time.com.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
“Following the Friday debut of the second trailer for the upcoming superhero extravaganza which will feature characters from all corners of the Marvel Cinematic Universe including Iron Man Captain America Spider Man Black Panther and the Guardians of the Galaxy Twitter users have begun pointing out existing crossovers that they...”
“...think can t possibly be outdone...”
“In fact, the popular sentiment has given rise to a new meme that is quickly making the online rounds, allowing many to reminisce about their favorite entertainment moments that have bridged the gap between different worlds.”
“From Michael Jordan’s rendez-vous with the Looney Tunes in Space Jam to the Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles joining the Power Rangers in space, here are some of the crossovers the Internet thinks deserve a bigger spotlight than Infinity War.”
“Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”


"To Megan McCluskey Megan McCluskey @ time.com."
"Please try to register again."
"Following the premiere of the second trailer of the upcoming superhero Festival on Friday, characters from all corners of the marvel movie world, including captain iron man, spider man, panther and guardian of the galaxy, will appear on twitter, and Twitter users have begun to point out the existing intersections, they..."
“… Thinking cannot be transcended... "
"In fact, this popular sentiment has spawned a new meme, which is rapidly spreading on the Internet, making many people recall their favorite entertainment moments, which bridge the gap between different worlds."
"From Michael Jordan's Rooney tunes in space jam to Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles joining the space Rangers, here are some of the intersections that the Internet thinks are more noteworthy than infinite war."
"Get the briefing."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
Please enter a valid email address
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“...and royals particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton...”
“Of course this isn t the first time the two have been showstoppers on a red carpet Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE com where she oversees coverage of celebrities...”
“Getty ImagesGetty ImagesTonight on the Golden Globes, they complemented each other's elegant black ensembles and glowing tans.”
“Golden couple Ryan Reynolds and Blake Lively know how to work a red carpet.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
“… And the royal family, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton... "
"Of course, it's not the first time they've been on the red carpet. Eliza Bailey, news and strategy editor at Elle com, oversees celebrity coverage..."
"Getty Images at the Golden Globe Awards ceremony, they complement each other with elegant black ensemble and shiny tan."
"Ryan Reynolds and Blake Lively, the golden couple, know how to walk the red carpet."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“I am so sorry," she continued.”
“The devastating Thomas Fire recently endured by residents of Santa Barbara County burned away some of the area s natural defenses against mudslides a threat that has tragically been realized in the area as flooding has led to the evacuation of 20 000 residents and at least 13 deaths according...”
“...to CBS News...”
“The sisters, who grew up in Santa Barbara, shared photos of the devastation on social media on Tuesday, calling for hope and help for the battered area.”
“"My beautiful hometown of Montecito.... Where my roots were placed, where my mother raised me and my family.”
“Completely under water.”
“I really can't believe it.”
“I am praying and thinking so much for our friends in the hospital and their families that are still missing," Bella wrote.”
“"For our horses, dogs, cats-all animals- that gave us happiness, who are now searching for a dry place to lay their heads.. our elementary school...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"I'm sorry," she continued
"The recent devastating Thomas fire in Santa Barbara County destroyed part of the natural fortifications against the debris flow in the area. Unfortunately, this threat has been realized in the area, because the flood has led to the evacuation of 20000 residents and the death of at least 13 people..."
“… CBS News... "
"The sisters, who grew up in Santa Barbara, shared photos of the disaster on social media on Tuesday, calling on people to bring hope and help to the disaster area."
"My beautiful hometown, Montecito.... Where my roots are, where my mother raised me and my family. "
"Completely underwater."
"I can't believe it."
"I'm praying and missing our friends in the hospital and their families who are still missing," Bella wrote
"For our horses, dogs, cats, all the animals - gave us happiness, they are now looking for a dry place to lie down.".. Our primary school.... "



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Later, as Ivy’s gone at the restaurant, Ally stares reluctantly at her pills.”
“Crazed, Kai yells, “It’s so easy until it’s you they’re coming for!”This does not help Ally’s mental status.”
“And this also means that Billy Eichner and Leslie Grossman’s characters have been revealed.”
“Yes, in a blatant reference to the “hive mind” theme of this season, one of the new neighbors is actually a beekeeper.”
“...and rush over to find Oz playing with bees.”
“Seriously?)”
“Ally and Ivy get home and immediately freak out over this (how have they not fired Winter yet?”
“After a rather creepy scene where Winter (Billie Lourd) engages in the most serious pinky swear ever with Oz, vowing to take his fear for him, she allows him to go next door to play with the new residents.”
“In announcing his run for city council — a seat that was vacated by the murder of councilman Chang — he quotes Trump’s “rapists and criminals” line, yelling, “Look at my face, Michigan!”Speaking of the Changs, the Mayfair-Richards already have new neighbors.”
“Now it’s a local news story, and of course it takes a political turn: some of the construction workers have been taken into the custody of ICE.”


"Later, Ivy went to the restaurant, and Ellie watched her pills reluctantly."
"Crazy," Kay cried, "it's so easy before they come to you! "It doesn't help Ellie's mental state."
"It also means that the roles of Billy Eisner and Leslie Grossman have been exposed."
"Yes, it's blatant to mention the theme of this season's' beehive thinking '. One of the new neighbors is actually a beekeeper."
“… Rush over and find oz playing with bees. "
"Really?"
"When Ellie and ivy got home, they were immediately frightened by this (why haven't they finished the fire in winter yet?"
"After winter (Billie Lauder) and oz have the most serious little finger curse ever, vowing to eliminate his fear, she allows oz to play next door with the new residents."
In announcing his candidacy for the City Council, he quoted Trump's "rapists and criminals" line and yelled, "look at my face, Michigan! "Speaking of the Chang family, the Mayfair Richards have a new neighbor."
"Now it's local news, and of course it needs a political turn: some construction workers have been detained by ice."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A month later, Jason Wahler and wife Ashley Slack announced they have a baby on the way.”
“In January, Lauren Conrad announced that she’s expecting her first child with husband William Tell.”
“Talan is the latest to join the string of Laguna Beach and The Hills alums in the soon-to-be parents club.”
“@danielletorriero 13 weeks & counting.”FROM PEN: Today’s Savannah Guthrie Was Very Superstitious About Her Pregnancy: “I Didn’t Want to Jinx It”The married couple tied the knot in June 2014, though they’ve been together for eight years.”
“The couple announced the pregnancy in April on Instagram, writing, “#BabyTorriero coming Oct. 2017.”
““@danielletorriero and I are thrilled to announce that we are having a boy in Oct!” he wrote in the caption.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple announced they are expecting a son, according to an Instagram video Talan posted Monday.”
“It’s going to be a boy for Talan Torriero and his wife Danielle.”


"A month later, Jason Waller and his wife Ashley Shrek announced that they were going to have a baby."
In January, Lauren Conrad announced that she would have her first child with her husband, William Tell
"Taran is the latest prospective parent club to join the Laguna Beach and hills alumni team."
"@ danielletorriero 13 weeks & counting." from pen: Today Savannah Guthrie is very superstitious about pregnancy: "I don't want to be unlucky." the married couple got married in June 2014, even though they have been together for eight years
"The couple announced their pregnancy on instagram in April and wrote," baby torrero will arrive in October 2017. "
"@ Daniel toriero and I are excited to announce that we will have a boy in October! "He wrote in the title."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to the instagram video released by Taran on Monday, the couple announced that they were going to have a son."
"For Taran toriero and his wife Danielle, it's going to be a boy."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Reese Witherspoon & Ellen DeGeneres Battle It Out for the Coveted Title of Oprah’s BFF”
““I accept your sisterhood.”Should this sorority-cum-family start accepting applications, we’ll be the first to apply.”
“He was always like that.’”Kimmel’s response?”
“...funny or you do one of these great skits with kids I go Oh that s Jimmy I just love to say That s my little brother...”
“She said I said to your producer I wish you were my little brother cause I think you re like America s little brother The media mogul went on to imagine herself as a proud big sister saying And every time you re on and you say something profound or...”
“During yesterday’s episode of Jimmy Kimmel Live!, Winfrey revealed that she would gladly welcome the late-night host into her tight-knit family.”
“Oprah Winfrey couldn’t help but gush over Jimmy Kimmel’s little brother potential in a hilarious new interview, and her reasoning is totally valid.”


Related story: Reese Witherspoon and Ellen DeGeneres fight for Oprah's best boyfriend
"I accept your sisterhood." If the fraternity and family start to accept applications, we will apply first
"He's always like that." "Kimmel's answer?"
“… Funny or you and the kids make a good sketch. I'll go. Oh, that's Jimmy. I just want to say that's my brother... "
"She said that I told your producer, I hope you are my brother, because I think you are like the brother of the United States, media tycoon, and then imagine yourself as a proud big sister, every time you say something profound in the program, or..."
"In the live broadcast of Jimmy Kimmel yesterday! Winfrey revealed that she would be happy to welcome the late night host to her close knit family
"Oprah Winfrey, in a hilarious new interview, can't help talking about the potential of Jimmy Kimmel's younger brother. Her reasoning is absolutely right."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think we’re on our way but we’re still figuring it out.””
“...your bulls t Period...”
“Oprah big.”
“Oprah Winfrey is Goop s inaugural guest on its podcast hosted by founder Gwyneth Paltrow and the hour plus conversation touches on everything Oprah from her decades as an inimitable television host to her experiences with Harvey Weinstein and her ultimate hope for the MeToo movement and her political aspirations...”
“...or lack thereof...”
“Winfrey said she was friendly with Weinstein in a professional capacity from the days of her eponymous talk show but addressed accusations that she must have known of his allegedly long history of sexually predatory behavior toward female actors and other women saying she simply had no idea and wasn...”
“...t really in that world of entertainment...”
“But she did know that everyone dreaded getting a call from him.”
““I was in Chicago, in my own little world, but what I knew about Harvey was that Harvey was a bully and that if Harvey’s on the phone, you didn’t want to take the call because you’re going to get bullied in some way,” Winfrey said.”
“While for her a call from Weinstein generally meant being pressured, in a way left undefined, to have certain people on her show, now Winfrey is left wondering why she even let herself be bullied at all.”


"I think we're on our way, but we're still working on it."
“… Your cattle have no period... "
"Oprah the big man."
"Oprah Winfrey is the opening guest of goop. In her podcast, she is hosted by the founding personality winness Paltrow. Hours plus talk touches everything she has been doing for decades. Oprah Winfrey is an insurmountable TV host of her experience with Harvey Weinstein and her ultimate hope for the Mayo movement and political ambition..."
“… Or missing... "
"Winfrey said that she has maintained a friendly relationship with Weinstein in a professional capacity since the day of her eponymous talk show, but she talked about some accusations that she must have known about Weinstein's alleged long-term sexual exploitation of actresses and other women. She said that she did not know and was not..."
“… Not really in the entertainment world... "
"But she knew everyone was afraid to get his call."
"I'm in Chicago, in my own little world, but what I know about Harvey is that Harvey is a bully, and if Harvey is on the phone, you don't want to answer it because you're going to be bullied to some extent," Winfrey said
"For her, a phone call from Weinstein usually means being pressured. To some extent, there is no clear definition to let someone on her show. Now Winfrey is thinking about why she even let herself be bullied."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Why ‘RHOP’ Reunion Left Monique Samuels ‘Disappointed’ (Exclusive)Why 'Real Housewives' Star Monique Samuels Is Happy to Share Her Marriage and Pregnancy Struggles (Exclusive)EXCLUSIVE: Monique Samuels Kicks 'Real Housewives of Potomac' Co-Star Gizelle Bryant Out of Her House -- WatchRelated Gallery...”
“...and didn’t pass out while I pushed the baby out ???."”
“The 35-year-old Real Housewives of Potomac star took to Instagram on Monday to share the news that she and her husband, Chris Samuels, welcomed their third child, a son named Chase Omari.”
“The couple also shares a 5-year-old son, Christopher, and a 3-year-old daughter, Milani.”
“Monique shared five pics from the special day that show baby Chase posing with his mother, father and siblings.”
“Both Christopher and Milani held their baby brother, while Mom and Dad watched on.”
“The little bundle of joy looked thrilled in the shots as he held his mom's finger and hung out in his parents' arms.”
“"It’s... A...”
“BOY!!!!”
“Told yall!”


"Embedded code restart" content: why the reunion of rhOP "disappoints" Monique Samuel "(exclusive) why" real housewife "star Monique Samuel is willing to share her marriage and pregnancy struggle (exclusive) exclusive: Monique Samuel kicks" real housewife of Potomac "co star gizel Bryant out of the house "Corridor..."
“… I didn't faint when I pushed the baby out? "
The 35 year old Potomac star housewife shared on instagram on Monday that she and her husband, Chris Samuels, had a third child, chase Omari
The couple also have a five-year-old son, Christopher, and a three-year-old daughter, Mirani
"Monique shared five special day photos of little chase with his mother, father, brothers and sisters."
"Christopher and Milani are holding their little brother, and their parents are watching."
"When he holds his mother's finger and hangs it in his parents' arms, the little joy is very exciting in the camera."
"This is... A、 ……”
"Child!!"
"Tell Yar!"



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED:”
“What will she try next?”
“Jennifer Lawrence has changed up her hair yet again and added bangs!”
“The 26-year-old was recently spotted rocking some chic, blunt bangs on the set of her upcoming film "Red Sparrow."”
“It's been quite some time since we've seen Lawrence rock bangs.”
“Flynet Pictures via Splash NewsWhile the new 'do is likely for her role as a Russian spy in the film, we aren't sure if it's wig or an actual chop.”
“She looks so fabulous that we're hoping this fringe is here to stay.”
“Lawrence is no stranger to changing up her 'do.”
“From bobs to pixies to even different types of bangs, she's tried it all.”
“While the actress has been a blonde for most of her career, in May 2016, she stepped out with platinum locks that created instant summer hair color inspiration.”


Related:
"What's her next step?"
"Jennifer Lawrence changed her hair again, banged it!"
In the upcoming film Red sparrow, the 26 year old was recently filmed swinging some fashionable and straightforward bangs on the stage
"We haven't seen Lawrence rock for a long time."
"Flynet pictures released through splash news, although the new 'do' is likely to be the Russian spy she plays in the film, we're not sure whether it's a wig or a real cut."
"She looks great. We hope the tassel will stay."
"Lawrence is no stranger to changing his behavior."
"She's tried everything from Bobbie to elves, even different types of bangs."
"Although the actress has been a blonde for most of her career, in May 2016, she came out with her blonde locks and instantly created the inspiration for summer hair color."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PTI RDS RDS RDS -”
“We shouldnt write a book but it was so sweet of him to say that," Loughlin added.”
“"We were talking a couple of weeks ago and he said to me, You and (your husband) should write a book on how to parent kids because your girls are so great, which is such a high compliment.”
“News.”
“I have two girls who are 18 and 19 and he just adores them," she told E!”
“He is very complimentary to me about my own girls.”
“I will say this.”
“I think John is going to be a great dad but of course he knows Im here for him should he need any but I think him and Caitlin have it covered.”
“"I dont think John needs any parental advice.”
“Loughlin, who has onscreen twins Nicky and Alex with Stamos character, Jesse Katsopolis in the hit TV series, said she believes the new couple has the situation under control.”


"PTI radio data system"-
"We shouldn't have written a book, but it's nice of him to say that," Laughlin added
"We were talking a few weeks ago, and he told me that you and (your husband) should write a book about how to be parents for your children, because your daughters are wonderful. It's a high compliment."
"News."
"I have two girls, 18 and 19, and he adores them," she told e! "
"He was very appreciative of my own daughter."
"I'll say that."
"I think John will be a great father, but of course he knows I'm here for him if he needs anything, but I think he and Caitlin have solved it."
"I don't think John needs any advice from his parents."
"Twin Nicky and Alex, who played the role of Jesse casopolis in the hit TV series, appeared on the screen. Lorraine said she believed the couple's situation was under control."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“How nice!”
“And luckily, if the kids ever get to the point where they want to run away to Aunt Meg and Uncle Harry’s house, they all live in the same palace anyway.”
“I assume the young princes and princess will feel comfortable talking shit about their parents to their dear Aunt Meg when they’re teens, and they’ll all have a ton of fun joking around with Uncle Harry, who is very similar to a child in many ways.”
“...pic.twitter.com/HsX2Xm1pXj — Rebecca English (@RE_DailyMail) July 9, 2018Can’t you just imagine them taking their niece and nephews out to shows (at a palace, probably) and letting them eat dessert (well, healthy dessert) at times when Kate and Prince William won’t?”
“Sussex after he officiated at their wedding...”
“And at Prince Louis s very fancy royal christening Aunt Meg clad in a green boatneck ensemble by American designer Ralph Lauren and a hat by Stephen Jones and Uncle Harry looked every part the Lots to giggle about with the Archbishop of Canterbury for the Duke and Duchess of...”
“So now, she’s not just, Duchess Meghan of Sussex and Suits and California; she’s also Aunt “Meg,” while Prince Harry is presumably known as Uncle Harry.”
“...two royal nephews Prince George and Prince Louis who at the time was a brand spanking new baby...”
“When Meghan married Prince Harry in a very royal wedding back in May she not only acquired a new royal life new royal title new royal blog inspired coat of arms and perhaps most importantly new royal wardrobe budget but she also got a new royal niece Princess Charlotte and...”
“Yes, we’re talking about Meghan Markle and Prince Harry.”


"How nice
"Fortunately, if the children get to the point where they want to escape to Aunt MEG and Uncle Harry, they live in the same palace anyway."
"I think young princes and princesses will be happy to talk about their parents with their dear aunt MEG when they are teenagers. They will all joke with Uncle Harry, who is like a child in many ways."
“... pic.twitter.com/HsX2Xm1pXj -Rebecca English (@ re / u dailymail) July 9, 2018 can't you imagine them taking their nieces and nephews to a show (probably in the palace) and letting Kate and Prince William have dessert (healthy dessert) when they don't want to? "
"After Sussex married them..."
"At Prince Louis's very fancy Royal baptism, aunt MEG was wearing a green neck suit designed by American designer Ralph Lauren and a hat designed by Stephen Jones and Uncle Harry. She looked like the Archbishop of Canterbury was everywhere for Where the Duke and Duchess laugh. "
"So now, she's not only the Duchess of Sussex and the suit and Megan in California; she's also aunt MEG, and Prince Harry is probably called Uncle Harry."
“… Two royal nephews, Prince George and Prince Louis, were a brand new baby at the time
"Megan had a royal wedding with Prince Harry in May. She not only got a new royal life, a new royal title, a new royal blog inspired badge, and perhaps most importantly, a new royal wardrobe budget. She also got a new royal niece, Princess Charlotte, and..."
"Yes, we're talking about Megan markel and Prince Harry."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Markle and Prince Harry are set to tie the knot on May 19, 2018 at St George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle.”
“She is also writing a tell-all book about the former Suits actress.”
“This isn’t the first time Grant has spoken publicly about her half sister.”
“Grant tweeted in part “actually she has a large family who were always there with her and for her.”Grant went on to write how Meghan always had a family and that “marrying merely extends it.”Samantha also talked about their father, Thomas Markle.”
“She’s done an absolutely amazing job, she’s getting in there and it’s the family that I suppose she never had.”Hours after that interview aired, Markle’s estranged half sister, Samantha Grant, took to twitter to respond to that particular comment.”
““I think we’ve got one of the biggest families that I know of and every family is complex as well.”
“(WTNH)– Meghan Markle‘s half sister is firing back at Prince Harry after he said that the royals were the family that his fiancée “never had.”In an interview with BBC Radio 4’s Today program, Prince Harry talked about spending the holidays with Markle and his family.”


"Mark and Prince Harry are scheduled to be married on May 19, 2018 at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"She's also writing a popular book about the former actress in a suit."
"This is not the first time grant has talked publicly about her half sister."
"In fact, she has a big family that has been with her and her all the time," grant tweeted Grant went on to write that Megan always had a family, "marriage is just expanding the family." Samantha also talked about their father, Thomas markel
"She's done a great job and she's integrating into it. I don't think she's ever had a family like this." Hours after the interview aired, markel's estranged half sister, Samantha grant, responded to the comment on twitter
"I think we have the biggest family I know, and each family is complicated."
Megan markel's half sister fought back after Prince Harry said members of the royal family were his fiancee's "never had a family.". In an interview with BBC Radio 4 today, Prince Harry talked about his holiday with markel and his family



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We keep trying to be creative, we keep pushing the boundaries,” he said.”
“I just want to make sure she is taking care of her body.”And with just a few weeks left before the Mirror Ball Trophy is awarded, Mark and Lindsey are really in it to win it!”
“Please keep me in your prayers,” Lindsey concluded.”
“You guys believe in me even when I doubt myself.”
“Thank you so much for your support.”
“I believe I can do this and it’s real now.”
“I’ve reminded myself why I do what I do and I have my fire back.”
““This week, I am being very careful with how I pace my body and I’m feeling a little stronger every day.”
“Sometimes you have to fake it till you make it.” Luckily, it seems Lindsey and Mark will also appear on tonight’s DWTS episode!”
“I basically forced myself to believe I could make it through that dance.”


"We've been trying to create and break through boundaries," he said
"I just want to make sure she takes care of her body." Just a few weeks before the presentation of the mirror ball trophy, mark and Lindsay really want to win it
"Pray for me," Lindsay concluded
"Even if I doubt myself, you believe me."
"Thank you very much for your support."
"I believe I can do that, and now it's real."
"I have reminded myself why I should do what I should do, and my fire is back."
"This week, I've been very careful with my body pace and feel a little bit strong every day."
"Sometimes you have to pretend it until you do it." Fortunately, Lindsay and mark seem to be on DWTS tonight as well
"I basically forced myself to believe that I could finish that dance."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News of the HBO cyber attack was first reported by EW.”
“The massive 2014 Sony hack is the most memorable of recent Hollywood cyber attacks, when thousands of emails and confidential information, including pay information for its top executives, were leaked online.”
“Data protection is a top priority at HBO, and we take seriously our responsibility to protect the data we hold.”HBO is not commenting on what content might have been stolen, is not naming specific titles or the amount of data accessed in the hack.”
“This morning, HBO chairman and CEO Richard Plepler sent an email to HBO employees alerting them of the breach.”
“You can read it in full below:Dear Colleagues, As most of you have probably heard by now, there has been a cyber incident directed at the company which has resulted in some stolen proprietary information, including some of our programming.”
“Any intrusion of this nature is obviously disruptive, unsettling, and disturbing for all of us.”
“I can assure you that senior leadership and our extraordinary technology team, along with outside experts, are working round the clock to protect our collective interests.”
“The efforts across multiple departments have been nothing short of herculean.”
“It is a textbook example of quintessential HBO teamwork.”
“The problem before us is unfortunately all too familiar in the world we now find ourselves a part of.”


"The news of HBO network attack was first reported by EW."
"Sony's massive hacker attack in 2014 was the most unforgettable of the recent Hollywood cyber attacks, when thousands of emails and confidential information, including the salary information of its executives, were leaked online."
"Data protection is the top priority of HBO, and we take the responsibility of protecting the data we have seriously." HBO did not comment on what might have been stolen, nor did it name specific titles or the amount of data hackers accessed
"This morning, Richard pleplepler, chairman and CEO of HBO, sent an email to HBO employees reminding them of violations."
"You can read through the following, dear colleagues. As most of you may have heard by now, there is a network incident against the company, which led to the theft of some proprietary information, including some of our programs."
"Any invasion of this nature is obviously destructive, disturbing and disturbing to all of us."
"I can assure you that our senior leadership and excellent technical team, as well as external experts, are working day and night to protect our collective interests."
"The effort across multiple departments is a giant."
"This is a typical example of HBO teamwork."
"Unfortunately, the problems before us are too common in the world we live in now."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Garcia and Johnson are parents to 17-year-old daughter Simone Alexandra Johnson.”
“Like, try to think about things like that, and think about your goals."”
“— I always say, 'You gotta put in the work, and just remember that you were friends beforehand.'”
“But I always tell people and I always tell couples who are going through it — especially the dudes who seek out my advice who are like, 'How did you do it?'”
“You gotta get your therapy and you got to go through it.”
“"A lot of times you see the glitz and the glamour of here in Hollywood and it’s a big premiere, but that's the kind of sludgy stuff that everybody goes through.”
“"You never sign up for divorce … And we started out as friends and through divorce we still remain friends, but that kind of stuff takes a lot of work," the actor continued.”
“"For everybody out there, relationships aren't easy, marriages aren't easy, you gotta work at it."”
“...about working together post-breakup at the premiere of Hobbs & Shaw, which Garcia executive produced.”
“"It's not [easy]," he told E!”


"Garcia and Johnson are the parents of their 17-year-old daughter Simone Alexandra Johnson."
"For example, try to think about things like this, think about your goals."
"I always say, 'you have to get into work and remember that you were friends in advance.'"
"But I always tell people, and I always tell couples who are going through it - especially those who ask for my advice, and they say, 'how did you do that?'"
"You have to be treated, you have to experience it."
"A lot of times you'll see the glitz and glamour here in Hollywood. It's a big premiere, but it's a dirty thing that everyone has experienced."
"You never sign a divorce agreement We were friends at first, and we are still friends after the divorce, but this kind of thing takes a lot of effort, "the actor continued
"For everyone, it's not easy to be in a relationship, it's not easy to get married, you have to work hard."
“…… About working together after breaking up at the premiere of Hobbes and Bernard Shaw, this is directed by Garcia
"It's not easy," he told e! "



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to tune in to all the drama every Tuesday at 9PM on Bravo.”
“This “Watch What Happens Live” seems to be foreshadowing the drama of the upcoming “Real Housewives of beverly hills” reunion.”
“The women of the show gathered on a special Los Angeles edition of “Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen” last night.”
“The stars joined Cohen on stage at the Wiltern Theatre to answer some fan questions and things escalated quickly.”
“The ladies did not hold back on their snarky comments toward not only one another but audience members.”
“Throwing shadeAccording to E!”
“News, one fan asked the stars what their taglines for each other would be.”
“Cohen said that Lisa Vanderpump had a “very shady one” for her fellow co-star and fremeny Lisa Rinna.”
“Vanderpump admitted, "Oh, I just said, ‘Go back to selling dusters and diapers.” This was an obvious reference to Lisa Rinna’s clothing line on QVC and her once appearing in a Depend commercial.”
“Rinna, who is known on the show for not holding back was quick to reply, "And guess what, honey?”


"Be sure to listen to all Bravo's shows at 9 p.m. every Tuesday night."
"This" see what happens "seems to herald the upcoming reunion of" the real housewife of Beverly Hills. "
Last night, the women on the show gathered in the Los Angeles special edition of "watch what's going on with Andy Cohen"
"The stars and Cohen were on stage at the Wilton theatre to answer questions from fans, and things quickly escalated."
"The ladies did not flinch from making sharp comments not only to each other but also to the audience."
"Throw the shade!"
"In the news, a fan asked the stars what their slogans were."
Cohen said Lisa vandepum had a "very dark one" for her partner, fremeney Lisa Lina
Van der Pugh admits, "Oh, I just said," go back and sell dusters and diapers. " This obviously refers to Lisa Lina's clothing line on QVC, which she once appeared in a commercial
"Lina, who is known on the show for not flinching, quickly replied," guess what, honey? "



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll through the gallery below for photos of Kailyn and her adorable baby bump!”
“You deserve a little R&R!”
“She doesn’t care about the financial side of things, as she’s more than capable of supporting her kids herself, but she would love for him to be part of his child’s life.”In the meantime, soak up the sun in paradise, mama!”
“According to an insider from Hollywood life, “Kailyn’s hoping he will change his mind when the baby arrives.”
“She is estranged from her third baby daddy Chris Lopez but is still hoping for a reunion.”
“MORE: Amber Portwood Shares a Photo of Her Punching “Wounds” One Day After Shocking Domestic Violence ClaimsLowry’s son Lincoln, 3, is with her ex-husband Javi Marroquin at Comic Con this week, and her son Isaac, 7, is with her ex-boyfriend Jo Rivera.”
“...my GoPro so I could be entertained while I m in the water by myself Just last week she retweeted I want to take spontaneous trips and it appears she followed through...”
“The boys were with their dads so she went for a few days The pregnant star has also been using Twitter to document her solo trip with one tweet saying Baby Lo and I just went for our first ocean swim of the summer before adding I should ve brought...”
“MORE: Kailyn Lowry Wants Chris Lopez Back Even Though “He Doesn’t Want Anything to Do With the Baby” (REPORT)According to Radar Online, a source close to Kailyn said, “She wanted to go back to Puerto Rico before the baby comes.”
““Paradise this week,” she captioned one photo.”


"Scroll through the gallery below to see pictures of Karin and her lovely little lump!"
"You deserve a little R & R!"
"She doesn't care about the economy because she has the ability to support her child, but she wants him to be a part of her child's life." Meanwhile, enjoy the sunshine in heaven, mom
"According to an insider in Hollywood life," Kelly wants him to change his mind when the baby is born. "
"She was estranged from her third baby dad, Chris Lopez, but still wanted to meet again."
More information: Amber Portwood shared a picture of her punching and kicking "wounds" the day after the shocking domestic violence. This week, three-year-old son Lincoln and ex husband Javi Marroquin are at the comic show, while seven year old son Isaac is with ex boyfriend Jo Rivera
“… My GoPro, so I can entertain myself while I'm in the water on her own last week. I want to take a spontaneous trip, as if she followed... "
"The children were with their father, so she went for a few days. The pregnant star has been using Twitter to record her personal travel. One micro blog said that Luo Baobao and I just participated in our first ocean swimming this summer, and then added that I should take..."
"More: Caroline lorry wants Chris Lopez back, even though" he doesn't want to have anything to do with the baby "(report) according to radar online, a source close to Caroline said," she wants to go back to Puerto Rico before the baby is born. "
"Paradise of the week," she wrote under the title of a photo



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...women with accusations against Weinstein as well as reporters working on the story...”
“Boies told the New Yorker that the arrangement was a mistake In a statement to the New Yorker Weinstein spokeswoman Sallie Hofmeister accused the publication of trafficking in inaccuracies and wild conspiracy theories According to the story Black Cube also retained a freelance journalist to contact McGowan and two other...”
“Running such an investigation through a law firm can make it subject to attorney-client privilege, which would protect it from disclosure in litigation.”
“The story also highlights the role of David Boies, of the firm of Boies Schiller Flexner LLP, who is said to have overseen much of the spying effort.”
“Weinstein employed Black Cube and Kroll, a corporate security firm, in an effort to block stories in the New Yorker and the New York Times detailing decades of allegations of sexual misconduct, according to the New Yorker.”
“The firm employed undercover agents, one of whom posed as a women’s rights activist, to meet with McGowan and obtain information on her forthcoming book, the story states.”
“According to the report, Weinstein hired Black Cube, a firm run by former Mossad agents, to collect information on Rose McGowan, who has accused Weinstein of rape.”
“Harvey Weinstein employed private investigators to spy on his accusers and keep tabs on reporters investigating his past, according to a report in the New Yorker.”


“… The women accused of Weinstein and the reporters who reported on it... "
"Boyce told the new Yorker that this arrangement is a mistake. In a statement, Sally Hofmeister, a spokeswoman for Weinstein, a new Yorker, accused of publishing inaccurate and crazy conspiracy theories about human trafficking. It is reported that the black cube also hired a free journalist, McGovern and two others..."
"Conducting such an investigation through a law firm can make it subject to lawyer client privilege, which will protect it from disclosure in litigation."
"The story also highlights the role of David boies of boies Schiller Flexner LLP, who is said to supervise most espionage activities."
Weinstein hired black cube and Kroll, a corporate security company, to try to prevent the new Yorker and the New York Times from reporting decades of allegations of sexual misconduct, according to the new Yorker
The company hired undercover agents, one of them posing as a feminist, to meet with McGovern to get information about her upcoming book story
"According to reports, Weinstein hired black cube, a company run by former Mossad agents, to collect information from rose McGovern, who accused Weinstein of rape."
According to a new Yorker report, Harvey Weinstein hired private investigators to keep an eye on his accusers and keep a close eye on the reporters investigating his past



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“New role: Meanwhile, it's reported that Berry, who wore a lovely pinstripe coat dress to the awards show, is set to star in a remake of the 1985 thriller Jagged Edge...”
“Robert Loggia played a private detective assigned to learning the truth about what really happened as Close becomes convinced of her client's innocence.”
“Close played the attorney he hired to defend him and the two embark on a passionate affair as his case winds through a trial.”
“The original starred Glenn Close and Jeff Bridges with Bridges playing a wealthy publisher accused of brutally murdering his wife.”
“...the 1985 thriller Jagged Edge...”
“They re pictured at the London premiere for the Warner Bros production Candid Berry made her remarks in a speech at the Matrix Awards in New York Monday night where she was one of seven honorees Meanwhile it s reported that Berry is set to star in a remake of...”
“Leather and whips: The actress, 51, took on the role of the DC Comics character after winning an Oscar for Monster's BallLaughing all the way to the bank: Berry starred with Sharon Stone in the 2004 film.”
“She added: 'And I got that gift, and I got a s***load of money that changed my life.'”
“I got to learn two forms of martial arts and I got to learn what not to do, and learning what not to do is as important as learning what to do,' she said.”
“'I met so many interesting people that I wouldn't have met otherwise.”


"New character: meanwhile, it was reported that Berry was wearing a cute pinstriped coat to attend the award ceremony and will play in the remake of 1985 thriller sawtooth edge..."
"Robert Loja plays a private detective who is assigned to know the truth when cross is convinced that his client is innocent."
"Close plays the lawyer he hired to defend him, and as his case ends in court, the two start a passionate relationship."
"The original is starring Glenn cross and Jeff Bridges, who plays a wealthy publisher accused of murdering his wife brutally."
“…… The 1985 thriller edge of the saw
"Their photos at Warner Bros. premiere in London. On Monday night, brandy berry, one of the seven winners, spoke at the matrix awards ceremony in New York. Meanwhile, it is reported that berry will play in a remake of the film... "
"Whip and whip: after winning the Oscar for" monster's ball, "51 year old berry starred in" all the way to the bank: berry "with Sharon Stone in 2004
"I got that gift, I got a lot of money and it changed my life," she added
"I want to learn two kinds of martial arts. What I want to learn and what I don't do is as important as what I learn," she said
"I met so many interesting people, otherwise I would not have met them."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Brother had to work.”
“"She starts running through Koreatown, and I start running along with her.”
“"I snuck in and I saw his audition, and I thought to myself, 'If this man can do this at 17 years old, my God.”
“We were both freshmen in college," she told the publication.”
“"I saw Sterling audition for Joe Turner's Come And Gone.”
“Bathe recalled in an interview with People that she was wowed by his talent even then.”
“Bathe and Brown first met while studying at Stanford University in 1998, where they lived in the same dorm and starred in plays together.”
“How Did Sterling K. Brown Meet His Wife?”
“Here's exactly how the pair got together.”
“Though their marriage seems solid now, their relationship has had twists and turns that rival the drama played out on their respective TV shows.”


"Brother has to work."
"She started running in Koreatown, and I started running with her."
"I sneaked in, saw his audition, and thought, if this guy can do it at 17, my God."
"We are all freshmen," she told the journal
"I've seen Stirling audition for Joe Turner's come and go."
"Even then, Buss recalled in an interview with people magazine, she was shocked by his talent."
Buss and brown met for the first time when they were studying at Stanford University in 1998. They lived in the same dorm and acted in a drama together
"How did Sterling K. Brown know his wife?"
"How did the two get together?"
"Although their marriage now looks very solid, their relationship has gone through twists and turns, which is on a par with their respective TV dramas."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yikes: Meanwhile, the other housewives: Kyle Richards, Erika Giradi, Lisa Vanderpump, Camille Grammer and Teddy Mellencamp Arroyave tried eavesdropping on Lisa and Dorit's conversation; Kyle and Erike picturedTrying to watch it go down: Kyle, Camille, Lisa and Teddy attempt to listen in on their chat...”
“The Real Housewives Of Beverly Hills airs on Bravo on Tuesday nights at 9 pm PST.”
“And in episode two of season eight, Lisa Rinna told Dorit Kemsley that she doesn't 'want to rehash the past' during their holiday in Las Vegas, according to a preview via Us Weekly.”
“Dorit claimed she didn't know her husband Paul Kemsley called Lisa 'certifiable,' 'a drug addict' and a 'schizophrenic.'”
“Drama Lisa Rinna told Dorit Kemsley that she doesn t want to rehash the past during their holiday in Las Vegas according to a preview via Us Weekly for season eight s second episode When Lisa brought up the name calling after at first saying she didn t want to...”
“...rehash the past Dorit refused to apologize denying he said anything...”
“Lisa said: 'Your husband said some pretty strong things about me, you know.”
“You have to think about that.”
“You don't want me to have to rehash it.'”
“A recap of scenes from RHOBH is played where Dorit's husband Paul does in fact call Lisa 'certifiable,' 'a drug addict' and a 'schizophrenic.'”


"Ike: meanwhile, other housewives: Kyle Richards, Erica Girardi, Lisa van der PANP, Camille grammer and teddy merenkamp aroya try to eavesdrop on Lisa and dorit; Kyle and Eric imagine watching the conversation go on: Kyle, Camille, Lisa and Teddy try to eavesdrop on their conversation..."
"The real housewife of Beverly Hills" will air in Bravo at 9pm PST on Tuesday
"In the second episode of Season 8, Lisa Lina tells Dorothy Kemsley that she doesn't want to revisit the past while on holiday in Las Vegas, according to the trailer of American weekly."
"Dorit claims that she did not know that her husband Paul Kemsley called Lisa" provable, "" drug addict "and" schizophrenic. "
"According to the trailer for the second episode of Season 8 of American weekly, actress Lisa Lina tells dorit Kemsley that she doesn't want to talk about the past when she's on holiday in Las Vegas because Lisa says at first that she doesn't want to..."
“… Looking back on the past, dorit refuses to apologize and denies what he said... "
"Lisa said," you know, your husband said something very powerful about me. "
"You have to think about it."
"You don't want me to wash it again."
"A repeat of robuch's scene is that dorit's husband Paul actually calls Lisa" provable, "" drug addict, "and" schizophrenic. "



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kloss posted a candid selfie with Beatrice at the event, captioned “My wedding date.”Image zoom Karlie Kloss and Princess Beatrice | Credit: Karlie Kloss/Instagram...”
“Followers include Beatrice’s mom, Sarah Ferguson, Prince Harry’s ex-girlfriend, Chelsy Davy, and supermodel Cara Delevigne.”
“On her Instagram story Wednesday morning, the supermodel, who confirmed her engagement to longtime boyfriend Joshua Kushner on Tuesday, posted a series of her famous friends’ reactions on FaceTime.”
“First were her sisters Kimby and Kristine, then came Grandma, followed by Penni Thow, a board member of Kode with Klossy, and childhood friend Davis Petrash.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But Princess Beatrice’s reaction might have been the sweetest of them all.”
“The royal’s jaw immediately dropped after her friend flashed her new engagement ring.”
“But what’s even more noteworthy is the Instagram handle Kloss tagged over the screenshot — @beayork, which is Princess Beatrice’s private account.”
“(Her official title is Princess Beatrice of York.)”
“The 1,021 people she follows is set to private.”


"Close released a candid selfie with Beatrice at the event, titled" my wedding date. ". Image zooming: Carly cross and Princess Beatrice | image source: Carly Cross / instagram... "
"Fans include Beatrice's mother, Sarah Ferguson, Prince Harry's ex girlfriend, Chelsea David, and supermodel Carla delaviny
"On Wednesday morning, the supermodel posted a series of famous friends' reactions to FaceTime on instagram. On Tuesday, she confirmed her engagement to her longtime boyfriend, Joshua Kushner. "
"First her sisters kimby and Christine, then her grandmother, then Penny toff, a member of the board of directors of Lockheed, and her childhood friend Davis petrash."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But Princess Beatrice's reaction is probably the sweetest of all."
"After her friend showed off her new engagement ring, the Royal chin fell off immediately."
"But more importantly, the instagram handle kloss - @ beayork marked on the screenshot is Princess Beatrice's private account."
(her official title is Princess Beatrice of York.)
"The 1021 people she followed were classified as private."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The series hails from Carsey-Werner Television.”
“Barr is executive producing Roseanne with Gilbert, Tom Werner, Bruce Helford, Whitney Cummings and Tony Hernandez.”
“That series returns for its eighth season November 5.”
“Kenney has played Debbie Gallagher for the entire duration of Shameless‘ run, so she knows about playing a kid in a dysfunctional family (spoiler alert: no TV family can touch the Gallaghers for dysfunction).”
“Production on an eight-episode run is set to begin next month for an early 2018 premiere.”
“Roseanne Barr, John Goodman, Laurie Metcalf, Michael Fishman, Lecy Goranson and Sarah Chalke also return for the new take on the Connor clan.”
“She has been set to play the daughter of Darlene and David Connor in the revival of the series; Sara Gilbert is returning as Darlene and Big Bang Theory‘s Johnny Galecki is expected to return as David.”
“Emma Kenney, a series regular on Showtime’s Shameless, has joined the cast of ABC’s reboot of Roseanne.”


"This series is from Cathy Warner."
Barr and Gilbert, Tom Werner, Bruce Helford, Whitney Cummings and Tony Hernandez co direct Anne the rose
"The series will return to season 8 on November 5."
"Kenny played Debbie Gallagher in the shameless run, so she knew to play the child of a dysfunctional family (spoiler Alert: no TV family can touch the Gallaghers because of dysfunctions)."
"Production of the eight episode series is scheduled to start next month and premiere in early 2018."
"Rosanna Barr, John Goodman, Laurie Metcalf, Michael Fishman, Lacey glanson and Sarah Chalke will also return to the new battlefield of the Connor family."
"She has been arranged to play Darlene and David Connor's daughter in the revival of the series; Sarah Gilbert will return as Darlene, while Johnny gelecki of the Big Bang is expected to return as David."
"Emma Kenney is a regular on the Showtime series and has joined ABC's rebroadcast of Roseanne."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But good luck with all of that.”
“As of this writing, there are no updates on the lawsuit.”
“He also stated that the restitution he paid to victims was a result of "coercion" by his attorneys, which amounted to "wire fraud, racketeering and 'money laundry.'"”
“Fogle specifically alleged that he was duped into a guilty plea by "bogus conspiracy charges" brought by prosecutors.”
“In March 2018, Fogle made the news again when he and two fellow inmates filed a lawsuit against "federal authorities and his former attorneys" for what one of the men summarized to USA Today as "constitutional violations, government overreach and convictions not based in the law."”
“Despite being punished for the attack, Nigg wrote, "I have no regrets."”
“"Other child molesters looked at him as if he was a God," Nigg wrote.”
“The assailant, Steve Nigg, wrote a letter obtained by the tab explaining that he beat up Fogle because the spokesman is allegedly treated like a "hero" amongst other molesters and uses bodyguards to protect himself.”
“In March 2017, he was beaten by a fellow inmate, reported TMZ.”
“Prison life hasn't been easy for the sandwich slinger.”


"But good luck."
"As of press time, there is no latest news about the lawsuit."
He also said that the compensation he paid to the victims was the result of "coercion" by his lawyers, which is equivalent to "telecommunications fraud, extortion and" money laundering. "
Vogel specifically charged that he was deceived by the prosecutor's "false conspiracy charges" to plead guilty
"In March 2018, Vogel and two inmates filed a lawsuit against one of them for" unconstitutional, government ultra vires and conviction not based on law "summarized by USA today, which once again became the focus of the news."
"Despite the punishment of the attack, nigh wrote," I don't regret it. “
"Other child molesters looked at him as if he were God," nigh wrote
The attacker, Steve Nigg, wrote a letter obtained by tab, explaining that he beat Vogel because he was said to have been treated as a "hero" among other indecent people and used bodyguards to protect himself
"In March 2017, he was beaten by a cellmate," TMZ reported
"Prison life is not easy for those who throw sandwiches."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple obtained their marriage license one week ago in New York City, meaning they have only 53 days before the license expires.”
“The twosome were frequently stopped by adoring fans as they took in the Italian sightsIt's likely the two are doing wedding planning while on their getaway.”
“While they were joined by a few pals on the yacht, they were nowhere to be seen as the twosome began intensely locking gazes and subsequently, locking lips.”
“...on the yacht they were nowhere to be seen as the twosome began intensely locking gazes and subsequently locking lips Justin then positioned a towel on his mane to help it dry quicker and made his Hailey were they began putting on a very passionate display...”
“...some time in the water before making their way back on board All about her Justin then positioned a towel on his mane to help it dry quicker and made his Hailey were they began putting on a very passionate display Intense While they were joined by a few pals...”
“Time to unwind Taking a break from his hectic superstar schedule Justin was clearly enjoying the slower pace of life as he went shirtless to exhibit his plethora of tattoos Fun in the sun The genetically gifted couple looked to be in the mood for some adrenaline as they enjoyed...”
“Justin was seen attempting to dry himself off by propping a towel on his shoulders, while a pair of diving goggles rested on his head.”
“The genetically gifted couple looked to be in the mood for some adrenaline as they enjoyed some time in the water before making their way back on board.”
“The Sorry hitmaker opted for a pair of navy swimshorts with a white drawstring and he sported longer locks.”
“...they looked happy and relaxed in each other s presence Taking a break from his hectic superstar schedule Justin was clearly enjoying the slower pace of life as he went shirtless to exhibit his plethora of tattoos...”


"The couple got their marriage certificate in New York a week ago, which means they are only 53 days away from the expiration of their marriage certificate."
"When they are sightseeing in Italy, they are often stopped by admiring fans. It is very likely that they are planning their wedding on holiday."
When a couple of friends were on the yacht with them, the two of them started staring at each other tightly, then closed their lips and disappeared
“…… On the yacht, they disappeared. They began to stare at each other and close their lips. Justin put a towel on his mane to make his mane dry faster and make his Haley look very enthusiastic... "
“… Before returning to the boat, Justin stayed in the water for a while, then put a towel on his mane to help the mane dry faster, and let his Haley start to perform enthusiastically with the participation of several friends... "
"It's time to take a break from the busy superstar schedule. Justin obviously enjoys the slowing down of the pace of life, because he goes to battle naked and shows too much fun of tattooing in the sun. While enjoying it, the couple with genetic talent seem to be in the mood to take some suprarenal glandular hormone..."
Justin was seen trying to dry himself with a towel on his shoulder and wearing a pair of diving glasses on his head
"The genetically gifted couple spent some time in the water before returning to the boat and looked like they wanted to drink adrenaline."
"The poor killer chose a pair of navy blue swimsuits with a white drawstring, and he had a longer lock."
“…… They look very happy and relaxed in front of each other. Taking a break from the busy superstar schedule, Justin obviously enjoys the slowing down of the pace of life, because he goes barefoot and shows too many tattoos... "



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Age is just a number.””
“I am happy in France.”
“I love him of course.”
“Speaking on ITV’s Life Stories, Pammy said of Rami, 31: “He is fantastic.”
““He wanted me to come to his inauguration and give him flowers.”(Image: PA)(Image: Getty Images Europe)She also said she had lunch last month with WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange at the Ecuadorian Embassy, in London, where he is holed up.”
“One for sex, one for conversation, one for entertainment’.”(Image: ITV)(Image: Getty Images Europe)Asked about Putin, she said: “I have a great relationship with Russia.”
““My aunt used to say, ‘One man can’t do it all.”
“But I have been married a lot.”
“She said: “I do want to get married again in my lifetime.”
“The former Baywatch star, 50, has been linked to Julian Assange , French footballer Adil Rami and even Russian premier Vladimir Putin recently.”


"Age is just a number."
"I'm happy in France."
"Of course I love him."
In ITV's life story, Pammy said of the 31 year old Lamy: "he's great."
"He wanted me to come to his inauguration and send him flowers." (photo: PA) (photo: Getty Images Europe) she also said she had lunch with Wikileaks founder Julian Assange at the Ecuadorian Embassy in London where he was hiding last month
"One for sex, one for conversation, one for entertainment." (picture: ITV) (picture: Getty Images Europe) asked about Putin, she said: "I have a good relationship with Russia."
"Auntie used to say that one person can't do everything."
"But I got married a lot."
"I really want to remarry in my lifetime," she said
The 50 year old former Gulf watch Star has recently been linked with Julian Assange, French footballer Adil Lamy and even Russian Prime Minister Vladimir Putin



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more, watch the full video above.”
“(Spoiler alert: Their characters got married in the series finale.)”
“Of course, PLL fans know that Harding played Ezra Fitz, who just so happened to be Hale’s love interest on the show.”
“Meanwhile, Hale revealed that way back in season 1 she actually had a crush on Ian Harding.”
“Spencer’s dad — on the series.”
“Benson and Mitchell admit to having had a crush on Nolan North, who played Mr. Hastings — a.k.a.”
“Together, stars Sasha Pieterse, Lucy Hale, Ashley Benson, Shay Mitchell, and Troian Bellisario get candid about making assistants cry, lying about their ages, and even on-set crushes.”
“Ellen DeGeneres’ new YouTube series, Ellen’s Show Me More Show, released a video with the PLL cast — presumably from their visit back in April — where the women of Rosewood are asked to play a little game of Never Have I Ever.”
“Pretty Little Liars: Lucy Hale reveals her season 1 crush on Ian HardingPretty Little Liars Close Streaming OptionsIt’s been three months since Pretty Little Liars ended, and now, the truth is finally coming out.”


"For more information, watch the full video above."
(spoiler Alert: their character got married at the end of the series.)
"Of course, PLL fans know that Harding is playing Ezra Fitz, and that's exactly what Hale is interested in on the show."
"At the same time, hale revealed that as early as the first season, she was in love with Ian Harding."
"Spencer's dad - in the show."
"Benson and Mitchell admit that they were infatuated with Nolan north, who played Mr. Hastings, that is to say."
"Stars such as Sasha Pierce, Lucy hale, Ashley Benson, Shea Mitchell and Troy Pele SARIO have frankly made their assistants cry, lied about their age and even become infatuated with them on the set."
"Ellen DeGeneres' new YouTube series, Ellen's show me more show, along with PLL, released a video - probably from their visit in April - that mahogany women were asked to play a little game" I've never played before. "
"Pretty little liar: Lucy Hale revealed her infatuation with Ian Harding in the first season. Pretty little liar short distance streaming media choice. It's been three months since the pretty little liar ended. Now, the truth has finally come out."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gomez said the surgery has transformed her life.”
“I guess I got to the point where it was really kind of life or death,” she said.”
““She lived with me in this interesting time where my kidneys were just done.”
“Gomez couldn’t believe that her friend would not only volunteer one of her kidneys, but that she turned out to be a match.”
“A process that normally takes months was expedited and completed within a day.”
“Raísa immediately got her blood and urine tested and underwent a full physical and psychological evaluation.”
“Gomez and Raísa became close friends after first meeting about a decade ago.”
“I was like, ‘Of course I'll get tested.'"”
“The list is seven-to-10-years long,’” said Raísa, an actress on the upcoming Freeform show, “Grown-ish.” “And it just vomited out of me.”
““And she goes, ‘I don't know what to do.”


"Gomez said the surgery changed her life."
"I think I've reached a real point of life and death," she said
"She and I live in an interesting time when my kidney is just finished."
"Gomez can't believe that her friend not only volunteered to donate one of her kidneys, but also proved that she was a match."
"A process that usually takes months is accelerated and completed in one day."
"Lisa immediately underwent blood and urine tests and received a comprehensive physical and psychological assessment."
"About ten years ago, Gomez and Lhasa became close friends after their first meeting."
"I said," of course I'm going to be tested. "
"This list is seven to 10 years old," said Lhasa, an actress on the upcoming free-form show growing ISH. "It just came out of my mouth."
"She said," I don't know what to do. "



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:'Hollywood Medium' Tyler Henry Reveals 3 Biggest Regrets the Deceased Have After They ‘Transition’ (Exclusive)'Hollywood Medium' Tyler Henry Says Michael Jackson Relayed 'Deeply Personal' Messages to His Kids (Exclusive)Kristin Cavallari Breaks Down as ‘Hollywood Medium’ Tyler Henry Talks About Her Brother's Death...”
“Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry airs Wednesdays at 9 p.m. ET/PT on E!”
“Only ET has an exclusive sneak peek at Wednesday's episode, in which Henry sits down with David and Rosanna Arquette to discuss their late sibling, Alexis, who died in September 2016.”
“"For some reason, they're having me talk about four kids, the four siblings.”
“The four situation," Henry begins, working through his thoughts on a piece of paper.”
“"There are four of us," David confirms.”
“"It's that kind of energy that to me feels almost premature, as I would be viewing, too soon," Henry continues.”
“"There's really a priority of wanting to refer to the siblings, and talking about the siblings.”
“That's where all the focus is.”
“It's like, essential.”


"Related content:" Hollywood media "Taylor Henry reveals three regrets of the dead after" transformation "(exclusive)'hollywood media 'Taylor Henry says Michael Jackson conveyed a" very personal "message to the children (exclusive)'hollywood media' Taylor Henry broke down when he talked about his brother's death..."
"Hollywood media and Tyler Henry on Wednesday at 9pm EST!"
"Only et had an exclusive peek at this episode on Wednesday, and Henry sat down with David and Rosana Arquette to discuss their late brother Alexis, who died in September 2016."
"For some reason, they asked me to talk about four children, four brothers and sisters."
"Four situations," Henry began to ponder on a piece of paper
"There are four of us," David confirmed
Henry continued: "I think that energy is too early because I see it too fast."
"It's really urgent to mention brothers and sisters and talk about brothers and sisters."
"All the focus is here."
"It's like, it's essential."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At least it all worked out for the best.”
“The 35-year-old said "I am thinking about kids quite a lot.”
“Well, despite making their first public appearance as an official couple at the Cinderella premiere in Milan three years ago, the love between the Doctor Who and Mamma Mia: Here We Go Again stars actually began to blossom a year prior.”
“The pair were first introduced back in 2014 whilst working on the set of Pride and Prejudice and Zombies, as Grazia reports, and speculation of a romantic relationship between Smith and James first emerged after the Mirror reported they were spotted together at the 2014 Cannes Film Festival.”
“Shortly after the festival, rumours which hinted at a budding relationship between the actors only intensified after being photographed together once again, this time in London, as the Daily Mail reported.”
“These outings were the first time Smith and James had been romantically linked to anyone after the break up of their previous relationships with actress and model Daisy Lowe and actor Jack Fox respectively however it appears both have clearly moved on as they enjoy their third year together which...”
“...in celebrity terms could be considered a lifetime...”
“Kevin Winter/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesSince they began dating the couple have enjoyed continued success in the world of acting, seen recently in Smith's Emmy Award nominated portrayal of Prince Philip in The Crown, and James' role in the Oscar-winning Darkest Hour.”
“However, it's the recent juicy engagement rumours surrounding the two that have really got fans talking.”
“After displaying a huge diamond ring, as Metro reported, which just so happened to be placed on her engagement finger at the 2018 BAFTA Awards, speculation of potential nuptials was sent into overdrive.”


"At least everything went well."
"I miss the kids a lot," said the 35 year old
"Well, although they made their first public appearance as a formal couple at the premiere of Cinderella in Milan three years ago, the love between" who's here, doctor "and" Mamma Mia: here again "actually began to bloom a year ago."
"According to Grazia, the couple were first introduced during the filming of pride and Prejudice and zombie in 2014. The mirror reported that they were found together at the Cannes Film Festival in 2014, so people began to speculate about the romantic relationship between Smith and James."
Shortly after the festival, the two actors were filmed together again, this time in London, before rumors that their relationship was budding intensified, the Daily Mail reported
"This is the first time that Smith and James have had a romantic relationship with anyone since they broke up with actress, model Daisy law and actor Jack fox respectively, but it seems that they have spent their third year together, and they have obviously started a new life..."
“… In the words of celebrities, it's a lifetime... "
Kevin winter / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images the couple have enjoyed success in the show business since they started dating, most recently in Smith's Emmy nominated film Prince Philip in the world The image in "crown" and James' role in the Oscar winning film "most hour" prove this
"However, it is the recent wonderful engagement rumors surrounding the two that really make fans talk."
"As Metro reported, after showing off a huge diamond ring, it happened to be placed on her engagement finger at the 2018 Academy of Motion Picture Arts Awards ceremony, and speculation about a possible wedding was rife."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“John signed the post, "Love, Elton."”
“I will miss you so much."”
“Thank you for everything.”
“"Travel safe Mum.”
“I only saw her last Monday and I am in shock," he wrote alongside a photo of the two smiling.”
“"So sad to say that my mother passed away this morning.”
“Love, Elton #RIP"Last month, John announced his mother's death on social media, saying he was in shock.”
“He concluded his heartfelt post by writing, "Thank-you for bringing me into the world and for all that you have done for me.”
“I’ve chosen all the music so everything will be just right," he wrote.”
“"Tomorrow your friends will gather separately to say their good byes.”


John signed the post: "Dear Elton."
"I will miss you very much."
"Thank you for everything."
"Safe travel, mom."
"I just saw her last Monday and I was shocked," he wrote next to a photo of them smiling
"It's a pity that my mother passed away this morning."
"Love you, Elton rip" last month, John announced his mother's death on social media, saying he was shocked
Finally, he wrote from the bottom of his heart: "thank you for bringing me to this world, thank you for all you have done for me."
"I chose all the music, so everything will be just right," he wrote
"Tomorrow your friends will come apart to say goodbye."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“20 Best R&B Albums of 1997”
“Watch the video above and see Michelle make the prank call.”
“They don’t play when it comes to their queen.”
“But for some reason, Michelle Williams wanted to pull a little prank on the Beyhive.”
“Uh, wrong move.”
“According to E!”
“News, Williams was at the Liberty University's Convocation when someone dared her to call Beyoncé.”
“So the Destiny’s Child singer obliged the audience and dialed her number but she got a voicemail message instead of Beyoncé.”
“While it looked like an embarrassing moment, Williams said the whole thing was actually staged.”
“As part of the prank, the singer received a call back from "Beyoncé" and they tried to sing "Survivor" together.”


"20 best R & B albums of 1997"
"Watch the video above and see Michelle making a prank call."
"They don't play with their queen."
"But for some reason, Michelle Williams wanted to make a little joke on the beehive."
"Well, it's the wrong way."
"According to e!"
"It's said that at the meeting of Williams at the Free University, someone dared to ask her to call Beyonce."
"So the ballad singer of destiny forced the audience to dial her phone number, but she received voice messages, not Beyonce."
"Although it seems like an embarrassing moment, Williams said, the whole thing is actually staged."
"As part of the prank, the singer got a call back from Beyonce and they tried to sing survivor together."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Grey's Anatomy returns in the fall on ABC for its 15th season.”
“For more on the season finale, click here.”
“Sound off in the comments section below.”
“What did you think of Ramirez's cameo and how Arizona's storyline ended?”
“What's more, Arizona told April and Richard that she was having feelings again for Callie — with the latter seemingly of the same mindset.”
“During Thursday's finale, Arizona revealed that Callie was single now as well.”
“Arizona, newly single after breaking things off with Carina (Stefania Spampinato), decided to move back to New York so her daughter with Callie could have both of her parents in the same city.”
“And while Ramirez's Callie was never seen onscreen, the character did have a prominent role.”
“The song was a cover of Brandi Carlile's signature hit "The Story" — as performed by Ramirez during "Song Beneath the Song," the season seven musical episode of Grey's Anatomy.”
“If the song that played during the episode's final scene — aka the weddings between April and Matthew and Alex and Jo — sounded familiar, it should have.”


"Gray's anatomy will be on ABC season 15 in the fall."
"For more information about the season ending, click here."
"Please make a sound in the comments section below."
"What do you think of Ramirez's cameo, how does the Arizona story end?"
"What's more, Arizona told April and Richard that she had feelings for him again - the latter seemed to have the same mentality."
"In Thursday's final, Arizona revealed that Carly is now single as well."
Arizona was just single after breaking up with Carlina, and she decided to move back to New York so that she and Carly's daughter could have her parents live in the same city
"Although the Camille of Ramirez has never appeared on the screen, the role does play an important role."
This song is the cover of brandy Carlyle's classic song story, sung by Ramirez in the song under the song, which is the music episode of the seventh season of Gray's anatomy
"If the song in the last act of the episode - the wedding between April and Matthew, Alex and Joe - sounds familiar, it should be."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll down for more details on their blossoming relationship.”
“So how did this new coupling come about?”
“I'm 27...that's perfect to me and that's all that matters,"Portwood tweeted.”
“"He's 33??”
“Portwood addressed her new man after a fan tweeted, asking her if she has a thing for "old guys now."”
“The two are reportedly "still in touch," but a separate source said Portwood is "very happy" in her new relationship.”
“A source revealed that Baier and Portwood called their relationship off during production of the reality series.”
“News, the man's name is Andrew Glennon, and the new couple met while Portwood and Baier were filming Marriage Boot Camp.”
“According to E!”
“Nearly two months after the reality cast member called it quits with Baier, Portwood was seen kissing a tall mystery man in Indianapolis.”


"Scroll down to see more details about their booming relationship."
"So how did this new combination come into being?"
"I'm 27 years old It's perfect for me. That's the most important thing. "
"He's 33 years old?"
A fan tweeted to her if she liked "the old guy now," and Potter wood tweeted to her new boyfriend
"The two are reported to be" still in touch, "but another source said Mr. porterwood was" very happy "with his new relationship
"A source revealed that Bayer and Portwood canceled their relationship when they were making reality TV series."
According to sources, the man's name is Andrew Glennon, and the couple met when Portwood and bell filmed "marriage camp."
"According to e!"
"Nearly two months after the reality show actor announced his break-up with Bayer, Portwood was seen kissing a tall mysterious man in Indianapolis."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There will definitely be crossovers throughout the season, some bigger, and some smaller.”
“McKEE: I will never say never to Martin comingback.”
“He wanted to do more, he wanted to cut, so he went to school to become a surgeon.”
“For seasons, Ben was always striving to find the right thing.”
“McKEE: I wouldn’t call it a mid-life crisis.”
“Going from being anesthesiologist to a firefighter — is he going through a mid-life crisis?”
“ABCDEADLINE: What is it about Ben Warren that makes him the best Grey’s Anatomy character to lend himself to a spin-off?”
“McKEE: We’re going to have all the pieces in the next episode in regards to what that cliffhanger indicates.”
“DEADLINE: Let’s start off with one of the most important questions coming off tonight’s cliffhanger: Is that a bomb in JJ’s apartment?”
“McKee wrote tonight’s episode with Paris Barclay directing.”


"There's bound to be a crossover throughout the season, some bigger, some smaller."
"McKee: I'll never tell Martin I'll never come back."
"He wanted to do more, he wanted to cut, so he went to school to become a surgeon."
"Throughout the year, Ben is trying to find the right thing."
"McKee: I don't think it's a midlife crisis."
"From anesthesiologist to fireman - is he experiencing a midlife crisis?"
"Abcdeadline: what makes Ben Warren the best anatomic character of gray and a derivative character himself?"
"McKee: we're going to put all the clips on this suspense hint in the next episode."
"Deadline: let's start with one of the most important questions outstanding tonight: is there a bomb in JJ's apartment?"
"McKee and Paris Barkley directed an episode tonight."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more: Gisele Bündchen Shares Details About Her and Tom Brady's 2009 Wedding Celebration in Costa Rica...”
“Happy anniversary to these two lovebirds!”
“Ten years and two children later the couple is still just as madly in love as they were when they first wed And in honor of that love and their anniversary both Brady and Bündchen shared never before seen shots...”
“...from their wedding day to Instagram writing the sweetest love notes to each other along with their post...”
“"Ten years ago, I didn’t realize how much I could love you and the family we created together.”
“My heart is so full and I am so blessed!”
“I know our journey has not been easy, but the challenges we have overcome have made our bond stronger and our love grow deeper," Brady wrote, alongside a photo of he and his wife kissing during the ceremony.”
“"Thank you for loving me, for supporting my dreams, and for nurturing our family in the way that only you could.”
“You are my rock, my love and my light!”
“I love you and I love our family!”


"More information: Giselle bonchen shared the details of her 2009 wedding with Tom Brady in Costa Rica..."
"Happy anniversary to the lovers!"
"Ten years later, with two children, the couple still fell in love as madly as they did when they first got married. In order to commemorate this love and their wedding anniversary, Brady and banchen shared scenes they had never seen before..."
“… From their wedding to instagram, write each other the sweetest love letters in their posts... "
"Ten years ago, I didn't know how much I loved the family you created with us."
"My heart is so full, I am so lucky!"
"I know our journey is not easy, but the challenges we overcome have strengthened our relationship and deepened our love," Brady wrote, along with photos of him and his wife kissing at the wedding
"Thank you for loving me, supporting my dream and raising our family in a way that only you can do."
"You are my rock, my love, my light!"
"I love you, I love our family!"



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She would have gotten such a kick out of her.”One thing is certain, Ava’s videos are sure to make anyone’s day just a little brighter.”
“She had the best laugh in the world.”
“The sharp and sassy youngster has become an Internet sensation with her hilarious array of comedic personalities.”
“She personifies characters such as “Charlene,” your hot-mess best friend, or “Bossy Boss Lady,” who hates her employees and wants nothing more than to be on a cruise.”
“Ava’s sharp sense of humor and unbelievable wit leaves us cry-laughing with each video.”
“But it’s her mother, Katie Ryan, who’s the most thankful for her daughter’s comedy, as it helped her through the loss of her younger sister, Sarah.”
“When she was grieving, it was her daughter who pulled her through.”
““Even in those times, she was able to make me laugh,” Katie told TODAY.”
““My parents, too—they were in such despair and grief.”
“I think Ava gave them a reason to kind of keep going.”


One thing is for sure, EVA's video will make everyone's day better
"Her laughter is the best in the world."
"This sharp and fashionable young man caused a sensation on the Internet with his comic personality."
"She personifies some characters, such as' sarin ',' your best friend ', or' bossy landlady '. She hates her employees and just wants to take a cruise."
"EVA's sharp sense of humor and incredible wit make us laugh and cry every time we watch a video."
"But most grateful to her daughter's comedy is her mother, Katie Ryan, because it helped her through the loss of her sister Sarah."
"When she was sad, it was her daughter who helped her survive."
"Even then, she could make me laugh," Katie said today
"My parents are the same. They are so desperate and sad."
"I think EVA gave them a reason to move on."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Several insiders have told PEOPLE that there was a notable amount of “stress” surrounding those involved in the wedding.”
“...unclear...”
“...light on the situation he said in a new interview with The Mail on Sunday...”
““I even hand-delivered a letter to Doria asking her why our daughter won’t speak to me,” Thomas, 74, told the publication.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Writing to Doria, 62, is one of several ways that Thomas has tried to connect with Meghan, 37.”
““I have sent several texts.”
“Her number hasn’t changed and they haven’t bounced back,” he said of Meghan, who is expecting a baby with husband Prince Harry in the spring.”
““I’ve pleaded with her to pick up the phone.”
“I wrote her a two-page letter and sent it by certified mail via her representative in Los Angeles.”


"Several insiders told people that the" pressure "of wedding related personnel is quite high."
“… I don't know... "
“…… According to what he said in an interview with the daily mail on Sunday... "
"I even personally sent a letter to Doria asking why our daughter didn't talk to me," Thomas, 74, told the Wall Street Journal
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Writing to Doria, 62, is one of several ways Thomas tries to connect with Megan, 37."
"I sent several messages."
"Her phone number hasn't changed or rebounded," he said of Megan, who is having a baby with her husband Prince Harry this spring
"I begged her to answer the phone."
"I wrote her a two page letter and sent it by registered mail through her representative in Los Angeles."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To be frank, the entire look of her hair is slightly resembled the coiffed 1920’s fashion.”
“...image:eonline.comHer physical make up to gave her dramatic look especially those pale skin, red colored lip color, even the thin pencil marked eyebrows along with the dark smoky eye were the catchy in the photo shoot.”
“The star appeared in three different looks, one with the frock of colorful fringe, a look with a leather & lace ensemble and another with the toe dollar bills.”
“The wardrobe which she wore was designed by the popular stylish Karla Welch.”
“...image: hollywoodlife.comThe wardrobe of the star is completely new and it makes her totally unrecognizable.”
“The 22 year old model poses a bold standout appearance for the new spring 2018 “Discovery” shoot for V Magazine.”
“Well, if you are the fan of Kendall Jenner then you might be thrilled to view the fashion star in typical appearance for her latest V magazine photo shoot.”


To be frank, her whole hairstyle is a bit similar to that of 1920
"... picture: eonline.com Make up gives her dramatic expression, especially those pale skin, red lips, even pencil marked eyebrows and black smoky eyes, which are striking in the photos
The star appeared in three different shapes: a colorful tassel dress, a leather and lace suit, and a dollar bill with toes
"The wardrobe she was wearing was designed by the fashionable Kara Welch."
“… Image: Hollywood life star's wardrobe is brand new, which makes her completely unrecognizable. "
"The 22-year-old model put on a bold look for V magazine's new spring 2018 work discovery."
"Well, if you're a fan of Kendall Jenner, you might be thrilled to see the fashion star's typical appearance in the latest photo taken by V magazine."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““If it was the better treatment option, it wouldn’t be experimental.” Holtz says.”
“Holtz says a common myth on Grey’s Anatomy is that new is better, but people tend to not take those kinds of risks in real life.”
“Yeah, Holtz says it’ll probably come up between incisions.”
“OK, maybe they aren’t talking about who slept with who, but that conference they attended last week or the concert they saw last night?”
“Real life:Actually, yes.”
“Grey’s Anatomy:Doctors discuss their personal lives while working on an unconscious patient.”
“Nurses really are the ones who take care of the patients, and the doctors get familiar with their cases and give instructions.”What we’re trying to say is, the Izzie Stevens-Denny Duquette romance would never have happened in real life.”
““The surgeons, the residents, the other physicians in the hospital are checking with the patients, they get to know their cases, but they don’t spend anything like the kind of time actually in the room with the patients as the nurses do.”
““An awful lot of what you see on the show is what nurses do in terms of patient care,” Holtz says.”
“Nurses are the ones who develop the close relationships with patients.”


"If it's a better treatment, it won't be experimental," Holtz said
Holtz said a common misconception about Gray's anatomy is that new is better, but people often don't take that risk in real life
"Yes, Holtz said it could be between incisions."
"Well, maybe they're not talking about who slept with whom, but the meeting they attended last week or the concert they saw last night?"
"Real life: actually" yes. "
"Gray's anatomy: doctors discuss their private lives in treating comatose patients."
"Nurses are really people who take care of patients. Doctors are familiar with their cases and give guidance." What we want to say is that the romance between iz Stevens and Denny duquet will never happen in real life
"Surgeons, residents, other doctors in the hospital are examining patients, they know their cases, but they don't stay with patients in the ward like nurses do."
"A lot of what you see on the show is the performance of nurses in patient care," Holtz said
"Nurses are people who build close relationships with patients."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And that it’s not normal to be not pregnant and have a birthday cake on Tuesday afternoon when it's not your birthday.Further, in the interview, the much-loved actor even revealed that she wasn’t a “kid person” until she had her own.”
“'"Kaling further added that she hasn’t altered that that much since having the kid.”
“She then quipped, “You're like, ‘I needed to have 11 cupcakes because of my pregnancy cravings.”
“She even added that in the later stages of her pregnancy, Kaling ate whatever she wanted.She reportedly said that when someone’s pregnant, one can just call them cravings.”
“Just earlier on Ellen DeGeneres chat show, the actor made a similar remark.”
“However, on Monday's episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show, the 38-year-old actress joked she still has pregnancy cravings.Mindy Kaling is now a happy mommy of her six-year-old Katherine but looks like her pregnancy cravings are yet to cease.”
“It's been about six months since Mindy Kaling gave birth to her daughter Katherine.”


"What's more, Tuesday afternoon is not your birthday, but I'm not pregnant. I eat birthday cake. It's an abnormal birthday. Furthermore, in the interview, the popular actress even revealed that she was not a "child" before she had no children of her own
"Carlin added that she hasn't changed so much since having children."
"You just say, 'I need 11 cupcakes because of my desire to be pregnant,'" she continued
She even added that in the second half of her pregnancy, Karin eats whatever she wants. I want her. It's reported that when a person is pregnant, people can call it "desire."
"Earlier on, on Ellen DeGeneres' talk show, the actor said something similar."
However, on Monday's Ellen DeGeneres Show, the 38 year old actress joked that she was still pregnant. Mindy Carlin is now the happy mother of her six-year-old daughter Catherine, but it seems that her desire to get pregnant has not stopped
"It's been six months since Mindy Carlin gave birth to her daughter Catherine."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Stars Align for AIDS ResearchRelated Gallery...”
“All proceeds from the sale of the track will benefit the #endHIV campaign aimed at funding trials for the new e-vaccine that promises to prevent HIV.”
“MORE: Sia Releases New Single 'Move Your Body' Weeks After Filing for DivorceFans will be able to download "Free Me" on Friday.”
“The piece follows the mom-to-be's journey from learning of her health status to building her emotional strength (as illustrated by a heartfelt dance sequence choreographed by Ryan Heffington), and giving birth to a healthy baby.”
“"She's about to learn that the HIV is taking over her body, attacking her immune system, and if left untreated, will be passed on to the baby inside her," Moore says in the gut-wrenching opening scene.”
“The Singer Ditches Her Signature Bangs and Wigs While Strolling Through LAXMoore narrates the five-minute visual, starring Saldana as an expectant mother who gets diagnosed with HIV.”
“RELATED: Sia Uncovered!”
“1 killer of women of reproductive age."”
“On Thursday, the 41-year-old singer released a gripping music video for her new single "Free Me," which is centered around the health epidemic that has become the "No.”
“Sia is teaming up with Zoe Saldana and Julianne Moore in the fight against HIV and AIDS.”


"Observation: Stars arrange galleries related to AIDS Research..."
"All the proceeds from the sale of this track will benefit the end HIV campaign, which aims to fund trials of a new electronic vaccine, which is expected to prevent HIV."
"More information: SIA released its new single" move your body "a few weeks after it filed for divorce. SIA will download "free me" on Friday. "
"It tells the story of a mother to be from understanding her health to building her emotional strength (as shown in a heartfelt dance by Ryan Huffington) and giving birth to a healthy baby."
"She's about to learn that HIV is controlling her body, attacking her immune system and, if not treated, infecting the baby in her body," Moore said in a heartbreaking opening statement
The singer abandons her signature bangs and wigs and walks around lakshmore, telling about the five minute video starring Sardana, a mother to be diagnosed with AIDS
"Related: SIA!"
"The first killer of women of childbearing age."
On Thursday, the 41 year old singer released a thrilling music video for her new single free me, which focuses on health issues, which have become her "taboo"
"SIA is working with Zoe Saldana and Julian Moore to fight HIV and AIDS."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...would make me feel disgusting...”
“Ultimately Rose says she told her lawyer to pull the plug on the counter offer within a day of the article being published because she says she thought Ew gross you re disgusting I don t want your money that...”
“She says she countered with $6 million, explaining she thought she could get at least $3 mil out of him -- which she says she only considered to help fund her art.”
“...through it all...”
“Rose told the NYT someone in Weinstein s camp reached out to her before the first story ran with multiple allegations of sexual harassment and offered her 1 mil to sign a non disclosure agreement saying she d stay quiet...”
“Rose McGowan says Harvey Weinstein offered her $1 million to keep her mouth shut before his 1st sexual harassment story broke -- which she countered for far higher before ultimately shooting him down.”


“… It makes me sick... "
"In the end, rose said she told her lawyer to cancel the counter-offer within one day after the article was published, because she said she thought you were disgusting and I didn't want your money..."
"She said she fought back with $6 million, explaining that she thought she could get at least $3 million from him - she said she was only considering helping fund her art."
“… After all this... "
"Ross told the New York Times that before the first report involved multiple sexual harassment charges, someone in Weinstein's camp took the initiative to contact her and offered her $1 million to sign a confidentiality agreement, saying that she would keep silent..."
"Rose McGowan said Harvey Weinstein gave her $1 million to shut up before his first sexual harassment came to light - she demanded more before he was finally killed."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Since then he has kept a low profile and in 2015 appeared in the cult classic Sharknado 3: Oh Hell No!”
“He then surprised fans when he appeared on the show Gone Country 2, and although he didn’t win, he impressed many with country song writing and singing skills.”
“Following his days with the band, Kirkpatrick worked as a voice over actor, most notably on The Fairly OddParents.”
“Chris Kirkpatrick may unfortunately be one of the most easily forgotten NSYNC members, but he is still doing well for himself with a net worth of $13 million.”
“Chris KirkpatrickEstimated Net Worth: $13 Million.”
“5.”
“Everyone is well aware of the success and celebrity Justin Timberlake has enjoyed in his solo career, but in case you ever wondered how everyone in the group fared since their money-making heyday, check out NSYNC: How Much Are They Worth Now?”
“It all came to a halt after a whirlwind of domination in the music industry when the group went on hiatus in 2002 and never re-formed.”
“While their first album did well, their second album, No Strings Attached, did even better, becoming both the best-selling album of the decade and the top-selling album of 2000.”
“The group was launched first in Europe and essentially became an overnight success with their singles “I Want You Back” and “Tearin’ Up My Heart” before they were signed to RCA, transferring their success to North America.”


"Since then, he has kept a low profile and appeared in the cult classic shaknado 3 in 2015: Oh, hell no!"
"When he appeared on" gone country 2 ", fans were surprised. Although he didn't win the competition, many people were impressed by his country song writing and singing skills."
After working in the band, Kirkpatrick became a dubbing actor, most famous for "weird parents."
"Unfortunately, Chris Kirkpatrick may be one of the most easily forgotten nsync members, but he still has a net worth of $13 million and is doing well for himself."
"Chris Kirk estimates net worth: 13 million dollars."
“5.”
"Everyone knows Justin Timberlake's success and fame in his solo career, but if you want to know how everyone on the team has been since their money making heyday, take a look at nsync: how much are they worth now?"
"All this came to an end in 2002, when the orchestra was suspended and no longer reorganized, after a whirlwind of dominance in the music industry."
"Although their first album did well, their second album, no strings attached, did better, becoming the best-selling album of the decade and the best-selling album of 2000."
"This group was first launched in Europe and basically became famous overnight. Their single" I want you back "and" tearin'up my heart "transferred their success to North America before signing RCA."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: Birdie Thompson/AdMedia/ZUMA Wire/Alamy Live News...”
“I can just tell in our everyday lives that he’s changed.”Vanderpump Rules season seven premieres on Monday, December 3 at 9 p.m. on Bravo TV.”
“During a new joint interview, the engaged couple let it slip that they are, at the very least, in talks to have their wedding televised on their own series.”
“When asked about their plans for a bachelor and bachelorette party, Jax let it slip that only one of his bachelor parties (he’s having two) will be on-camera.”
“Brittany then corrected him, stating that it’s not certain yet that their wedding festivities will be televised.”
““There’s going to be two bachelor parties,” said Jax to E!”
“News Daily Pop.”
““There’s going to be one for all the guys, we’re going to go on a ski trip in Aspen, I think next month.”
“That one’s going to be off-camera.”
“And then the on-camera one is going to be in Miami.”“Well, we’re hoping on-camera.”


"Image source: birdie Thompson / admedia / Zuma wire / Alamy live news..."
"In our daily life, I can only say that he has changed." The premiere of season 7 of the van der Pol rules will be broadcast on Bravo at 9pm on Monday, December 3
"In a new joint interview, the engaged couple revealed that they were at least negotiating to have their wedding broadcast on TV."
"When asked about their plans for a bachelor and single woman party, Jax revealed that only one bachelor party (he has two) would be photographed."
Brittany corrected his remarks, saying it was not sure whether their wedding ceremony would be broadcast on TV
"There will be two bachelor parties," Jakes told e! "
"Daily popular news"
"Everyone will have one, and I think we're going skiing in Aspen next month."
"Not that one."
"And then the one on camera is going to be in Miami." "Well, we hope it's on camera."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartDemi Lovato's Team Staged an Intervention a Month Before Apparent Drug OverdoseDemi Lovato's Family Worried She 'Doesn't See the Severity' of Her Apparent Drug OverdoseDrake Bell Lends Support to Demi Lovato: 'This Is a Really Rough Business' (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“RELATED CONTENT:Demi Lovato's Ex Wilmer Valderrama Visits Her at Hospital After Singer's Apparent Drug Overdose This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Get more news on the singer’s hospitalization in the clip below.”
“...making plans to get her straight into rehab when she is released from the medical facility where she is being treated though her loved ones remain deeply concerned because she has told them she still believes she is able to beat her addiction on her own...”
“Lovatics have decided to put on their own concert today in Atlantic City where Demi Lovato was scheduled to perform before the cancelation to show her support pic twitter com WiYocLMG0J Demi Lovato News demetriaaalove July 27 2018 However a source told ET on Wednesday that Lovato s family is...”
“The touching scene took place just before ET learned that Lovato’s team had staged an intervention for her roughly a month ago, where they encouraged her to enter a rehabilitation program, but a source said she refused to take their concerns seriously, leading to her hospitalization this week.”
““Lovatics have decided to put on their own concert today in Atlantic City where Demi Lovato was scheduled to perform before the cancelation to show their support,” one Twitter account captioned a moving clip of fans crowding onto the stage together to happily sing Lovato’s songs despite her absence.”
“Refunds are also available at point of purchase if preferred.”Nevertheless, dozens of fans of the “Sober” songstress showed up to the seaside venue to sing her songs together and show their support.”
“Tickets will be valid to attend the Lauv performance on July 26th along with The Chainsmokers show on July 29th as part of the Atlantic CityBeachFest Concert Series.”


"Embedded code restart Demi Lovato's team intervened a month before the apparent overdose. Demi Lovato's family worried that she" couldn't see "the severity of the apparent overdose. Drake bell supported Demi Lovato:" this is a very difficult business (exclusive) related gallery... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Related content: Wilmer Valderrama, singer Demi Lovato's ex girlfriend, went to the hospital to see her because of an apparent drug overdose. We couldn't get the video because we couldn't upload information from the sponsor
"Please find out more about the singer's hospitalization in the following clip."
“…… Make a plan to let her go directly to the rehabilitation center when she is discharged from the medical institution where she is treated, even though her loved ones are still deeply concerned because she tells them that she still believes that she can overcome drug addiction.... "
"Lovatics decided to hold their own concert in Atlantic City today. Demi Lovato plans to perform in Atlantic City before cancellation to show her support. Picture: Twitter com wiyoclmg0j Demi Lovato news demetriaaalove July 27, 2018. However, a source told et on Wednesday that Lovato's family is..."
"The touching scene happened before et learned that Lovato's team had intervened for her about a month ago. They encouraged her to enter the rehabilitation program, but a source said that she refused to take their concerns seriously, leading to her hospitalization this week."
"Lovatics decided to hold their own concert in Atlantic City today. Demi Lovato was scheduled to perform there before canceling the concert to show their support," a twitter account wrote in a moving video. Despite her absence, fans gathered on the stage to sing Lovato's songs happily
"You can also get a refund at the time of purchase if you like." Nevertheless, dozens of fans of the "sober" singer came to the seaside venue to sing her songs together to show their support
"Tickets to the LAUV show on July 26 and the chain smoker show on July 29 (as part of Atlantic City's best concert series) will be valid."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And why not a velour hoodie?”
“Here’s pencil skirt with nice clean lines.”
“But they can also be quite elegant, and few things feel as good to wear.”
“My main rule with these materials is to play it relatively straight: velvet in particular makes enough of a statement on its own, so you don’t want to get too tricky with it.”
“This dress is so feminine, but at the same time nicely streamlined.”
“A black blazer looks nice and rich.”
“If I still worked in an office, I’d be all over this dress.”
“This tee is the lightest, lightest lavender, and hangs so nicely.”
“A dress for throwing on when comfort is the priority.”
“It’d look amazing with leather leggings.”


"Why not a velvet Hoodie?"
"This pencil skirt has clean lines."
"But they can also be quite elegant, and few things feel so good to wear."
"My main rule for these materials is to keep them straight: velvet, in particular, speaks for itself, so you don't want to be too tricky with it."
"It's very feminine, but it's also very streamlined."
"A black suit looks beautiful and rich."
"If I were still working in the office, I would make a mess of this dress."
"This T-shirt is the lightest and lightest lavender. It's beautiful to hang."
"Clothes to wear when comfort is a priority."
"It'll look great with leather tights."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Perfect for the office and beyond.”
“As shown above, it looks stellar with any type of white footwear and a slicked back bun.”
“Working in fashion, my sartorial choices have been pretty unregulated by my past employers.”
“But seeing as summer 2018 trends include bright and breezy suits that are perfect for warm weather weekdays and weekends alike, I just might need to add an office-inspired look into my everyday wardrobe.”
“Just this weekend, Bella Hadid made waves at Paris Men's Fashion Week when she arrived to the Dior Homme show in a sunny yellow pantsuit and sneakers.”
“Slinky, relaxed in fit, and in a playful hue, the suit didn't feel stuffy or overly professional and was just one in a lineup of matching two-pieces that street style photographers captured over the weekend.”
“Indeed, summer-perfect suits—those in vivid hues, bright prints, and with playful embellishments—with sneakers have been a favorite of stylists, models, and editors as of late.”
“While I am partial to the relaxed trouser and jacket combo (I like the way shapeless blazers fall on my frame and will never say to ultra comfy pants), there are endless silhouette options out there to choose from based on your style preferences.”
“Shorts, cropped pants, fitted blazers — nothing is off-limits, and if you want to make sure your suit fits you like a literal glove I'd recommend checking out custom suiting options.”
“Francois Durand/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesCheck out some of the most fun and versatile suits on the market right now below.”


"Perfect for offices and other places."
"As shown in the picture above, it looks dazzling with any kind of white shoes and smooth bun."
"Working in the fashion industry, my choice of clothes has never been regulated by my previous employers."
"But given the trends in the summer of 2018, including bright, breezy suits, which are perfect for warm weather on weekdays and weekends, I may just need to add an office style to my daily wardrobe."
"Just this weekend, Bella Hadid came to the Dior Homme show in sunny yellow trousers and sneakers, making a big splash at the men's fashion week in Paris."
"Tight fitting, loose fitting and playful colors, this suit is not boring or too professional. It's just one of the two matching series photographed by street style photographers at the weekend."
In fact, summer suits with bright colors, bright prints and playful sneakers have recently been the favorites of stylists, models and editors
"Although I prefer loose pants and jacket combinations (I like the way that shapeless suits fall on me, never super comfortable pants), there are countless silhouettes to choose from according to your style preference."
"Shorts, cropped pants, fitted Blazer - nothing is forbidden, if you want to make sure your suit fits like a glove, I suggest you choose a custom suit."
"Francois Durand / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images is now looking for some of the most interesting and versatile suits on the market."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After their divorce, Shelton started dating No Doubt singer Stefani, who he met during filming of NBC's The Voice.”
“How are they not going to show Miranda Lambert for her reaction while Blake Shelton performs lol #ACMawards — Nick hinds (@nrhinds) April 16, 2018Lambert and Shelton were married from 2011 to 2015.”
“#mirandalambert and #blakeshelton4life #ACMawards2018 — Steph_enwolf (@Steph_enwolf) April 16, 2018"How are they not going to show Miranda Lambert for her reaction while Blake Shelton performs," one fan wrote.”
“Are Blake Shelton and Stefani a real couple, or is he a beard for her.”
“I need to know.”
“— άγγελος  (@PNWsass) April 16, 2018Another fan thinks Shelton and Stefani might not be a genuine couple.”
“I never thought Blake Shelton was *that* good either.”
“Not Miranda Lambert though.”
“#ACMawards — Savannah Landry (@slandry37) April 16, 2018One Lambert fan thinks Shelton was never that good in the first place.”
“...pic.twitter.com/5fTS5MERww — Lauren Cox (@Iaurencox) April 16, 2018"Thanks for sharing my broken heart with me" says Miranda Lambert after winning song of the year, but all I heard was "fuck you, Blake Shelton."”


After their divorce, Sheldon began dating singer Stephanie, whom he met during the filming of NBC's voice
"When Blake Sheldon performs lol#acmawards Nick hinds (@ nrhinds), why don't they show Miranda Lambert her reaction? On April 16, 2018, Lambert and Sheldon married from 2011 to 2015. "
"# Miranda Lambert and # blacksheldon 4Life # acmawards2018 - Steph ψ u enwolf (@ Steph ψ u enwolf) April 16, 2018" one fan wrote: "why don't they let Miranda Lambert show her reaction when she performs in blacksheldon?"
"Is Blake Sheldon and Stephanie a real couple, or is he her beard?"
"I need to know."
"Another fan thinks Sheldon and Stefani may not be a real couple."
"I never thought black Sheldon would be so good."
"But not Miranda Lambert."
"AC mawards Savannah Landry (@ slandry37) on April 16, 2018, a Lambert fan thought Sheldon was not so good in the first place."
“... pic.twitter.com/5fTS5MERww -Lauren Cox (@ iaurencox) on April 16, 2018, after winning the song of the year award, Miranda Lambert said, "thank you for sharing my broken heart with me," but all I heard was "screw you, black Sheldon."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer's latest film Second Act is set for release November 21.”
“Kim Kardashian also wished the beauty a happy birthday, sharing a selfie of the pair with the message: 'Happy Birthday Queen' on top.”
“So it was no surprise that Alex Rodriguez had a touching birthday message for the 49-year-old Tuesday.”
“Talking up her generosity, the MLB veteran turned sports commentator told the triple-threat: 'I hope today we can give you all the happiness you deserve.'”
“Happiness: Alex Rodriguez sent his girlfriend Jennifer Lopez a touching Instagram 49th birthday message Tuesday wishing her 'all the love' she 'deserves' along with a collection of gleeful selfiesA-Rod completed his post with a collection of radiant pictures of J.”
“Lo.”
“Starting his message on a reflective note, he recalled the feeling of childhood birthdays.”
“'When we were kids, birthdays were exciting because it was all about the gifts we would be getting,' he wrote, 'A new bat, dance shoes, maybe a new CD (yes I’m old!).”
“Going strong The superstar and athlete above in May have been dating since early last year Simply the best Talking up her generosity the MLB veteran turned sports commentator told Gthe triple threat I hope today we can give you all the happiness you deserve Way back when Starting his...”
“...message on a reflective note he recalled the feeling of childhood birthdays I see firsthand how that s changed for Jennifer and how she s found joy in sharing with others...”


"Jennifer's latest movie, act two, is scheduled to open on November 21."
"Kim Kardashian also wished the beauty a happy birthday and shared their selfie, which said:" happy birthday, Queen. "
"So it's not surprising that Alex Rodriguez sent a touching birthday message to the 49 year old on Tuesday
"Speaking of her generosity, the MLB veteran sports commentator told triple threat:" I hope today we can give you all the happiness you deserve. "
"Happiness: Alex Rodriguez sent his girlfriend, Jennifer Lopez, a touching instagram 49th birthday message on Tuesday, wishing her" deserved "all her love and a group of happy selfies. Alex Rodriguez used a group of J
"Look."
He begins his message with a thoughtful note, reminiscing about his childhood birthday
"When we were kids, birthdays were exciting because it was all about the gifts we were going to get," he wrote, "a new bat, dance shoes, maybe a new CD (yes, I'm old!)
"The stronger superstar and athlete have been dating in May, since the beginning of last year, simply put, her generous best major league veterans turned to sports commentators to tell gt of the triple threat, I hope today we can give you all the happiness, the way you should get back to starting him..."
“…… In a thoughtful note, he recalled the feeling of his childhood birthday. I saw with my own eyes how it changed for Jennifer, and how she found happiness in sharing with others.... "



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The pair officially filed divorce petitions a few weeks earlier in April 2017.”
“Affleck reportedly maintained a residence in the family’s guest house before moving out in May 2017.”
“FOLLOW US ON FACEBOOK FOR MORE FOX LIFESTYLE NEWSAffleck and Garner announced their separation in 2015, after just over 10 years of marriage.”
“A source for the site, however, had said in October 2017 that Affleck and Shookus were not looking to buy a house together, as Affleck focused on “family friendly” options for the kids.”
“Affleck and his girlfriend, “SNL” producer Lindsay Shookus, had also been by to check out the property prior to Affleck’s purchase, People reports.”
“There’s also a guest house and pool out back, along with an outdoor entertaining area.”
“TAYLOR SWIFT'S NEIGHBORS NOT HAPPY ABOUT LIVING SO CLOSEAccording to online listings, the home features seven bedrooms, seven bathrooms, two half-baths, in addition to its own private screening room, a gym and a wine cellar.”
“...stated.”
“"He was looking for a long time and really wanted to find the right house for his family,” a source for E!”
“The site also reports that Affleck has already brought Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9 and Sam, 5, to tour the house this past weekend.”


"They formally filed for divorce in April 2017 a few weeks ago."
"It was reported that Affleck had been living in the guest house at home until he moved out in May 2017."
"Follow us on Facebook and learn more about fox lifestyle news. After more than 10 years of marriage, saffrock and Ghana announced their separation in 2015."
"However, a source on the website said in October 2017 that Affleck and shokus did not intend to buy a house together because Affleck focused on providing" family friendly "choices for children."
According to people, Affleck and his girlfriend, SNL producer Lindsay schokus, visited the property before Affleck bought it
"There's also a guest house and swimming pool in the back, and an outdoor recreation area."
"Taylor Swift's neighbors are not satisfied with living so close. According to the online list, the house has seven bedrooms, seven bathrooms, two and a half bathrooms, as well as its own private projection room, a gym and a wine cellar."
“… Statement. "
"He's been looking for a long time and really wants to find a suitable house for his family," said an e! "
The website also reported that Affleck had taken 12-year-old violet, 9-year-old Serafina and 5-year-old Sam to visit the house last weekend



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"The Bachelorette" featuring Rachel Lindsay premieres on May 22 at 8 P.M. on ABC.”
“Don’t make these men make you feel any different."”
“And it's tough, try not to overthink, really trust yourself, and stay that smart, confident woman that you are.”
“JoJo said, "So I think I would just tell her not to overthink every situation and at the end of this whole thing, whatever happens she needs to go with your first instinct or whatever thought you keep coming back to.”
“In a previous interview with PEOPLE, Rachel's "The Bachelorette" predecessor JoJo Fletcher gave advice to the new leading lady.”
“Host Chris Harrison was also present in the photo.”
“Rachel was seen wearing a sleeveless white patterned gown during the night one of the filming in "Bachelor" mansion in Agoura Hills, California.”
“Producer Mike Fleiss took to Twitter in March to share the first photo of Rachel as the rose-giver.”
“It also includes the "After the Rose" special when she met the four contestants.”
“The promo offers the background story of the 31-year-old Dallas attorney during her appearance on "The Bachelor".”


"Bachelor," starring Rachel Lindsay, will premiere on ABC at 8 p.m. on May 22
"Don't let these people make you feel different."
"It's hard, try not to think too much, really believe in yourself, keep your intelligence and self-confidence."
"So I think I should tell her not to think too much about every situation. At the end of the whole thing, no matter what happens, she needs to follow your first instinct, or what you've been thinking all the time," JOJO said
In a previous interview with people magazine, Rachel's Bachelor predecessor, Joe Fletcher, gave the new actress some advice
"Chris Harrison, the host of the photo, was also present."
One night at the bachelor mansion in agula mountain, California, Rachel was seen wearing a white patterned sleeveless robe
"Producer Mike Fleiss shared her first picture as a rose giver on twitter in March."
"It also included her 'after the rose' special when she met four contestants."
The video tells the background story of the 31 year old Dallas lawyer in bachelor



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2568306010928962
Correct number is  47
Total number is  183
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
